CRUISE  SHIP  SAFETY:  EXAMINING  POTENTIAL 
STEPS  FOR  KEEPING  AMERICANS  SAFE  AT  SEA 

S.  HRG.  110–1223 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JUNE  19,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–392 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 19, 2008  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................

Page 
1 
4 
2 
1 

WITNESSES 

Network (RAINN) 

Carver, Kendall, President, International Cruise Victims Association, Inc.  ......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Dale,  Terry,  President  and  CEO,  Cruise  Lines  International  Association 
(CLIA), accompanied by James Alan Fox, Ph.D.  ...............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Fortier,  Evelyn,  Vice  President,  Policy,  Rape,  Abuse  and  Incest  National 
................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Fox,  Ph.D.,  James  Alan,  Lipman  Family  Professor  of  Criminal  Justice  at 
Northeastern  University,  Visiting  Fellow,  U.S.  Department  of  Justice,  Bu-
reau of Justice Statistics 
.....................................................................................
Klein, Ph.D., Ross A., Professor of Social Work, Memorial University of New-
foundland  ..............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Coarsey,  Carolyn  V.,  Ph.D.,  Co-Founder,  Family  Assistance  Foundation,  At-
lanta, Georgia, prepared statement  ....................................................................
Letter,  dated  June  16,  2008,  from  Donna  K.  Esposito,  MCC,  President, 
NACOA to Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg  ...............................................................
Letter,  dated  June  18,  2008,  from  William  Connors,  Executive  Director  and 
COO,  National  Business  Travel  Association  to  Hon.  Frank  Lautenberg  and 
Hon. Gordon Smith  ..............................................................................................
Letter,  dated  June  18,  2008,  from  Cheryl  Corey,  Hudak,  CTC,  President, 
American  Society  of  Travel  Agents  to  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  and  Hon. 
Gordon H. Smith  ..................................................................................................
Letter,  dated  June  18,  2008,  from  Roger  Dow,  President  and  CEO,  Travel 
Industry Association to Hon. Frank Lautenberg and Hon. Gordon Smith  .....
Letter,  dated  June  18,  2008,  from  Steve  Tracas,  President  and  CEO,  Vaca-
tion.com to Hon. Frank Lautenberg and Hon. Gordon Smith  ..........................
Letter,  dated  June  19,  2008,  from  Michelle  Fee,  CTC,  CEO,  Cruise  Planners 
to Hon. Frank Lautenberg and Hon. Gordon Smith  .........................................
Letter, dated June 19, 2008, from Kenneth McLean, Director and CEO, Baha-
mas  Maritime  Authority  to  Hon.  Frank  Lautenberg  and  Hon.  Gordon 
Smith  .....................................................................................................................
Letter,  dated  June  19,  2008,  from  Kurt  A.  Nagle,  President,  American  Asso-
.....................................
Letter,  dated  June  19,  2008,  from  Robert  C.  Powers,  Assistant  Director, 
Office  of  Congressional  Affairs,  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation  to  Hon. 
Frank R. Lautenberg  ...........................................................................................

ciation of Port Authorities to Hon. Frank Lautenberg 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Maria Cantwell to: 

Terry Dale  .........................................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Terry Dale  .........................................................................................................
Daniel D. Roberts  .............................................................................................
Roberts,  Daniel  D.,  Deputy  Assistant  Director,  Federal  Bureau  of  Investiga-
tion, prepared statement  .....................................................................................

5 
8 

19 
21 

11 
14 

46 

32 
35 

62 

76 

77 

75 

74 

76 

78 

79 

78 

64 

70 

67 
65 

61 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

CRUISE  SHIP  SAFETY: EXAMINING  POTENTIAL 
STEPS FOR KEEPING AMERICANS SAFE AT SEA 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  19,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 
MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND 
SECURITY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:05 a.m. in room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much for joining us on the 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation,  Merchant  Marine  Infra-
structure, Safety, and Security. 

This  hearing  is  going  to  be  on  cruise  ship  safety.  And  Senator 
John  Kerry,  who  is  on  his  way,  will  be  joining  us.  I  thought  that 
I  would  get  the  process  started,  and  so  I  have  wrested  the  chair-
manship  back,  and  we’ll  go  on  for  a  while.  Now  I’m  told  that  Sen-
ator Kerry is going to be here shortly. But I will make my opening 
statement and, depending on Senator Kerry’s arrival, we’ll perhaps 
start with the statements from the witnesses, as well. I thank you 
all for being here. 

Cruises  are  supposed  to  be  dream  vacations,  but  for  too  many 
families  these  dreams  turn  into  nightmares.  Over  the  past  few 
years  we  have  heard  a  rising  tide  of  reports  about  incidents  on 
cruise  ships.  These  incidents  range  from  claims  of  sexual  assault 
and rape to passengers who go missing at sea. 

One of the victims was a resident of Pine Hills, New Jersey, and 
her  tragedy  occurred  on  Mother’s  Day  of  this  year.  Her  name  was 
Mindy  Jordan,  and  she  was  looking  forward  to  a  relaxing  vacation 
in  Bermuda  and,  instead,  she  disappeared  on  the  Atlantic  Ocean. 
When  her  family  tried  desperately  to  find  out  what  happened  to 
her, the cruise line referred them, would you believe, to the claims 
department.  In  the  words  of  Mindy’s  cousin  Emily,  who  is  here 
with  us  today,  it’s  as  if  she  was  a  piece  of  luggage.  The  investiga-
tion  into  Mindy’s  disappearance  is  ongoing;  and  in  the  meantime, 
Mindy Jordan’s two children are left without their mother. 

And  I  want  to  be  clear,  the  way  Mindy’s  family  was  treated  is 
horrible.  It’s  unacceptable.  It’s  difficult  to  even  get  basic  data  on 
what types of crimes occur at sea, and how often they happen. And 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

2 

if  parents  want  to  take  their  family  to  the  Jersey  shore  or  Disney 
World,  but  want  information  about  public  safety,  they  can  either 
get  it  online  or  call  the  local  authorities  and  they’ll  get  what  they 
need.  But,  if  parents  want  to  take  their  family  on  a  cruise,  there 
is nowhere to get public safety information. 

Now,  this  Subcommittee  had  a  hard  time  getting  this  data  from 
the FBI. And if the Senate Committee that oversees maritime safe-
ty  and  security  has  a  hard  time  getting  that  information,  imagine 
the frustration of an American family trying to plan a trip. 

One problem is that almost no cruise ships fly an American flag. 
Instead,  they  fly  flags  of  convenience  from  other  nations.  But,  be-
cause  these  cruise  ships  are  registered  in  foreign  countries,  our 
government cannot investigate certain incidents at sea, and it can-
not require cruise lines to report on some crimes. These ships dock 
at  our  ports.  We  need  to  use  every  tool  at  our  disposal  to  provide 
the  greatest  level  of  safety  and  security  for  them.  I  hope  that  we 
can  use  this  hearing  to  discuss  proposals  to  achieve  that  level  of 
safety. 

The  Government  needs  to  act  to  ensure  that  American  families 
on  cruises  are  safe.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  the  opinions  of  our 
witnesses. 

We’re joined by Senator Kerry, who’s going to chair this hearing. 
I thank him for his leadership and interest in this important issue. 

Senator Kerry? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator  KERRY [presiding].  Thank  you,  Senator  Lautenberg. 
Thanks  a  lot  for  kicking  this  off.  And  I  apologize  for  being  a  mo-
ment late. 

I appreciate your leadership, and I appreciate the opportunity to 
chair  the  Subcommittee  for  this  particular  hearing.  And  I’m  grate-
ful for the comments that you just made, which are important. 

In  2008  alone,  it’s  estimated  that  about  12.6  million  Americans 
will  board  a  cruise  ship  from  United  States  ports.  Roughly  300 
cruise  ships  are  in  service  worldwide,  and  there  are  plans,  appar-
ently,  to  add  another  22  that  will  service  North  America  over  the 
course of the next several years. 

What we want to do today is take a closer look at the safety situ-
ation that exists with respect to those ships—I’m not talking about 
the safety with respect to the seaworthiness of the ships, but safety 
with  respect  to  the  passengers  aboard  them—and  whether  or  not 
there  is  a  need  for  the  Congress  to  take  additional  steps  to  secure 
American passengers onboard these ships. 

I  particularly  want  to  thank  one  of  our  witnesses  this  morning, 
Mr. Kendall Carver, who has been vigilant in his efforts to improve 
safety  abroad  cruise  ships  worldwide,  and  who  has  done  so  under 
very difficult personal circumstances. 

Four years ago, Mr. Carver’s daughter, Merrian, who was a con-
stituent  of  mine—which  is  how  I  became  aware  of  this  issue  and 
interested  in  it—was  living  in  Cambridge,  Massachusetts,  and  she 
went  missing  in  the  summer  of  2004,  leaving  her  father  and  the 
rest  of  her  family  to  pick  up  the  pieces  after  her  disappearance. 
And  I  might  say  that  the  circumstances  which  he  and  his  family 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

were  put  through  were  really  quite  extraordinary  and  quite  dis-
turbing. 

3 

Three  weeks  after  anyone  had  last  heard  from  Merrian,  Mr. 
Carver  contacted  the  cruise  line  for  which  she  had  purchased  a 
ticket.  And  what  he  was  told  was,  frankly,  quite  shocking.  The 
cruise  line  was  unsure  as  to  whether  Merrian  had  ever  dis-
embarked from the ship. He was told that the cruise line had been 
aware  of  the  fact  that  she  had  not  slept  in  her  room  after  the  sec-
ond night of the cruise, and that most of her belongings, which had 
remained  onboard  after  the  ship  had  docked,  had  been  given  to 
charity.  Most  shocking  to  Mr.  Carver  was  the  fact  that  the  cruise 
line  had  not  notified  law  enforcement  authorities  about  Merrian’s 
disappearance. Three weeks following the ship’s return, the FBI re-
mained unaware of the fact that Merrian was unaccounted for. 

As Mr. Carver will describe in his testimony, her story is, regret-
tably,  not  an  isolated  case.  Despite  being  owned  by  American  citi-
zens  and  headquartered  in  the  United  States,  cruise  ships  operate 
under foreign flags, allowing them to avoid United States law when 
they’re  beyond  U.S.  territorial  waters.  With  respect  to  jurisdiction 
over  crimes,  the  law  is  murky  at  best.  To  many  observers,  these 
circumstances  have  created  an  ideal  destination,  if  you  will,  for 
prospective criminals. 

We’ll  hear  from  our  witnesses  today  as  to  efforts  that  have  been 
made  by  the  industry  to  improve  safety  and  reporting  standards. 
Under  current  law,  cruise  lines  are  under  no  obligation  to  report 
a  crime  that  occurs  outside  U.S.  territorial  waters,  even  when  the 
crime involves an American citizen. 

Now,  I  do  recognize,  and  the  record  needs  to  show,  that  a  vol-
untary  agreement  has  been  reached  between  the  FBI,  the  Coast 
Guard,  and  the  cruise  ship  industry.  But,  I  have  to  tell  you—and 
I  think  Senator  Lautenberg’s  comments  about  the  sort  of  trans-
parency of this information sort of underscored—that it may be ap-
propriate  to  be  somewhat  wary  of  a  voluntary  agreement  that  has 
an  industry  reporting  on  incidents  that  have  the  potential  of  actu-
ally  damaging  the  reputation  or  deterring  people  from  doing  the 
very  thing  that  the  industry  wants,  which  is  coming  onboard  their 
ships, going on a cruise. 

So, I think, you know, the wariness or, caution of the Committee 
in  accepting  that  as  adequate  is  underscored  by  the  fact,  already 
referred  to  by  Senator  Lautenberg,  that  under  this  agreement  we 
found  it  difficult  to  get  easy  access  to  the  information  that  was 
available from the FBI. Now, I’m not sure how much transparency 
there is if the Chair of the U.S. Senate Subcommittee with jurisdic-
tion over this issue has difficulty in accessing that information. 

It’s  clear  that  the  cruise  industry  has  taken  steps  to  meet  with 
the victims and the survivors of victims, and I hope that the many 
recommendations that have been made as to how to improve secu-
rity are going to be fully implemented. 

So,  I  look  forward,  today,  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  as  to 
how  we  provide  a  sort  of  lead-pipe  guarantee  to  people,  and  how 
we have a structure in place where nobody has any questions about 
this, where there’s no uncertainty, where there’s no murkiness and 
everybody  is  confident  that  we  have  put  in  place  best  practices  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

4 

to  how  American  citizens  ought  to  be  protected,  and,  frankly,  how 
an industry ought to act in everybody’s best interests. 

I’ve been working with Congresswoman Matsui, who is deeply in-
vested in this issue, to craft legislation that will be introduced later 
this  month  in  both  the  House  and  the  Senate,  and  we  want  this 
to  be  thoughtful  legislation.  We’re  not  seeking  to  do  injury  to  any-
body; we just want to be smart and thoughtful about how we estab-
lish  a  credible  structure,  where  there  is  a  very  clear  legal  uncer-
tainty as a consequence of jurisdictional issues and flag issues. 

The  legislation  will  seek  to  improve  safety  and  reporting  stand-
ards within the industry, and it will ensure that cruise ships have 
the  ability  and  the  expertise  to  properly  preserve  evidence  when 
crimes do occur. 

I’m a former prosecutor and I very much understand the difficul-
ties of gathering evidence. I have prosecuted rape cases, sexual as-
sault  cases.  I  know  how  complicated  that  can  be.  And  if  you  have 
untrained  personnel,  who  don’t  properly  gather  fresh,  immediate 
evidence, you often wind up with a case where a victim is twice vic-
timized, once obviously by the crime, and, the second time, the sys-
tem  that’s  supposed  to  prosecute  it.  So,  I  want  to  make  sure  that 
we have sufficient efforts. 

I’m  watching  the  ongoing  efforts  to  pass  legislation  in  California 
which  would  require  independent  Ocean  Rangers  to  be  placed  on-
board  cruise  ships,  and  I’m  considering  whether  or  not  that  would 
be appropriate to be administered at the Federal level. 

So,  I  hope  this  hearing  will  be  helpful,  frankly,  for  all  of  us,  in 

trying to fashion the most effective response. 

Our witnesses are Kendall Carver, president of the International 

Cruise Victims Association—— 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator CARPER. Mr. Chairman? 
Senator KERRY. Oh, yes, Senator. 
Senator CARPER. Could I just make a brief statement? 
Senator KERRY. Absolutely. I’ll come back to you. Let me just in-

troduce the panel. 

Senator CARPER. Thanks very much. 
Senator KERRY. Mr. Carver has been working consistently to im-
prove cruise safety standards. Evelyn Fortier, the vice president of 
policy  at  the  Rape,  Abuse,  and  Incest  National  Network,  RAINN, 
the Nation’s anti-sexual-assault organization, and she’s worked ex-
tensively  on  crime  legislation  as  a  long-time  Senate  staffer,  and  is 
a  former  constituent,  having  lived  in  Brookline,  Massachusetts. 
Terry Dale is President and CEO of Cruise Lines International As-
sociation. We appreciate you being here today. And Dr. Ross Klein 
is  professor  of  social  work  at  Memorial  University  of  Newfound-
land,  and  has  written  extensively  on  the  cruise  industry.  So,  we’re 
grateful to all of you for being here. 

Senator Carper? 
Senator CARPER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
You know, this is not an issue that I’ve thought a lot about, and 
perhaps  others  in  our  panel  have  not  thought  about  it  either.  Our 
youngest  son  just  graduated  from  high  school,  and  later  this  sum-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

5 

mer he’ll be going on a cruise with close family friends of ours. And 
so, this sort of caught my eye, caught my attention. 

Like  our  Chairman,  I’ve  spent  some  time  on  cruises,  but  they 
were  on  ships  that  were  painted  gray,  in  the  Navy,  and  I’ve  never 
had  the  privilege  of  taking  a  cruise  of  the  nature  that  we’re  dis-
cussing here today. 

But, Mr. Chairman, we’re grateful to you for holding the hearing. 
We  appreciate,  certainly,  each  of  our  witnesses  for  coming  today 
and  sharing  your  time  with  us,  and  your  testimony,  and  for  re-
sponding  to  our  questions  as  we  try  to  ensure  that  all  cruise  ship 
travelers are as safe as feasible. 

Crime on cruise ships is an issue that most of us know relatively 
little  about,  and  this  could  be  because  it  is  so  rare,  as  the  cruise 
industry  claims;  it  could  also  be  because  the  information  is  not 
made public, as some of our victims groups claim; or, it could sim-
ply  be  that  people  don’t  like  to  think  about  it,  especially  when 
they’re planning their big vacation. 

What  I  look  forward  to  hearing  today  is  a  discussion  about  peo-
ple’s  expectation  with  regard  to  protection  from  crime  on  a  cruise 
ship.  What  should  people  expect,  as  far  as  law  enforcement  and 
prosecution  of  crimes  that  do  occur  on  cruise  ships?  And  how  far 
off is that expectation from the situation they find when they board 
the ship, much as our own son will board a ship this summer. 

I  would  also  like  to  explore  how  we  can  ensure  that  people  are 
fully  informed  about  the  crime  protection  and  prevention  system 
that  will  or  will  not  be  available  to  them  before  they  buy  passage 
on a cruise ship. 

Again,  welcome.  Thank  you  for  joining  us.  We  look  forward  to 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Senator Carper. 
We  did  refer  to  those  deployments  as  cruises,  didn’t  we?  I  forgot 

your testimony. 

that. 

Senator CARPER. Yes, they were. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator KERRY. Mr. Carver, you want to lead off, sir? And thank 

you for being here with us. 

STATEMENT OF KENDALL CARVER, PRESIDENT, 
INTERNATIONAL CRUISE VICTIMS ASSOCIATION 

Mr. CARVER. I would like, first of all, to thank the Chairman and 

Members of the Committee for the opportunity to be here today. 

I come to you, both as a victim and as President of a group called 
International  Cruise  Victims,  an  organization  formed  by  people 
that have been treated poorly as victims of cruise-line crimes. Prior 
to  that,  I  spent  18  years  as  President  and  CEO  of  an  insurance 
company  in  New  York  City.  And  this  is  the  last  thing  I  ever 
thought I would be doing. 

Each member that had joined ICV since it was founded in Janu-
ary 2006, which is not that long ago, has had a similar painful ex-
perience to mine. 

Senator  Kerry  has  given,  briefly,  a  story  of  Merrian.  She  dis-
appeared. We had to trace her. Police finally traced her to a credit- 
card  transaction  which  put  her  on  a  Celebrity  Cruise  Ship.  We 
called the cruise ship. Got back to us in a couple of days, and they 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

6 

said,  ‘‘Yup,  she  was  on  the  ship,  but,  after  a  couple  of  days,  didn’t 
use  her  room,  but  that’s  not  uncommon.’’  And,  ‘‘Did  she  get  off?’’ 
‘‘We  don’t  know  whether  she  did  or  not.’’  So,  that  just  left  us  up 
in the air. Merrian had a 13-year-old daughter. 

A brief summary of the facts after that took place are as follows. 
The  cruise  line  failed  to  report  Merrian  missing  to  the  FBI  for 
5  weeks,  and  that’s  only  after  we  had  contacted  the  cruise  line. 
They  disposed  of  her  property  at  once,  giving  most  of  it  away  to 
charity,  and  took  a  bag  with  her  name  on  it  and  put  it  in  storage 
with  her  name  and  Social  Security  number,  gave  her  things  away 
to  charity.  When  we  asked  immediately  for  video,  ‘‘Was  there  any 
video?’’ their answer was, ‘‘We got there too late.’’ We were 25 days 
into  it.  He  said,  ‘‘You  got  here  too  late.  We’ve  already  erased  it.’’ 
In January of this year, I was advised by a senior officer of Royal 
Caribbean  that,  in  fact,  they  did  have  the  video,  they  did  keep  it, 
and  they  did  review  it,  for  3  months.  We  had  an  individual  go  on 
the  cruise  ship,  a  detective.  They  said  there  was  no  video.  So,  all 
the time, they were lying to us about the video. 

They  made  a  report  to  the  FBI  that  said  nothing  happened  on 
that  cruise.  They  told  our  detectives  that  the  cabin  steward  made 
no  reports  concerning  Merrian.  And  we  later  learned,  4  and  a  half 
months  later,  through  depositions,  that,  in  fact,  he  had  reported 
her  missing  daily  for  5  days.  His  boss  told  him  to  forget  it  and  do 
his  job.  And,  at  the  end,  he  said,  ‘‘What  do  I  do  with  the  things 
in the room?’’ he said, ‘‘Just put them in a bag, put it in my locker,’’ 
and they gave them away. 

The  cruise  line  would  not  permit  an  interview  with  the  steward 
or the security officer. For us to interview that individual, we made 
a decision—we wanted to speak to one person on that ship that had 
seen  Merrian.  We  had  to  hire  an  international  detective  agency, 
Kroll & Associates, hire two law firms, take court action in Massa-
chusetts  and  then  Florida,  and  spend  $75,000  and  4  and  a  half 
months  to  get  a  deposition  from  the  steward,  who,  in  effect,  then 
indicated  to  us  for  the  first  time  he  had  reported  Merrian  missing 
from the very beginning. So, in effect, they’d been lying to us from 
day one concerning our daughter. 

In  Congressional  hearings  in  December  2005  and  March  2006, 
representatives,  under  oath,  from  Royal  Caribbean  indicated:  as 
soon as they knew about Merrian’s disappearance, they cooperated 
with  the  family.  Hey,  as  soon  as  they  knew  about  Merrian’s  dis-
appearance—you’ll see it in the material—which is the third week, 
they started the cover up concerning our daughter. 

When  you’re  a  victim,  you  think  you’re  the  only  person  in  the 
world  that’s  a  victim  of  a  crime.  Then  a  book  came  out,  in  Decem-
ber—or in July 2005, called ‘‘The Devil in the Deep Blue Sea.’’ And 
if  you  read  that  book—and  it’s  actually  in  my  testimony—it  says 
coverup is a standard operating procedure for cruise lines, and they 
get  the  person  off  the  ship,  and  that’s  exactly  what  had  happened 
to us. 

At  the  first  Congressional  hearing,  in  2005,  I  concluded  that  I 
couldn’t  change  the  cruise  line  industry.  Other  people  couldn’t  do 
it  on  their  own.  So,  we  formed  a  group  called  International  Cruise 
Victims.  We  now  have  several  hundred  members  in  16  countries. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

7 

In March 2006, I testified for the first time in the House of Rep-
resentatives.  There  were  six  victims  that  testified  at  that  meeting. 
But, we surprised the group. At the end, instead of just telling our 
tragic story, we presented a ten-point program for safety. 

I’m  here  to  say  that  we  have  met  with  the  cruise  lines  four  dif-
ferent  times—only  after  a  Congressional  Committee  ordered  them 
to  last  year—on  those  points.  And,  to  this  day,  nothing  has  been 
agreed to by the cruise lines regarding those points. They say, ‘‘Oh, 
those  are  great  ideas.  We’ll  think  about  it.’’  But,  we  never  get  the 
answer of what their commitment is. And there is no commitment. 
So, what have we learned in this process? If you look at my testi-
mony, you’ll find two memorandums. One’s a legal memorandum of 
law,  which,  in  effect,  says,  ‘‘We  are  under  no  obligation  to  inves-
tigate  crimes  on  cruise  ships.’’  They  then  go  on  to  say,  ‘‘We’re  not 
equipped  to  investigate  crimes  on  a  cruise  ship.’’  And  you  can  add 
to  that,  they  also  don’t  take  responsibility  for  the  medical  care  on 
a  ship,  nor  do  they  take  responsibility  for  excursions.  So,  in  effect, 
they  don’t  take  responsibility.  I  don’t  care  how  many  security  offi-
cers. That is their legal position. 

So,  last  year,  the  Congressional  Committee  requested  that  CLIA 
and  ICV  meet  while  the—ICV  meet  with  the  FBI  to  discuss  these 
matters. In effect, at that meeting, on July 25, I believe it was, we 
met with the FBI, and the FBI said, ‘‘We do not have the resources 
to  follow  up  on  crimes  on  cruise  ships.’’  So,  in  effect,  the  cruise 
lines do nothing, the FBI says, ‘‘We do not have the resources.’’ So, 
when a crime occurs on a cruise ship, nobody does nothing. 

And  if  you  look  at  my  testimony,  you’ll  find  a  chart  of  crimes 
prosecuted  by  the  FBI.  You’ll  see  that  in  2005  there  were  only  50 
cases  opened  and  only  four  convictions  of  any  crime  on  a  cruise 
ship,  while—any  crime  on  the  high  sea.  That’s  more  than  cruise 
ships. So, that proves nobody’s being prosecuted on these cases. 

Last  month,  on  May  16,  Cruise  Critic,  which  is  kind  of  a  pro- 
cruise-line Internet site that sells cruise ships, did a survey. Seven-
teen-hundred  people  responded  to  that,  and  10  percent  of  the  peo-
ple,  when  asked  the  question,  ‘‘Have  you  ever  been  affected  by  a 
crime,  minor  or  major,  on  a  cruise  ship?’’  said  yes.  Now,  I’m  here 
to  say,  if  there  was  a  resort  in  this  country  where  10  percent  of 
the  customers  said  they  were  affected  by  a  crime  at  that  resort, 
they’d  probably  be  closed  down  or  a  major  investigation.  This  is  a 
cruise line blog that took that survey. 

In  September  2007,  Elijah  Cummings,  after  three  hearings  with 
the  cruise  line,  said,  ‘‘Hey,  I’ve  had  enough.  You’ve  got  90  days. 
Tell  me  what  you’re  going  to  do.  Tell  me  what  you’re  going  to  do 
to  improve  safety.’’  So,  they  produced  this  report,  gentlemen,  30- 
some  pages  long.  And  if  you  carefully  read  the  report—they  deliv-
ered it December 19—they didn’t commit to anything in this report. 
They  said,  ‘‘Oh,  that’s  a  great  idea.  We’ll  promote  it.  We’ll  further 
study  it.’’  But,  there  were  no  commitments  after  being  requested. 
After all of these commitments—no results—action is starting to 
be  taken.  In  April,  the  House  of  Representatives,  and  amendment 
was  added  to  the  Coast  Guard  reapportionment  bill  requiring  that 
cruise  lines  report,  on  the  Internet  quarterly,  all  of  their  crimes. 
Now, if that can get through the Senate, that will be a major step. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

8 

And that is the last thing they want to do, is to go public with their 
crimes. 

Because of lack of concern of the cruise industry having any reg-
ulations,  the  State  of  California  has  moved  forward  to  have  their 
own  bill  requiring  an  Ocean  Ranger  on  each  cruise  ship  in  or  out 
of California waters. 

In  May  12,  in  a  hearing  which  I  spoke  at  in  California—I’ve 
spoke  at  several  of  them—the  cruise  lines  responded  that  if  that 
bill was passed, they would ‘‘stop going to certain California ports, 
like  San  Francisco  and  San  Diego,  if  you  put  one  security  guy  on 
our  ship.’’  The  question,  gentlemen,  is,  what  do  they  have  to  hide? 
They  should  welcome  them.  If  their  crimes  are  as  low  as  they  are, 
they  should  welcome  somebody  coming  on  to  verify  that  informa-
tion. 

Since 1999, the cruise lines have had a stated policy of zero toler-
ance  for  crime.  That  would  infer  to  me  that  there’s  nothing  they 
wouldn’t  do  to  prevent  crimes  on  a  cruise  ship.  And  yet,  with  all 
the recommendations, I’ve come to the conclusion that there’s noth-
ing  they  will  accept  concerning  crimes.  They  should  be  willing  to 
accept anything that would prevent crimes on cruise ships. 

I  now  look  at  their  zero  tolerance  in  a  different  way.  I  look  at 
their  zero  tolerance  for  crimes  as  zero  tolerance  for  any  legislation 
that would have any effect to control the cruise lines. 

Last  year,  gentlemen,  they  spent  $2,800,000  lobbying  in  Wash-
lobby.  Wal-Mart  spent 

ington.  Very  effective,  very  powerful 
$280,000. This is a foreign corporation. 

Now,  frankly,  we  have  no  money  to  lobby.  We’re  volunteers. 
Only, we have the victims stories and their passion for change that 
makes  ICV  work  every  day.  Fortunately,  Members  of  the  Senate 
and  the  House  were  elected  by  the  people  to  represent  the  people 
of this country and not the lobbyists for a foreign corporation. 

It’s  clear  to  me  that  comprehensive  legislation  is  needed,  since 
the  cruise  lines  have  shown  no  willingness  to  voluntarily  commit 
to make substantial changes in their current practices. 

I look forward to answering your questions, and I appreciate the 

opportunity to present this testimony. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carver follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KENDALL CARVER, PRESIDENT, 

INTERNATIONAL CRUISE VICTIMS ASSOCIATION, INC. 

I would first like to thank the Chairman and Members of this Committee for giv-
ing  me  the  opportunity  to  participate  before  this  Committee.  I  am  here  today  both 
as a victim and as President of International Cruise Victims (ICV), an organization 
formed  by  people  who  have  experienced  tragedies  on  cruises  and  who  have  been 
treated  poorly  by  cruise  lines.  My  prior  working  experience  was  to  serve  as  Presi-
dent and CEO for 18 years of an insurance company in New York City. 

As  a  victim,  I  have  personally  felt  the  pain,  not  only  of  losing  our  daughter, 
Merrian Carver, but also having to struggle with the cover-up by a major cruise line 
of the facts concerning her disappearance. She had been a passenger on a Celebrity 
Cruise Ship, which is owned by Royal Caribbean. 

Each member that has joined ICV since it was founded in January 2006, has had 
similar  painful  experiences.  Having  listened  to  the  stories  of  these  other  victims,  I 
feel  that  I  now  know  something  about  what  counselors  must  feel  when  they  hear 
the tragic stories from their patients. (See Attachment III) 

I  would  first  like  to  review  quickly  the  tragic  events  of  our  daughter’s  disappear-
ance. We were first made aware of a problem when our granddaughter called to tell 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

9 

us that Merrian was not returning her calls. We then started to search for Merrian, 
and contacted the police in Cambridge, Massachusetts where she lived. 

The  police  found  out  3  weeks  later  through  credit  card  records  that  she  had 
booked the cruise, and we contacted the cruise line. After a couple of days they con-
firmed that she had been on a Celebrity Cruise ship. Only after we contacted them 
did  they  make  a  report  to  the  FBI  1  week  later.  This  was  5  weeks  after  she  dis-
appeared.  Moreover,  we  found  out  that  the  cruise  line  had  previously  disposed  of 
her property without attempting to contact her family or the FBI. 

protocol, which calls for property left on a ship to be held for 90 days. 

weeks after she went missing and only after we contacted the cruise line. 

A brief summary of the facts concerning her disappearance are as follows: 
• The  cruise  line  failed  to  report  that  Merrian  was  missing  to  the  FBI  until  5 
• They disposed of her property by giving most of it away to charity despite their 
• When  we  asked  about  video  records,  which  could  show  things  relevant  to 
Merrian’s  disappearance,  they  told  us  they  had  no  records  and  there  had  been 
no review concerning Merrian. However, in January, 2008, 3 years after we had 
asked for and subpoenaed information concerning these video’s, one of their sen-
ior  personnel  admitted  in  writing  that  we  had  been  lied  to  concerning  the  sur-
veillance tapes; their retention and review by ship’s personnel. (See Attachment 
II) 
• They  made  a  report  to  the  FBI  indicating  that  nothing  had  happened  on  the 
cruise. Their internal documents show that during the third week in September 
their  officials  were  coordinating  a  cover-up  of  the  disappearance.  (See  Attach-
ment II) 
• They  told  our  Detectives  that  the  cabin  steward  had  made  no  reports  con-
cerning  Merrian,  but  we  later  learned  through  the  depositions  that  he  had  re-
ported  her  missing  from  her  cabin  for  5  days  during  the  cruise  and  was  told 
by his supervisor to ‘‘forget it and just do your job’’. 
• The cruise line would not permit an interview with the steward or the security 
officer responsible for the surveillance system. We had to hire private investiga-
tors, two law firms, take court action in two states and spend over $75,000 over 
41⁄2 months  in  order  to  have  our  lawyers  depose  the  steward—an  effort  that 
many  families  of  victims  would  not  have  been  able  to  make.  Only  after  this 
court  ordered  deposition  on  January  16  and  17,  2005,  did  we  realize  that  they 
had been lying to us from the beginning. 
• In Congressional Hearing in December of 2005 and again in March 2006, under 
oath the representatives of Royal Caribbean indicated that they cooperated with 
the family as soon as they were aware of her disappearance. In fact, they really 
began  the  cover-up  of  her  disappearance  starting  the  third  week  of  September 
2004 and cooperated later only in response to court orders. (See Attachment II) 
However, even to this day, we have not received items that were requested and 
subpoenaed in 2004–2005. 

In  July  of  2005,  I  read  a  book,  ‘‘The  Devil  in  the  Deep  Blue  Sea’’  by  Kristoffer 
Garvin.  On  page  246  he  wrote,  ‘‘An  examination  of  sexual  cases  found  a  pattern  of 
cover-ups that often began as soon as the crime was reported at sea, in international 
water where the only police are the ship’s security officers.’’ I realized that our treat-
ment fell within this pattern. (See Attachment II) 

After  the  first  Congressional  hearing  in  December  of  2005,  I  concluded  that  we 
needed to organize a group of victims in order to have a chance to get changes made 
in  the  practices  of  the  cruise  industry.  I  contacted  other  known  victims,  and  to-
gether,  we  decide  to  form  International  Cruise  Victims.  After  28  months  of  exist-
ence, this group now has members in 16 different countries with a separate chapter 
in Australia. Members of this subcommittee and their staff members can review the 
stories  of  these  victims  on  our  website  at  www.internationalcruisevictims.org.  (See 
Attachment III) 

When  I  and  other  victims  testified  at  the  Congressional  Hearing  in  March  2006, 
we  shared  our  stories  to  show  the  need  for  substantial  changes  in  cruise  line  prac-
tices  and  we  presented  a  10-point  program  developed  by  ICV  members  to  improve 
safety  on  cruise  ships.  I,  along  with  other  ICV  members,  have  personally  attended 
several meetings with CLIA and cruise lines representatives concerning suggestions 
made  by  our  members.  The  standard  answer  from  them  is  the  ‘‘these  are  great 
ideas,  however  we  have  another  approach.’’  Even  after  all  of  these  meetings,  the 
problem  is  that  we  have  seen  no  firm  written  commitments  for  any  significant 
change. (See Attachment IV) 

What  have  we  learned  during  this  past  couple  of  years  concerning  this  industry? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

10 

1. Cruise Ships take the legal position that they are not required to investigate 
crimes  on  cruise  ships  and  are  not  equipped  to  do  so.  This  is  documented  in 
various  items  we  have  available.  These  documents  indicate  that  any  informa-
tion  they  give  to  the  FBI  or  Coast  Guard  is  provided  on  a  purely  voluntary 
basis.  In  addition,  they  take  to  position  that  they  are  also  are  not  responsible 
for  the  medical  care  or  accidents  that  occur  on  excursions  that  they  have  cho-
sen,  promoted  and  also  make  a  substantial  commission  on  when  sold  to  their 
passengers.(See Attachment I) 
2. At the request of a Congressional Committee in March of 2007, we met with 
the FBI on July 25, 2007, to review this matter. At this meeting the FBI clearly 
indicated that they do not have the resources to follow up on the various crimes 
that  occur  on  cruise  ships.  Records  indicate  that  in  2005  only  50  cases  were 
opened and there were only 4 convictions of people committing crimes. (See At-
tachment I) 
3.  Since  the  cruise  ships  do  not  investigate  crimes  and  report  them  only  on  a 
voluntary  basis  to  the  FBI  and  since  the  FBI  says  they  do  not  have  the  re-
sources  to  follow  up  on  those  crimes  that  are  reported,  most  criminals  are  not 
apprehended  or  punished  for  the  crimes  they  commit  on  cruise  ships.  As  Rep-
resentative  Christopher  Shays  has  indicated,  ‘‘it  is  the  perfect  place  to  commit 
a crime.’’ 
4.  In  addition,  a  well-known  Internet  site,  Cruise  Critic,  in  an  editorial  dated 
May 16, 2008, cites results of a survey of 1700 people that have taken a cruise 
and found that 10 percent of respondents said yes to the question: ‘‘Have you ever 
been  affected  by  crime,  minor  or  major,  on  a  cruise  ship?’’  Dr.  Ross  Klein,  Pro-
fessor  of  social  work  at  Memorial  University  of  Newfoundland,  indicates  that, 
‘‘These  numbers  would  suggest  that  as  many  as  one  million  Americans  have 
been  victims  of  a  crime  on  a  cruise  ship.’’  If  a  resort  had  10  percent  of  their 
customers  indicate  that  they  had  been  affected  by  a  crime  at  that  resort,  there 
would be extensive investigations by legal authorities. (See Attachment I) 
5.  With  the  added  concern  of  terrorism,  Passengers  on  cruise  ships  need  the 
same protection as passengers have on airlines that currently have independent 
national  Sky  Marshalls  for  protection.  In  the  October  16,  2006  issue  of  the  In-
surance  Journal,  an  article  titled,  ‘‘Maritime  Terrorism  Risk  Extends  to  Cruise 
Ships and Ferry Boats’’, states that cruise ships and ferry boats need more pro-
tection  than  they  now  have  against  terrorist  attacks  that  could  kill  and  injure 
many passengers and cause serious financial losses. This conclusion is based on 
a new RAND Corporation report. (See Attachment V) 

In  the  September  2007  House  Hearings,  chaired  by  Elijah  Cummings,  the  rep-
resentatives  of  the  cruise  lines  were  given  90  days  to  provide  to  his  Committee  a 
report on what they were willing to do. This report was delivered to the Committee 
on  December  19,  2007.  A  careful  review  of  this  report  shows  that  after  all  the  var-
ious  meetings  and  Congressional  hearings  the  cruise  lines  are  unwilling  to  commit 
in  writing  to  any  real  changes  from  what  they’re  doing  currently.  (See  Attachment 
IV) 

As  a  result  of  their  unwillingness  to  make  commitments  for  change,  the  U.S. 
House  of  Representatives,  on  April  24,  2008,  passed  an  Amendment  to  the  Coast 
Guard  Reauthorization  Act  measuring  crime  on  cruise  ships  to  require  cruise  lines 
to make public their actual crime statistics of missing persons and crimes on cruise 
ships  and  to  make  that  information  available  to  the  public.  Assuming  this  also 
passes  the  Senate,  this  will  be  one  step  forward  to  at  least  make  public  the  crimes 
on cruise ships. 

Because of the concern regarding the lack of regulation of the cruise line industry, 
legislation has also recently been introduced in California to place appropriate Cali-
fornia  licensed  independent  security,  called  Ocean  Rangers,  on  cruise  ships  as  they 
enter  or  leave  California  waters.  This  bill  has  gone  through  several  committees  in 
the California legislature and on May 28, 2008 was passed by the California Senate 
25 to 12. 

The  cruise  line  industry  has  strongly  opposed  this  California  initiative  to  place 
one security officer on their ships by threatening in testimony to the California Sen-
ate  Committee  on  Appropriations  on  May  12,  2008,  that  they  would  bypass  Cali-
fornia  ports  if  the  legislation  passed.  In  view  of  the  crime  rates  reported  by  the 
Cruise  Critic  survey,  the  industry  should  gladly  accept  independent  security  and 
thereby  provide  their  passengers  with  the  same  protections  that  they  would  have 
in major resorts in this country where the police are called if a crime occurs. 

We  need  to  address  solutions  to  this  problem,  in  order  to  protect  future  pas-
sengers  and  crew.  The  goal  of  ICV  is  not  to  damage  cruise  lines  but  to  hold  them 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

11 

accountable  for  the  safety  of  future  passengers  and  crewmembers  and  to  require 
prompt  and  accurate  reports  to  authorities  of  crimes,  deaths,  disappearances  and 
other matters that would normally be investigated if they had occurred on land. 

Since  1999  cruise  lines  have  had  a  stated  policy  that  they  have  a  zero  tolerance 
for crimes. This would infer that there is nothing that they would not do to prevent 
crimes on cruise ships. However, after our several meetings with representatives of 
cruise  lines  to  explore  various  suggestions  coming  from  victims  and  their  families, 
the cruise lines have yet to commit in writing to any changes. (See Attachment IV) 
Meanwhile,  they  aggressively  oppose  any  new  legislation  to  improve  the  safety  on 
cruise ships. In fact, in 2007 this foreign cruise line industry spent over $2,800,000 
in Washington for lobbying. In contrast, Wal-Mart spent $280,000. 

Frankly, we have no money to lobby, only the many victims and their passion for 
change  that  are  working  for  ICV  every  day.  Fortunately,  you  were  elected  by  the 
people you represent and not the lobbyist for a foreign corporation. 

It  is  clear  to  me  that  comprehensive  legislative  action  is  needed  since  the  cruise 
lines  have  shown  no  willingness  to  voluntary  commit  to  make  substantial  changes 
in  their  current  practices  in  order  to  protect  passengers  on  cruise  lines.  I  will  look 
forward to answering any questions that you might have concerning this subject. 

INTERNATIONAL CRUISE VICTIMS ASSOCIATION, INC. (ICV) 

SUPPLEMENTAL ATTACHMENTS* 

Submitted by Kendall Carver 

Section  I  Attachments—Reported  Crime  Rates  on  Cruise  Ship  and  FBI  Record  of 

Convictions 

Section  II  Attachments—Documents  concerning  the  Cover-up  of  Merrian  Carver 

Disappearance 

Section III Attachments—ICV Victims of Cruise Lines 
Section  IV  Attachments—Summary  of  Results  of  Various  Meetings  with  IVC  Vic-

tims and CLIA 

Section V Attachments—Maritime Terrorism Rand Corporation Report 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Carver.  We  appre-

ciate that important testimony. 

Ms. Fortier? 

STATEMENT OF EVELYN FORTIER, VICE PRESIDENT, 

POLICY, RAPE, ABUSE AND INCEST NATIONAL 

NETWORK (RAINN) 

Ms.  FORTIER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the 
Subcommittee, for holding this hearing, which is very timely, given 
that incidents of sexual assault and missing persons continue to be 
reported. And, according to the FBI, about half of all crimes on the 
high  seas  that  are  reported  to  them  involve  sexual  assault  on 
cruises. 

I  am  with  RAINN,  the  Rape,  Abuse  and  Incest  National  Net-
work,  which  is  the  Nation’s  largest  anti-sexual-assault  organiza-
tion. Our mission is to end sexual assault in the U.S. by improving 
services  to  victims,  educating  the  public  about  sexual  assault,  and 
striving to bring rapists to justice. 

We  created  and  operate  the  National  Sexual  Assault  Hotline, 
which  is  a  toll-free  number,  at  800–656–HOPE,  which  is  available 
to  victims  24/7,  and  we  operate  it  in  partnership  with  1105  rape 
crisis  centers  around  the  Nation,  located  in  every  state  and  the 
District of Columbia. 

* [All attachments referred to in this document are retained in the Committee’s files.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

12 

We  also  created  the  National  Sexual  Assault  Online  Hotline, 
which is the first web-based resource for victims, and it’s available 
at RAINN.org. 

I’d  like  to  begin  by  asking  you  to  imagine  how  you  might  feel  if 
you  had  long  saved  and  planned  for  a  cruise  vacation,  and  then 
abruptly had to end your voyage because you had been traumatized 
by  a  sexual  assault  while  on  the  cruise.  This  happened  to  Laurie 
Dishman,  of  California,  and  others  like  her.  For  years,  she  put  a 
bit  of  salary  aside,  each  pay  period,  to  save  up  for  her  dream  of  a 
sunny  cruise  vacation  with  one  of  her  close  childhood  friends.  She 
planned the troop—excuse me—she planned the trip in minute de-
tail  after  collaborating  with  her  friend  on  what  destination,  what 
to bring, and what amenities they could afford. 

On  the  trip,  a  crew  member,  attired  in  a  cruise  security  officer’s 
uniform,  approached  her  at  the  bar  and  questioned  her  in  a  way 
that  she  found  unnerving.  Hours  later,  the  same  crew  member 
knocked  at  the  door  of  her  cabin,  which  had  no  peephole,  and  she 
opened  the  door  slightly  to  identify  the  visitor,  at  which  point  he 
physically  forced  the  door  of  her  cabin  open,  pushed  her  onto  the 
bed, and raped her. She reached out to other cruise personnel who 
entered  her  room  and  sat  on  the  bed  on  which  she  was  raped, 
thereby  potentially  contaminating  the  crime-scene  evidence.  These 
personnel  suggested  she  be  the  one  to  collect  any  evidence  she 
thought  might  be  relevant  and  bring  it  to  personnel  on  the  ship. 
While  she  was  coping  with  the  life-shattering  effects  of  having 
been raped, she later learned that the man who had raped her was 
no security guard, but actually a janitor who had been asked to fill 
in for the security guard. 

And, unfortunately, hers seems not to be an isolated case. Other 
United States citizens have come forward to report sexual assaults 
on  cruises,  and  described  feeling  helpless  or  virtually  alone  in  the 
hours after they were victimized. 

If you are sexually assaulted while on a cruise vacation, you, like 
Laurie  Dishman  of  California,  who’s  in  the  audience  today,  may 
find  that  any  hope  of  your  securing  justice  is  extremely  remote, 
perhaps even nonexistent. 

Next, I’d like to turn to what you can expect if you’re raped dur-
ing  a  cruise  voyage.  Remember  that  the  cruise  industry  is  some-
what  unique  among  businesses  that  provide  services  to  U.S.  con-
sumers,  in  that  most  cruise  vessels  sail  under  foreign  flags  and 
don’t have to comply with many U.S. laws, as already noted by the 
Chairman. This is illustrated further when you compare the poten-
tial experience of an American rape victim at sea to the likely expe-
rience of a rape victim on shore in the United States. 

First,  if  you’re  raped  on  land,  consider  what  happens.  You  have 
the option to call our hotline number, toll free, any time of the day 
or night, or visit our online hotline, through which you may imme-
diately receive free and confidential online help from trained, rape- 
crisis personnel. Those who staff these hotlines are located at rape 
crisis centers around the country, and so, a local rape crisis center 
affiliated  with  RAINN  may  offer  to  send  their  personnel  to  meet 
you, and personally escort you to the nearest hospital or police sta-
tion. At the hospital, medical personnel can be counted on to evalu-
ate  you  for  injuries,  take  your  medical  history,  and  compile  a  rape 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

13 

kit, which will be sent to a crime lab for analysis. And if you’ve re-
ported the assault to the local authorities, you can expect someone 
from a nearby police department will interview you, that the police 
investigating  the  crime  have  the  necessary  jurisdiction  to  do  so, 
that the police will preserve physical evidence for trial, that certain 
local  or  State  criminal  laws  will  govern,  and  that  certain  protocols 
will be followed in the police investigation. 

If you, a U.S. citizen, are raped during a cruise, by contrast, your 
situation  is  potentially  very  different,  and  you  can  be  far  less  cer-
tain  of  what  will  happen  next.  Because  most  cruise  ships  are  for-
eign  flagged,  because  the  perpetrator  may  be  a  foreign  national, 
and  because  you  might  be  in  international  waters,  you  face  a  host 
of  legal  uncertainties.  And  these  are  in  addition  to  your  having  to 
cope, far from home, with the emotional and physical consequences 
of having been assaulted. You won’t have any rape crisis personnel 
onboard to support you, let alone law enforcement officials to come 
to your aid. You might turn to cruise ship employees for help, only 
to  later  find  that  the  cruise  line  has  a  vested  interest  in  shielding 
themselves  against  negative  publicity  or  legal  jeopardy.  And  you 
might  wonder  how  any  security  personnel  hired  by  the  cruise  line 
will  react  if  presented  with  any  situation  that  might  give  rise  to 
a potential conflict of interest between their employer and yourself. 
At this point in time, you probably have three options, but every 

one of those options has potential drawbacks. 

Option one is to disembark at the next port and report the crime 
to the local authorities onshore. But, you might not speak the same 
language  as  the  local  police,  and  not  know  the  local  customs.  And 
maybe  you  didn’t  know  to  contact  your  nearest  U.S.  embassy  or 
consulate. You might find out later that you approached the wrong 
authorities  in  the  wrong  jurisdiction.  And  the  local  authorities 
might not want to assume jurisdiction if they perceive that the sex-
ual  assault  occurred  in  international  waters.  And  if  local  authori-
ties do investigate, key evidence may have disappeared by the time 
you  contact  them,  because,  unless  someone  onboard  assumed  re-
sponsibility  for  securing  the  crime  scene,  evidence  may  have  al-
ready  been  contaminated  or  cleaned  by  the  time  the  police  arrive. 
And  even  if  the  local  investigation  proceeds,  you  have  significant 
obstacles.  You  might  have  to  take  time  off  from  work  and  return 
again to the local jurisdiction for an extended period, a jurisdiction 
which you’re completely unfamiliar with the legal customs. 

Your second option as a victim would involve reporting the crime 
to  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation,  in  cooperation  with  the 
cruise  line.  The  FBI  can  investigate  crimes  reported  to  it  by  the 
cruise lines, but typically wouldn’t be in a position to act as an on-
board  police  force  immediately  after  the  assault  happens.  And, 
while you wait for the FBI, here again, there’s the risk that no one 
will assume responsibility for securing the crime scene or ensuring 
that potential witnesses do not collaborate. It’s also not certain that 
a  cruise  victim  will  receive  adequate  medical  care  or  that  trained 
personnel will collect DNA or other evidence immediately after the 
assault. 

Finally,  for  a  victim  of  sexual  assault,  a  third  option  is  to  dis-
embark  at  the  ship’s  next  port  of  call  and  take  the  next  flight 
home.  This  might  be  appealing,  because  you  want  to  quickly  get 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

14 

out  of  a  bad  situation.  But,  if  you  leave  the  ship  without  having 
reported, the cruise line may refuse, later, to accept your complaint 
of having been assaulted. 

Finally, I’d like to conclude with some recommendations for Con-
gress.  RAINN  suggests  that,  one,  we  impose  stricter  requirements 
for  reporting  onboard  incidents  of  sexual  assault  and  authorize 
Federal officials to impose penalties for noncompliance with this re-
quirement. 

Second,  we  suggest  that  you  provide  victims  who  report  sexual 
assaults during cruises with immediate access, via telephone or the 
Web,  to  rape  crisis  personnel  who  are  trained  to  meet  the  unique 
needs of Americans traveling overseas, so that cruise victims know 
they’re not alone. 

Third,  we  suggest  that  Congress  ensure  greater  oversight  of 
training  and  conduct  of  crew  members  on  ships,  in  collaboration 
with the cruise industry. 

Fourth,  we  need  to  ensure  that  cruise  lines  are  accountable  to 
the  public  to  fully  report  all  incidents  of  sexual  assault.  We  ap-
plaud Congresswoman Matsui, as well as Congressman Shays, Poe, 
and  Maloney,  for  recently  introducing  an  amendment  that  would 
require cruise crimes to be publicly disclosed online. 

Fifth,  we  suggest  improving  the  screening  and  training  of  crew 

members who work with passengers. 

And  finally,  cruise  lines  should  educate  their  passengers,  before 
the ship departs, about the onboard risk of sexual assault and what 
to  do  if  they  or  a  friend  or  a  relative  is  assaulted  during  the  voy-
age. 

In closing, thank you for your time and inviting me to testify. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Fortier follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EVELYN FORTIER, VICE PRESIDENT, POLICY, RAPE, ABUSE 

AND INCEST NATIONAL NETWORK (RAINN) 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  scheduling  to-
day’s hearing. This hearing is very timely, because high profile cases in which cruise 
passengers or crewmembers were raped, sexually assaulted, or disappeared continue 
to be reported. The safety of the nine or ten million United States citizens who take 
a cruise each year should be of vital importance to all of us; and the issue of cruise 
ship safety merits Congress’ continued attention. 

I want to begin by asking you to imagine how you might feel if you had long saved 
and  planned  for  a  cruise  vacation,  and  then  had  to  abruptly  end  your  voyage  be-
cause  you  had  been  traumatized  by  a  sexual  assault  while  on  the  cruise.  Specifi-
cally,  imagine  that  for  years  you’ve  put  a  bit  of  your  salary  aside  each  pay  period 
to  save  up  for  your  dream  of  a  sunny  cruise  vacation  with  one  of  your  close  child-
hood  friends.  You  have  planned  the  trip  in  minute  detail,  after  collaborating  with 
your  friend  on  which  destination,  what  to  bring  with  you  on  the  trip,  and  which 
amenities you can afford. 

On  the  trip,  a  crewmember  attired  in  a  cruise  security  officer’s  uniform  ap-
proaches you at the bar and questions you in a way you find unnerving. Hours later, 
this  same  crewmember  knocks  at  the  door  of  your  cabin,  which  has  no  peephole, 
and,  once  you  open  the  door  to  identify  the  visitor,  he  physically  forces  the  door  of 
your cabin open. He pushes you onto the bed in your cabin and rapes you. You reach 
out to other cruise line personnel, who enter your room and sit on the bed in which 
you were raped (thereby potentially contaminating the crime scene evidence). These 
cruise  personnel  suggest  you  collect  any  evidence  you  feel  might  be  relevant  and 
bring  it  to  medical  personnel  on  the  ship.  While  you  are  coping  with  the  life-shat-
tering effects of having been raped, you later learn that the man who raped you was 
no security guard, but rather a janitor who filled in for the security guard. 

Regrettably, this is how one American cruise line passenger described her experi-
ence during testimony before another congressional committee last year. And, unfor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

15 

tunately, hers seems not to be an isolated case. Numerous other United States citi-
zens  who  have  reported  sexual  assaults  while  on  cruises  described  feeling  helpless 
or  virtually  alone  in  the  hours  after  they  were  victimized.  If  you  are  sexually  as-
saulted  while  on  a  cruise  vacation,  you,  like  Laurie  Dishman  of  Sacramento,  Cali-
fornia  (the  rape  survivor  described  above)  may  find  that  any  hope  of  your  securing 
justice is extremely remote, perhaps even nonexistent. 
What Can You Expect If You Are Raped During A Cruise Voyage? 

The  cruise  industry  is  somewhat  unique  among  businesses  that  provide  services 
to  U.S.  consumers  in  that  most  cruise  vessels  sail  under  foreign  flags  and  do  not 
have  to  comply  with  many  U.S.  labor,  environmental,  or  other  regulations.  The 
uniqueness  of  the  cruise  industry’s  situation,  compared  to  many  other  businesses 
operated in the United States, becomes even more apparent when you compare the 
potential  experience  of  an  American  rape  victim  at  sea  to  the  likely  experience  of 
an American rape victim on shore. 

First,  consider  what  happens  after  you  are  raped  on  land.  You  have  the  option 
to  call  the  National  Sexual  Assault  Hotline,  800–656–HOPE,  toll  free,  any  time  of 
the  day  or  night,  or  to  visit  the  National  Sexual  Assault  Online  Hotline  at 
www.rainn.org, from anywhere in the country, through which you may immediately 
receive  free  and  confidential  online  help  from  trained  rape  crisis  personnel.  Those 
who  staff  these  hotlines  are  located  at  rape  crisis  centers  around  the  country,  and 
the  availability  of  these  services  means  you  are  not  alone.  Hotline  staff  and  volun-
teers will provide you with immediate emotional support, and your local rape crisis 
center  may  offer  to  send  their  personnel  to  meet  you  and  personally  escort  you  to 
the nearest hospital or police station. 

At the hospital, medical personnel can be counted on to evaluate you for injuries, 
take  your  medical  history,  and  compile  a  rape  kit  containing  DNA  and  other  evi-
dence. You also can expect that any DNA evidence collected during this examination 
will be sent to a crime lab for analysis, hopefully to be used later in identifying and 
prosecuting  a  potential  suspect.  The  collection  of  DNA  at  this  point  in  time  pre-
serves evidence for the future, for use in any later legal case. Protocols govern how 
this DNA is to be collected, analyzed, stored, and used in the criminal case. 

If  you  immediately  reported  the  assault  to  the  local  authorities,  you  can  also  ex-
pect that someone from a nearby police department will interview you and perhaps 
a suspect as well as any other witnesses. Your experience dealing with the criminal 
justice  system  ultimately  may  not  be  pleasant  or  result  in  your  hoped  for  outcome, 
but along the way you can be fairly confident of certain things: that the police inves-
tigating  the  crime  have  the  necessary  jurisdiction  to  do  so,  that  the  police  will  pre-
serve physical evidence for a possible trial, that certain local or state criminal laws 
will  govern  in  your  case,  and  that  certain  protocols  will  be  followed  in  the  police 
investigation. It’s also within the realm of possibility that a local prosecutor will find 
your case deserving of prosecution and your predator is brought to justice. A victim 
advocate may be assigned to offer guidance and support to you along the way; also, 
you and your family members or close friends have the option of seeking counseling 
at your local rape crisis center, to assist in your long-term recovery. 

If you, a U.S. citizen, are raped during a cruise, by contrast, your situation is po-
tentially  quite  different,  and  you  can  be  far  less  certain  of  what  will  happen  next. 
Because  most  cruise  ships  are  foreign-flagged  vessels,  because  the  perpetrator  may 
be a foreign national, and because you may be in international waters when the as-
sault  occurs,  you  face  a  host  of  legal  uncertainties.  For  example,  you  cannot  auto-
matically  assume  that  certain  laws  will  cover  the  incident,  due  to  messy  jurisdic-
tional issues that arise in some of these cases. 

Such uncertainties are in addition to your having to cope (far from home and ab-
sent  your  usual  support  network)  with  the  emotional  and  physical  consequences  of 
having been assaulted. In the immediate aftermath of the assault, for example, you 
might  not  have  a  friend  or  family  member  traveling  with  you  on  board.  You  prob-
ably  will  not  find  any  rape  crisis  personnel  onboard  to  support  you,  let  alone  law 
enforcement officials to come to your aid on the ship. 

If traveling alone, you might turn to cruise ship employees for help, only to later 
find that the cruise line has a vested interest in shielding themselves against nega-
tive  publicity  or  legal  jeopardy  (and  protecting  such  interests  may  come  at  the  ex-
pense of your own interest in securing justice and getting appropriate medical care). 
If  you  were  assaulted  by  a  crewmember,  and  you  are  a  passenger  on  the  ship,  you 
might  have  good  reason  to  wonder  how  any  security  personnel  hired  by  the  cruise 
line  will  react  if  presented  with  any  situation  giving  rise  to  a  potential  conflict  of 
interest between their employer’s legal situation and your safety. 

You  may  encounter  someone  onboard  who  can  competently  and  sympathetically 
explain  to  you  what  needs  to  happen  in  order  for  you  to  report  the  crime  to  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

16 

proper authorities and have the crime investigated. At this point in time, you prob-
ably have three options, each of which has certain drawbacks: 

Option #1: Your first option is to disembark at the next port and report the crime 
to the local authorities on shore. There is a good chance you will not speak the same 
language  as  the  local  police  and  are  unfamiliar  with  local  customs.  Perhaps  no  one 
told you that you should approach your nearest U.S. embassy or consulate for assist-
ance,  and  you  did  not  initially  seek  their  help.  You  might  learn  later  that,  due  to 
jurisdictional  uncertainties,  the  authorities  you  approached  do  not  have  sole  juris-
diction over your case, and that perhaps you should have reported the crime to au-
thorities  in  an  entirely  different  jurisdiction.  (Alternatively,  the  local  authorities 
may not want to assume responsibility for the criminal investigation if they perceive 
that the sexual assault occurred in international waters.) 

If  local  authorities  do  decide  to  investigate,  key  evidence  may  have  dissipated  by 
the  time  you  contact  them.  That’s  because,  unless  someone  onboard  assumed  re-
sponsibility  for  immediately  securing  the  crime  scene,  evidence  may  already  have 
been contaminated or cleaned by others by the time the local police arrive. Also, be-
fore  local  authorities  show  up,  the  offender  may  already  have  either  collaborated 
with  others,  or  been  dismissed  by  the  cruise  line  and  escorted  off  the  ship.  (If  the 
offender then travels to another country, it will be difficult, if not impossible, to find 
them again). 

Finally,  even  assuming  the  local  investigation  proceeds,  and  charges  are  brought 
against  the  perpetrator,  you  may  face  significant  personal  obstacles  to  cooperating 
with  the  prosecution.  You  may  have  to  take  time  off  from  work  and  leave  behind 
your friends or family in the United States to return again, perhaps more than once 
or  for  an  extended  period,  to  the  foreign  jurisdiction  that  is  prosecuting  the  case. 
You may find, too, that you are completely unfamiliar with the legal system of that 
particular jurisdiction. 

Option  #2:  The  obstacles  presented  above  may  seem  overwhelming,  and  so  per-
haps  you  are  inclined  to  pursue  a  different  course  of  action.  Your  second  option  as 
a  victim  of  sexual  assault  would  involve  reporting  the  crime  to  the  Federal  Bureau 
of  Investigation  (FBI),  in  cooperation  with  the  cruise  line.  But  this  option,  too,  has 
drawbacks  for  you,  as  the  FBI  can  investigate  crimes  reported  to  it  by  the  cruise 
lines,  but  typically  would  not  be  in  a  position  to  act  as  an  onboard  police  force  im-
mediately after your assault. 

The  FBI  typically  will  not  board  a  ship  to  interview  the  victim  or  other  potential 
witnesses to the crime until after the ship docks. In the meantime, here again, there 
is  the  risk  that  no  one  will  assume  responsibility  for  securing  the  crime  scene  or 
ensuring  that  potential  witnesses  do  not  collaborate  or  disperse.  Once  again,  if  the 
cruise line escorts the offender off the ship at the next port of call, or if the offender 
leaves, it may be difficult, if not impossible, to find them again. 

It  also  is  not  certain  that  a  cruise  victim  will  receive  adequate  medical  care  or 
that  trained  personnel  will  be  available  to  collect  DNA  or  other  evidence  imme-
diately  following  an  assault.  (Laurie  Dishman,  who  reported  being  raped  by  a  crew 
member  while  on  a  cruise  in  2006,  testified  last  year  that  ship  personnel  expected 
her to do the job of collecting any crime scene evidence herself. She also was asked 
to  pay  for  her  own  rape  kit,  which  would  not  have  been  the  case  had  she  gone  to 
a hospital in the United States.) 

Also,  certain  thresholds  must  be  met  for  an  FBI  investigation  to  proceed  and  for 
Federal  prosecutors  to  bring  charges.  In  the  case  of  a  sexual  assault,  for  example, 
where  the  victim’s  consent  is  an  issue,  the  case  might  not  move  beyond  the  initial 
phase of information gathering. The victim may find, after the FBI collects such in-
formation,  that  the  chances  of  a  Federal  prosecutor  pursuing  rape  charges  are  ex-
tremely remote. The decision whether or not to prosecute the case lies with Federal 
prosecutors;  and  these  decisions  are  often  made  based  on  the  severity  of  the  crime, 
the likelihood of successful prosecution leading to conviction and, of course, available 
Federal resources. 

Option  #3:  For  a  victim  of  sexual  assault,  a  third  option  is  to  disembark  at  the 
ship’s  next  port  of  call,  and  take  the  next  flight  home.  In  the  immediate  aftermath 
of  the  crime,  the  victim  may  find  this  option  the  most  appealing  of  the  three,  be-
cause  it  allows  the  victim  to  quickly  escape  the  surroundings  in  which  the  assault 
occurred as well as the perpetrator, who may still be lurking somewhere nearby. 

The  victim  may,  however,  later  find—maybe  years  later—that  the  repercussions 
of  having  been  raped  continue  to  haunt  him  or  her.  Like  many  of  rape’s  survivors, 
in  the  weeks,  months,  or  years  after  the  assault,  a  cruise  victim  of  sexual  assault 
may  experience  flashbacks,  depression,  nightmares,  employment  difficulties,  or 
other negative effects and in some cases, even be suicidal. Any hope of securing jus-
tice—which  is  often  important  to  victims  in  their  recovery—may  have  disappeared 
if  the  victim  did  not  formally  report  the  rape  while  onboard  and  the  cruise  line  de-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

17 

clines  to  record  the  complaint  once  the  cruise  has  ended.  Meanwhile,  the  offender 
gets a free pass to prey on additional victims. 
What Is Your Risk of Being Assaulted Aboard a Cruise? 

According to FBI testimony at another congressional hearing in March 2007, sex-
ual  ‘‘[s]exual  assault  and  physical  assaults  on  cruise  ships  were  the  leading  crime 
reported  to  and  investigated  by  the  FBI  on  the  high  seas  over  the  last  5  years  at 
55  percent  and  22  percent  respectively.’’  The  FBI  also  noted,  at  a  different  hearing 
last September, that the cruise lines reported 41 instances of sexual assault 1 during 
a six-month period in 2007: 

‘‘Since April 1, the cruise lines have reported 41 instances of sexual assault. Of 
these  41  incidents,  19  represented  allegations  of  sexual  activity  generally  cat-
egorized as rape, three of which occurred on shore, and, thus, outside the juris-
diction  of  the  FBI.  Based  on  the  41  reports,  the  FBI  opened  13  investigative 
cases.  Five  of  these  cases  have  been  closed  for  reasons  of  victim  reluctance  to 
pursue prosecution or prosecutive declination from the United States Attorney’s 
Office. Eight investigations are ongoing.’’ 

The  cruise  industry  maintains  that  the  rate  of  sexual  assault  at  sea  is  signifi-
cantly lower than the on shore rate of sexual assault. According to the cruise indus-
try, during the three-year period from 2003 to 2005, when roughly 31 million North 
Americans sailed on cruise ships, there were 178 complaints of sexual assaults. But 
because data on rates of sexual assault during cruise voyages is not easily accessible 
to the public, it is difficult for us to evaluate the accuracy of such statistics. 

We  note  that  the  industry’s  position  is  directly  contradicted  by  the  2007  congres-
sional  testimony  of  Dr.  Ross  Klein,  who  suggested  that  the  rate  of  sexual  assault 
on  board  ships  could  be  as  much  as  50  percent  higher  than  the  on  shore  rate  of 
sexual assault. 

I  believe  that  it  is  certainly  possible  that  the  true  rate  of  onboard  sexual  assault 
might be higher than what is currently being reported to Federal authorities by the 
cruise industry: 

• First,  there  is  no  way  to  reliably  assess  whether  the  cruise  lines  are  fully  and 
accurately  reporting  all  onboard  sexual  assaults  to  Federal  authorities.  The  in-
dustry already is expected to report such information, but what’s reported is not 
made  public.  Thus,  it’s  hard  for  passengers  (or  independent  third-parties)  to 
confirm  whether  each  incident  of  sexual  assault,  including  their  own,  has  been 
fully and properly recorded. 

• Second,  sexual  assault  is  one  of  the  least  reported  violent  crimes.  According  to 
the  U.S.  Department  of  Justice,  as  many  as  60  percent  of  onshore  sexual  as-
sault  victims  decline  to  report  the  crime  against  them.  We  believe  it  is  likely 
that  many  cruise  passengers  who  experience  sexual  assault  on  the  cruise  also 
will  not  report  the  crime  (and  that  such  crimes  thus  will  not  become  part  of 
industry cruise safety statistics). RAINN last week communicated with over 200 
rape  crisis  centers  in  various  states  to  determine  whether  any  of  their  clients/ 
hotline  callers  had  been  sexually  assaulted  during  a  cruise.  About  9  percent  of 
these 200 centers reported being contacted by a cruise victim. 

• Third,  in  today’s  competitive  business  climate,  cruise  lines  may  have  an  eco-
nomic incentive to underreport or misclassify sexual assault crimes. Even if we 
assume  that  they  are  doing  their  best  and  would  not  consciously  underreport, 
cruise personnel may lack the legal knowledge required to properly classify and 
report  sexual  crimes  to  Federal  authorities.  (U.S.  college  administrators—who 
also  often  lack  law  enforcement  experience—sometimes  encounter  similar  dif-
ficulties  in  interpreting  the  Federal  Clery  Act’s  requirements  for  reporting  on- 
campus crimes at the Nation’s college and universities.) 

In  summary,  for  those  on  a  cruise,  it  is  easy  to  forget  that  the  risk  of  being  as-
saulted  onboard  a  cruise  ship  is  real.  It  is  easy,  too,  for  the  vacationing  public  to 
forget  that,  while  a  cruise  ship  may  resemble  a  small  city  in  population  size,  the 
public on the cruise ship has no law enforcement officials to keep would-be criminals 
in check or to immediately secure a crime scene and investigate a crime once it oc-
curs. 

1 The  FBI  has  stated  that  it  investigates  cruise  sexual  assaults  as  defined  in  Title  18  of  the 
United States Code (U.S.C.), Sections 2241 through 2243 and 2244 (a) and (c), and that the prin-
cipal  law  giving  the  U.S.  jurisdiction  over  crimes  committed  on  a  ship  is  set  forth  in  Sec.  7  of 
Title 18 of the U.S. Code. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

Recommendations for the 110th Congress 

18 

Impose stricter requirements for reporting onboard incidents of sexual assault (and 
authorize  Federal  officials  to  impose  penalties  for  noncompliance  with  this  require-
ment). 

The  FBI  and  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  in  2007  entered  into  an  agreement  with  the 
cruise  industry,  which  calls  for  the  industry  to  voluntarily  report  certain  crimes. 
This  agreement  seems  to  mainly  deal  with  crimes  that  are  voluntarily  reported  by 
the  industry  and  might  not  address  crimes  that  should  be,  but  are  not,  reported  to 
the  FBI.  Congress  should  review  this  agreement  carefully  to  ensure  that  the  FBI 
can  and  will  exercise  meaningful  oversight  of  cruise  industry  reporting  methods, 
and  to  ensure  that  someone  other  than  the  cruise  officials  has  a  say  in  whether  or 
not  an  incident  reported  by  a  passenger  meets  the  threshold  for  disclosure.  If  this 
agreement does not give the FBI the ability to take action against cruise ships (most 
of  which  are  foreign-flagged  vessels)  for  underreporting  or  misclassifying  sexual 
crimes, Congress should tighten requirements for the cruise lines. Enhancing the re-
liability of data on the frequency and nature of crimes on cruises should be the goal. 
Provide  victims  who  report  sexual  assaults  during  cruises  with  immediate  access 
(via  a  telephone  or  the  Web)  to  rape  crisis  personnel  who  are  trained  to  meet  the 
unique  needs  of  Americans  traveling  overseas,  so  that  cruise  victims  know  they  are 
not alone. 

RAINN,  the  Nation’s  largest  anti-sexual  assault  organization,  created  and  oper-
ates  the  National  Sexual  Assault  Hotline,  800–656–HOPE  (in  partnership  with 
1,105 affiliated rape crisis centers, located in every state and the District of Colum-
bia).  The  Telephone  Hotline  has  helped  1.2  million  callers  since  its  inception  in 
1994.  RAINN  also  recently  launched  the  National  Sexual  Assault  Online  Hotline 
(the nation’s first secure, Web-based hotline for rape victims), at www.rainn.org). Fi-
nally, RAINN also conducts education and outreach programs to help prevent sexual 
assault and ensure that perpetrators are brought to justice. 

Close  to  a  year  ago,  RAINN  approached  one  of  the  largest  cruise  line  companies, 
Royal  Caribbean,  to  suggest  that  they  establish  access  from  their  ships  to  our  On-
line Hotline and to our 24-hour Telephone Hotline for those instances where a guest 
or  crewmember  becomes  the  victim  of  a  sexual  assault  while  traveling  onboard  a 
ship. Our goal is to facilitate both immediate and continuing professional counseling 
services  should  a  cruise  passenger  desire  and  need  such  services.  We  are  currently 
engaged in discussions with Royal Caribbean about our proposal to link cruise ship 
victims  with  rape  crisis  hotline  personnel  while  the  victims  are  at  sea.  We  believe 
that  it  would  be  appropriate  for  the  entire  industry  to  provide  access  to  these  (or 
similar hotline) services to any cruise passengers or crew members who are victim-
ized while traveling in international waters. 

RAINN  also  believes  that  it  will  be  important  to  equip  those  hotline  personnel 
who  assist  cruise  victims  at  sea  with  certain  resources  that  are  uniquely  tailored 
to meet the unique needs of such victims. For example, while the typical (on shore) 
caller  to  our  Telephone  Hotline  is  seeking  information  about  victim  resources  in 
their  local  community,  a  caller  from  a  cruise  ship  at  sea  typically  would  need  con-
tact  information  for  the  consulate  or  U.S.  embassy  at  the  nearest  port  of  call,  con-
tact  information  for  the  FBI,  and  information  about  how  to  report  a  sexual  assault 
to  cruise  line  personnel,  plus  advice  on  how  to  seek  medical  attention  and  related 
support  services.  Cruise  victims  also  may  get  help  from  rape  crisis  centers  in  their 
local communities upon their return home. 

Of the roughly 200 rape crisis centers, located in various states around the nation, 
from  whom  we  heard  last  week,  90  percent  said  they  do  not  currently  train  their 
personnel  to  meet  the  unique  needs  of  victims  of  cruise  ships.  Although  over  half 
said  that  they  feel  fully  prepared,  and  an  additional  one-third  reported  that  they 
feel  somewhat  prepared,  to  assist  cruise  victims,  60  percent  said  they  would  find 
it helpful to receive materials to assist in counseling clients or responding to hotline 
calls. At least 40 percent said they would find it helpful to receive contact informa-
tion  for  Federal  agencies  that  deal  with  cruise  victims;  about  one-quarter  said  that 
they would find it useful to receive a list of international resources that provide as-
sistance to cruise victims; and about one-quarter also said they would appreciate re-
ceiving  specialized  training  to  help  them  better  meet  the  unique  needs  of  rape  vic-
tims on cruises. 

Ensure greater oversight of training and conduct of crew members on ships. 
The  cruise  industry  needs  to  take  additional  steps  to  ensure  that  their  crew-
members are adequately supervised and that better protocols are instituted and fol-
lowed to protect victims (crewmembers and passengers alike) in the event that sex-
ual  assaults  occur  on  cruises  in  the  future.  Royal  Caribbean  advised  us  that  they 
recently hired a sexual assault forensic nurse to assist the company in the develop-
ment  of  improved  evidence  collection  procedures  on  their  cruises;  we  encourage  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

19 

rest  of  the  industry  to  take  similar  steps,  where  appropriate,  to  ensure  that  their 
onboard medical personnel are adequately trained in proper forensic evidence collec-
tion methods. 

Ensure  that  cruise  lines  are  accountable  to  the  public  to  fully  report  all  incidents 

of sexual assault. 

We applaud U.S. Reps. Matsui, Shays, Poe, and Maloney for recently introducing 
an amendment that would require certain cruise crimes to be publicly disclosed on-
line  by  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  as  well  as  the  cruise  industry.  This  measure  recently 
passed the U.S. House of Representatives as an amendment to a U.S. Coast Guard 
bill, and we encourage the Senate to pass a similar measure. 

Improve  the  screening  and  training  of  crew  members  who  work  with  passengers. 
Many  cruise  lines  serving  U.S.  passengers  employ  citizens  of  a  variety  of  other 
countries  as  crewmembers.  The  screening  of  crewmembers  who  work  with  pas-
sengers  may  not  be  adequate  to  fully  protect  those  on  cruises  against  the  risks 
posed by sexual predators. Because crewmembers have been involved in some recent 
reported  sexual  assaults,  finding  a  solution  to  this  issue  should  be  a  priority  for 
Congress and the industry. 

Encourage  cruise  lines  to  educate  their  passengers,  before  the  ship  departs,  about 
the  onboard  risk  of  sexual  assault  and  what  to  do  if  they,  or  a  friend  or  relative, 
is assaulted during the voyage. 

The cruise industry’s advertising materials foster an image of cruise ships as safe 
and  fun  havens  for  vacationing  Americans  to  relax.  Parents  of  children  who  were 
assaulted on a cruise occasionally tell us that they let their guard down more while 
onboard  than  they  would  have  at  home  (e.g.,  by  allowing  their  child  to  move  freely 
about the ship without adult supervision). Ideally, the entire cruise industry should 
provide passengers, at the outset of a voyage, with safety information that notes the 
specific  risks  to  children  and  youths  while  traveling  on  the  cruise,  gives  safety  tips 
for crewmembers and passengers, and explains what to do if you or a friend or fam-
ily member is assaulted while on a cruise. 
Conclusion 

In  closing,  thank  you  for  your  time  and  for  inviting  me  to  testify.  I  look  forward 
to continuing to work with you, Mr. Chairman, the Ranking Member, and the other 
Members of this Subcommittee on solutions to the important issues discussed at to-
day’s hearing. 

Senator KERRY. We appreciate it. Thank you very much for doing 

so. 

Mr. Dale? 

STATEMENT  OF  TERRY  DALE,  PRESIDENT  AND  CEO,  CRUISE 
LINES INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION (CLIA); ACCOMPANIED 
BY JAMES ALAN FOX, PH.D. 
Mr.  DALE.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the 
Subcommittee.  My  name  is  Terry  Dale,  and  I’m  the  President  and 
Chief  Executive  Officer  of  Cruise  Lines  International  Association, 
headquartered in Fort Lauderdale, Florida. I greatly appreciate the 
opportunity to testify before you today. 

I  have  submitted  a  formal  statement  for  inclusion  in  the  record 
of this hearing, which, in the interest of time, I will briefly summa-
rize. 

CLIA represents 24 cruise lines, whose vessels range in size from 
50  passengers  to  4,000  passengers,  and  16,500  travel  agencies.  In 
the  audience  today  is  Mr.  Bill  Walsh,  President  of  Cruise  Travel 
Outlet, and one of the top producing travel agents for MASSPORT. 
Agents  like  Bill  are  our  industry’s  front-line  partners.  In  fact,  in 
the  past  20  years,  he  has  sold  thousands  of  cruises,  yet  he  has 
never  had  a  single  call  from  a  passenger  claiming  to  be  a  victim 
of a crime. 

This hearing will examine cruise ship safety, which is the cruise 
industry’s  number-one  priority  for  its  passengers  and  crew.  Quite 
simply,  Americans  are  extremely  safe  at  sea  today.  According  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

20 

Coast Guard Admiral Wayne Justice, and I quote, ‘‘There is no se-
rious  evidence  to  suggest  that  there  is  significantly  more,  or  more 
serious,  crimes  affecting  U.S.  nationals  onboard  cruise  ships  than 
indicated by the reporting data,’’ end of quote. 

Why,  then,  have  these  questions  about  safety  been  raised?  I  be-

lieve there are three reasons: 

First,  our  care  and  compassion  in  the  past  toward  these  individ-
uals who have suffered has not always been satisfactory. However, 
we have made great strides to improve our services. 

Second, we are the only vacation industry required by law to im-
mediately  report  any  serious  incident  and  every  allegation  to  Fed-
eral  authorities.  In  this  case,  the  FBI  and  U.S.  Coast  Guard.  This 
reporting is mandatory, not voluntary. 

Third,  when  incidents  have  occurred,  they  typically  receive  far 

more attention than comparable incidents in land-based settings. 

As  you  know,  Mr.  Chairman,  there  have  been  four  House  hear-
ings  on  this  issue,  the  most  recent  in  September  2007.  Since  that 
hearing,  we  have  held  several  all-day  meetings  with  our  working 
group of family members and their representatives to share and ex-
change  ideas  and  recommendations.  Our  cruise  lines  now  use  an 
FBI  DVD  for  enhanced  security  training,  and  offers  instruction  on 
an  initial  response  and  crime-scene  management.  CLIA’s  two  larg-
est  cruise  lines  have  their  security  training  programs  certified  by 
internationally  recognized  security  organizations.  Finally,  our 
member  lines  guest-care  programs  have  trained  more  than  3500 
employees, to date. 

Mr. Chairman, these are just some of the actions we have taken 
since  the  September  hearing.  Also  at  that  hearing  last  fall,  Coast 
Guard Admiral Justice testified, and I quote, ‘‘We see no emerging 
requirement for legislative change regarding the incident reporting 
requirements,’’  end  of  quote.  He  added  that  there  were  no  known 
incidences  of  shipboard  crimes  being  unreported.  Clearly,  the  au-
thorities  would  know  if  they  were  not  receiving  accurate  reports; 
and  I  would  add  that,  in  this  day  and  age  of  cell  phones,  camera 
phones,  and  Internet  access,  the  likelihood  that  a  serious  incident 
would go unnoticed, let alone unreported, is highly unrealistic. 

The House hearings also demonstrated that crime on cruise ships 
is  extremely  rare.  The  FBI  statistic—or,  they  stated  that  207  inci-
dents  had  been  reported  by  CLIA  member  cruise  lines  to  the  Bu-
reau for the 6-month period prior to the hearing, and, according to 
the  subcommittee  hearing  memo,  that  translates  into  fewer  than 
.01 percent of passengers on cruise ships during that period. 

In March of last year, we worked with the FBI and Coast Guard 
to  develop  a  standardized  crime  reporting  protocol  and  continue  to 
work  closely  with  the  FBI,  Coast  Guard,  and  all  Federal  authori-
ties, as well as the International Maritime Organization. 

Based  on  Federal  and  international  regulations,  the  following  is 
strictly  adhered  to.  Anyone  boarding  one  of  our  ships,  and  every 
piece of their luggage, is subject to rigorous screening. Each cruise 
ship has embarkation and debarkation controls, including biometric 
verification  of  all  passengers  and  crew.  All  passengers  and  crew 
lists are electronically submitted to U.S. authorities prior to depar-
ture from or arrival to the United States, and screened against law 
enforcement data bases. Each cruise ship has a highly trained chief 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

21 

security officer and trained security staff to provide safety onboard. 
Each  cruise  line  also  has  security  officers  at  the  corporate  level, 
usually  ex-law  enforcement,  Coast  Guard,  or  military,  in  charge  of 
fleet-wide security and training. 

Based on these facts, it is clear that we provide a safe and secure 
passenger environment. This is part of the reason why independent 
surveys  show  that  95  percent  of  cruise  passengers  are  satisfied 
with  their  cruising  experience,  and  more  than  half  of  our  pas-
sengers  today  are  repeat  customers  who  are  cruising  for  the  sec-
ond, third, fourth, and, many times, even a dozen times. 

In  closing,  Mr.  Chairman,  as  an  industry,  we  deeply  regret  any 
incident  that  occurs  on  our  ships.  We  have  worked  closely  with 
families  and  their  representatives  to  provide  compassionate  care. 
Our  goal  remains  zero  incidents.  This  industry  works  diligently 
every  day  to  achieve  this  goal.  We  have  a  very  good  record  when 
it comes to passenger safety, and we want to keep it that way. Pas-
senger safety is, and always will be, our number-one priority. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Dale follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TERRY DALE, PRESIDENT AND CEO, CRUISE LINES 

INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION (CLIA); ACCOMPANIED BY JAMES ALAN FOX, PH.D. 

Introduction 

My name is Terry Dale. I am President and Chief Executive Officer of the Cruise 
Lines International Association (CLIA), which has its headquarters in Fort Lauder-
dale, Florida. 

My  association  represents  24  cruise  lines,  whose  vessels  range  in  size  from  50 
passengers  to  4,000  passengers.  Our  membership  also  includes  16,500  travel  agen-
cies and more than 100 business partners who provide a vast range of products and 
services  to  the  cruise  industry.  These  businesses  are  located  throughout  the  U.S. 
and create thousands of jobs. 

We  have  representatives  and  letters  from  the  American  Society  of  Travel  Agents 
(ASTA),  National  Business  Travel  Association  (NBTA),  National  Association  of 
Cruise  Only  Agencies  (NACOA)  and  the  National  Association  of  Commissioned 
Travel  Agents.  Each  of  these  organizations  attests  to  peoples’  personal  experiences 
with cruising and their views that it is a very safe experience. 

In  the  audience  today  is  Bill  Walsh,  President  of  Cruise  Travel  Outlet,  who  met 
with staff last week and shares a long affiliation with Massachusetts and the cruise 
industry. 

Travel agents like Bill Walsh are our front line partners. Travel agents are among 
the  very  first  to  hear  if  there  is  a  serious  incident,  or  for  that  matter,  almost  any 
kind of incident aboard a ship. 

Bill  readily  acknowledges  that  the  cruise  industry  has  a  95  percent  satisfaction 
rating.  In  fact,  in  the  20  years  he  has  been  selling  cruises,  he  has  never  received 
a call from a passenger claiming to have experienced a serious crime. 

The purpose of this hearing is to examine cruise ship safety, and specifically ‘‘po-

ing our excellent record for the safety and security of all passengers. 

Why, then, have these questions about safety even been raised? 
I believe there are three principal reasons. 

tential steps for keeping Americans safe at sea.’’ 

This  is  an  excellent  subject,  and  many  ‘‘steps’’  have  already  been  taken.  I  appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  an  update  and  address  some  of  the  misunder-
standings I believe exist. 

I  am  pleased  to  be  on  a  panel  with  Ken  Carver,  a  member  of  CLIA’s  Survivor 
Working  group  and  a  person  I  have  had  an  ongoing  dialogue  regarding  cruise  ship 
security.  I  am  pleased  that  Evelyn  Fortier  of  RAINN  is  also  on  the  panel.  I  have 
great respect for RAINN and the wonderful resource that their association provides 
to victims of sexual assault. I look forward to having a dialogue with RAINN. 

The cruise industry’s number one priority is safety of its passengers and crew. 
Quite simply, Americans are extremely safe at sea today. 
In  many  ways,  well  documented  by  statistics  and  other  evidence,  Americans  are 
much safer in the well protected environment of a cruise ship than they are on land. 
Our industry has no higher priority—no stronger commitment—than to maintain-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

22 

1.  Our  care  and  compassion  in  the  past  toward  those  who  have  suffered  injury 
or  loss  has  not  always  been  satisfactory.  We  have  made  great  strides  over  the 
past  2  years  to  improve  our  procedures,  to  provide  more  support  to  those  who 
have  been  injured  or  families  that  have  been  affected;  and  we  are  committed 
to continuing these efforts. 
2.  We  are  the  only  travel  industry  required  by  law  to  immediately  report  any 
serious  incident  or  even  allegation  to  Federal  authorities;  in  this  case,  the  FBI 
and the U.S. Coast Guard. 
3.  When  unfortunate  incidents  have  occurred  they  typically  receive  far  more 
publicity than comparable incidents in land-based settings. 

There have been four House hearings on this issue, the most recent in September 

2007 and since that hearing: 

• We have held two more two all-day meetings with the working group of family 
members  and  their  representatives  to  share  and  exchange  ideas  and  rec-
ommendations.  These  meetings  have  provided  a  forum  by  which  the  families 
have heard directly from the FBI, the U.S. Coast Guard and the U.S. Attorneys 
Office.  Our  last  meeting  in  Miami  was  held  over  several  days  and  representa-
tives  of  these  agencies  gave  detailed  briefings  and  answered  many  questions. 
The  FBI  also  met  with  our  group  in  November  and  discussed  a  new  security 
training  DVD  that  they  were  developing  expressly  for  use  by  the  cruise  lines. 
Separately  and  during  the  Miami  meeting  the  working  group  also  addressed 
about 50 recommendations that had been put forward by the families.) 

• Our major cruise lines now use the previously mentioned FBI-provided DVD for 
security training. The DVD offers FBI instruction on: initial response to a crime 
scene; securing a crime scene; crime scene photography and evidence collection. 
• Two  of  CLIA’s  largest  cruise  lines  have  their  security  training  programs  cer-
tified  by  Lloyds  Register,  an  internationally  recognized  security  organization 
and a UK government program through Security Industry Authority. 

• This  spring  CLIA  sponsored  the  Family  Assistance  Foundation  symposium  in 
Atlanta, where a panel of survivors shared ideas and experiences with the audi-
ence. 

• Our  member  lines’  guest  care  programs  have  trained  more  than  1000  employ-

ees, bringing the total to date to more than 3000. 

Crime Reporting 

With  respect  to  the  reporting  of  such  incidents,  both  the  FBI  and  the  U.S.  Coast 

Guard have testified that the system is working efficiently. 

Last September, Rear Admiral Wayne Justice, Assistant Commandant of the U.S. 
Coast  Guard,  testified  to  the  House  Subcommittee  on  Coast  Guard  and  Maritime 
Transportation,  and  said:  ‘‘We  see  no  emerging  requirement  for  legislative  change 
regarding the incident reporting requirements.’’ 

He  added  that  there  were  no  known  incidences  of  shipboard  crimes  going  unre-

Clearly, if the authorities were receiving reports from others that had gone unre-
ported  by  the  industry,  the  authorities  would  know  this.  As  an  aside,  in  this  day 
and age of cell phones, camera phones and Wi-Fi cafes, the likelihood that a serious 
incident would go unnoticed, let alone unreported, would be very rare. 

The  House  hearings  also  demonstrated  that  crime  on  cruise  ships  is  extremely 
rare.  Based  on  FBI  reports  from  a  6-month  period,  the  Coast  Guard  Subcommittee 
in  its  September  2007  hearing  memo  noted  that  there  were  fewer  than  point  zero 
1 percent (0.01 percent) of passengers had been involved in a reported incident dur-
ing that time period. 
Safety and Security Measures 

To give a sense of what these requirements mean in practice: 
• Anyone  boarding  one  of  our  ships  is  subject  to  more  rigorous  screening  than  is 

required for airline passengers at most of the world’s airports. 

• Every piece of personal luggage is strictly screened. 
• Each cruise ship has embarkation and debarkation controls including biometric 

ported. 

verification of all passengers and crew. 

• All lists of passengers and crew are electronically submitted to U.S. authorities 
prior to departure from or arrival in the United States and screened against law 
enforcement data bases. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

23 

• Each cruise ship has a qualified security officer and trained security staff whose 
duties  are  solely  to  provide  onboard  security  for  the  passengers  and  crew,  as 
well  as  for  the  vessel  itself.  These  security  officers  are  experienced  highly- 
trained professionals. 

• Each  cruise  line  also  has  supervisory  security  officers  at  the  corporate  level, 
usually  ex-law  enforcement,  Coast  Guard  or  military,  in  charge  of  managing 
fleet wide security and training of the vessel security officers. 

• Every  crew  member  is  required  and  trained  to  look  out  for  the  security  of  all 

• In addition, all major cruise lines now have trained staff to counsel and support 

families and individuals during emergency situations. 

passengers. 

Passenger Satisfaction 

Independent surveys show that the vast majority of cruise passengers, 95 percent, 
say  they  are  very  satisfied  with  their  cruising  experience.  Nearly  50  percent  say 
they  are  extremely  satisfied.  And  more  than  half  of  all  passengers  are  repeats— 
cruising for the second or third or fourth time. 

I  submit  that  this  would  not  be  the  case  if  safety  or  security  were  perceived  as 
a  serious  problem.  As  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  has  testified,  crimes  onboard  cruise 
ships are extremely rare. 

I  hope  this  background  is  helpful  in  assessing  the  level  of  safety  and  security  for 
cruise ship passengers, despite the reports you may have heard of rare criminal ac-
tivity,  including  sexual  assaults,  that  have  been  widely  reported,  completely  inves-
tigated, and yet sometimes exaggerated. 

As  an  industry  and  as  individuals,  we  deeply  regret  any  such  incident,  and  that 
in some cases, we have not provided sufficient support to the individuals or families 
affected. We have acknowledged this and over the past 2 years have worked closely 
with those families and their representatives and have welcomed their recommenda-
tions  for  improving  our  passenger  services.  Each  of  our  large  cruise  ships  now  has 
specialized counselors. 

Again  the  safety  and  security  of  our  passengers  is,  has  to  be,  and  always  will  be 

our highest priority. We are constantly reviewing and improving our procedures. 

Our position is that incident or crime of any kind is one too many. 

Misleading Statistics 

Regrettably,  assertions  are  sometimes  made  and  unofficial  statistics  are  some-
times quoted that bear no relation to any known reality. I would like to try to clarify 
this point. 

For  example,  at  the  September  2007  hearing  of  the  House  Subcommittee,  a  wit-
ness stated that the rate of ship-board sexual assaults is twice the rate of those oc-
curring on shore. The two figures serving as the basis for that statement, however, 
were  shipboard  sexual  assaults  and  land-based  forcible  rapes.  The  difference  be-
tween  those  two  categories  is  significant  because  the  definition  of  ‘‘sexual  assault’’ 
includes  behaviors  such  as  the  intentional  touching  of  certain  body  parts  through 
clothing. In addition, the FBI has confirmed that it does not even calculate the rate 
of  land-based  sexual  assaults.  Despite  this  key  fact,  the  critics  have  continued  to 
cite  the  FBI’s  statistics  for  ‘‘forcible  rapes’’  that  occur  on  land,  mischaracterizing 
them  as  the  (non-existent)  land-based  sexual  assault  rate,  and  misleadingly  com-
paring  them  to  the  more  broadly-defined  ‘‘sexual  assault  rate’’  on  ships.  This  is  the 
basis  for  the  false  claim  that  a  person  is  twice  as  likely  to  suffer  a  sexual  assault 
onboard  a  ship  as  on  land.  We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  clarify  the  record  on 
this important point. 
Conclusion 

In closing, let me say thank you again for conducting this hearing. We believe the 
record  is  clear—cruising  is  a  very  safe  way  to  vacation,  and  our  customer  satisfac-
tion  levels,  which  are  among  the  highest  for  any  industry,  would  verify  this  fact— 
especially when placed along side the Federal data. 

Our  industry,  as  verified  in  previous  testimony  before  the  House  of  Representa-
tives,  is  reporting  all  incidents—even  allegations—and  this  reporting  system  is 
working well. 

Our  goal  remains  zero  incidents  and  this  industry  works  diligently  every  day  to 
reach  this  goal.  We  have  a  very  good  record  when  it  comes  to  passenger  safety  but 
we can always try and do more. 

Passenger Safety is, AND WILL ALWAYS BE, our Number One priority. 
Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

24 

Additional  Cruise  Statistics  for  States  Represented  by  Members  of  the 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine 
Infrastructure, Safety, and Security 

• Alaska embarked over 178,000 passengers in 2006. 
• Almost 7,000 of Alaska’s residents traveled on a cruise vacation in 2006. 

Alaska 

• The Port of New Orleans embarked 72,000 cruise passengers in 2006. 
• More than 85,000 of Louisiana’s residents traveled on a cruise vacation in 2006. 

Louisiana 

• Ports in Maine embarked over 130,000 passengers in 2006. 
• Over 16,000 of Maine’s residents traveled on a cruise vacation in 2006. 

Maine 

Massachusetts 

• Operating  on  a  seasonal  schedule  from  April  to  November,  Cruiseport  Boston 
• Over 500,000 of Massachusetts’ residents traveled on a cruise vacation in 2006. 

embarked over 62,000 passengers in 2006. 

Mississippi 

• More  than  30,000  of  Mississippi’s  residents  traveled  on  a  cruise  vacation  in 

2006. 

• Cape Liberty embarked over 160,000 cruise passengers in 2006. 
• Almost 322,000 of New Jersey’s residents went on a cruise vacation in 2006. 

New Jersey 

• Almost 60,000 of Oregon’s residents traveled on a cruise vacation in 2006. 

Oregon 

South Carolina 

• Operating on a seasonal schedule from September–June, the Port of Charleston 
• Almost  110,000  of  South  Carolina’s  residents  traveled  on  a  cruise  vacation  in 

embarked over 105,000 cruise passengers in 2006. 

2006. 

• The Port of Galveston embarked over 617,000 passengers in 2006. 
• Almost 730,000 of Texas’ residents traveled on a cruise vacation in 2006. 

Texas 

• The Port of Seattle embarked over 370,000 cruise passengers in 2006. 
• Over  180,000  of  Washington’s  residents  traveled  on  a  cruise  vacation  in  2006. 

Washington 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

25 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
A
I
L
C
9
1
6

26 

CRUISE LINES INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION, INC. 

Executive Partners 
1 Priority Bicidal, LLC 
Aker Yards 
Amadeus North America, Inc. 
American Association of Port Authorities 

(AAPA) 

American Bureau of Shipping 
American Guard Services, Inc. 
Bahamas Maritime Authority 
Bellcomb Technologies 
Bellegrove Medical Supply 
The Berkely Group 
BMT Group 
Board of Commissioners of the Port of 

New Orleans 

(BREA) 

Business Research & Economic Advisors 

Chamber of Commerce and Industry of 

South Corsica (CCIACS) 

Cruise Norfolk 
Cruise Saint Lawrence 
The Coca-Cola Company 
Ege Ports/Kusadasi Cruise Port 
European Cruise Council 
Fidelio Cruise Software, Inc. 
Fincantieri-Cantieri Navali Italiani S.p.A 
Florida-Caribbean Cruise Association 
Flamenco Marina 
Fowler White Burnett, P.A. 
Freeport Harbour Company 
Fujifilm USA, Inc. 
Gard 
Germanischer Lloyd AG 
Hayden, Miliken, Boeringer & Irick PA 
Halifax Port Authority 
Hamilton, Miller & Birthisel, LLP 
Hamworthy Water Systems, LTD 
Hill, Betts & Nash, LLP 
Hydroxyl Systems, Inc. 
The Image Group 
International Paint, LLC 
Jacksonville Port Authority 
Jotun Paint, Inc. 
Kaye, Rose & Partners, LLC 
The Kezia Group 
Lloyd’s Register North America, Inc. 
Maine Port Authority 
Maritime Telecommunications Network/ 

SeaMobile Enterprises 

Marseille-Provence Cruise Club 
Marsh, Ltd. 
Maryland Port Administration 
Mase & Lara. P.A. 
Massachusetts Port Authority 
McAlpin Conroy, P.A. 
McIntosh, Sawran, Peltz & Cartaya, P.A. 
McRoberts Maritime Security, Inc. 
MEIKO Marine 
Metro Cruise Services, LLC 
MEYER WERFT GmbH 
MHG Services, Inc. 
Milliken Carpet 
Montreal Port Authority 
NYCruise 
On-Board Movies 
Passenger Shipping Association (PSA) 
Port Canaveral 
Port Everglades 
Port of Galveston 
Port of Houston Authority 
The Port of Los Angeles 
Port Miami 
Port of Palm Beach 
Port of San Diego 
Port of San Francisco 
Port of Seattle 
Port of Shanghai 
Port of Saint John 
Ports America, Inc. 
Quebec Port Authority 
RINA S.P.A. 
Royal Marine insurance Group/RMIG 
Seatrade Cruise Shipping Convention/ 

CMP Princeton, Inc. 

Steamship Insurance Management 

Services Limited (SIMSL) 

Tampa Port Authority 
The Port of Philadelphia and Camden, a 

Department of DRPA of PA & NJ 

Throdon Bearings, Inc. 
UK P&I Club 
Unisource Worldwide, Inc. 
Universal Marine Medical Supply 
Vickers Oils 
Wartsila 
Wireless Maritime Services, LLP 
World Cruise Industry Review 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

27 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
A
I
L
C
9
1
6

28 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
A
I
L
C
9
1
6

29 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
A
I
L
C
9
1
6

30 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
5
A
I
L
C
9
1
6

31 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
6
A
I
L
C
9
1
6

32 

Senator KERRY. Thank you, Mr. Dale, appreciate it. 
Dr. Klein? 

STATEMENT OF ROSS A. KLEIN, PH.D., PROFESSOR OF SOCIAL 
WORK,  MEMORIAL  UNIVERSITY  OF  NEWFOUNDLAND,  ST. 
JOHN’S COLLEGE 
Dr.  KLEIN.  Let  me  first  thank  the  Committee  for  holding  these 

hearings and for giving me the opportunity to speak. 

I sincerely believe that crimes against Americans on cruise ships 
is  a  problem  that  needs  to  be  addressed,  and  encourage  the  Com-
mittee to seriously consider means for protecting Americans choos-
ing cruise vacations on foreign-flagged cruise ships operating out of 
U.S. ports and around the world. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
7
A
I
L
C
9
1
6

33 

There is little question that sexual assaults and other crimes are 
a problem on the cruise ships, as they are elsewhere. However, the 
problem  is  perhaps  more  severe  on  a  cruise  ship.  Given  the  cruise 
industry’s  claim  that  a  cruise  is  the  safest  form  of  commercial 
transportation,  passengers  go  onboard  unaware  of  the  risks  they 
face.  They  allow  the  children  to  roam  without  supervision,  and 
adults  fail  to  take  precautions  they  take  on  land.  The  situation  is 
made worse by the relaxed attitude that comes with being on vaca-
tion,  lowered  defenses  that  come  with  consumption  of  alcohol,  and 
an  unnatural  sense  of  safety,  given  the  uninhibited  sociality  that 
comes with being on a cruise. 

In 1999, the cruise industry claimed that the number of reported 
shore-side  aggravated  sexual  assaults  was  at  least  20  to  50  times 
greater than the total number of all reported shipboard assaults of 
any type. Carnival Cruise Lines had just admitted in the discovery 
phase  of  a  lawsuit  involving  an  alleged  rape  that  it  had  received 
108  complaints  of  sexual  assaults  involving  crew  members  in  5 
years.  Royal  Caribbean  said  it  had  received  58  complaints  in  the 
same time period. 

In  response  to  these  disclosures,  four  cruise  corporations,  rep-
resenting  more  than  75  percent  of  the  industry,  signed  a  letter  of 
commitment  in  July  1999  pledging  a  zero-tolerance  policy  for 
crimes  committed  onboard  cruise  ships,  and  established  an  indus-
try  standard  requiring  allegations  of  onboard  crime  be  reported  to 
the appropriate law enforcement authorities. For vessels calling on 
U.S. ports or crime involving U.S. citizens, this meant the FBI. 

Interestingly,  cruise  lines  were  already  expected  to  report  to  the 
U.S. Coast Guard all crimes involving U.S. citizens on cruise ships, 
but  it  isn’t  clear  that  the  information  was  being  reported  or  being 
sought. 

Just 7 years later, based on statistics for 2003 through 2005, the 
cruise  line—the  cruise  industry  testified  to  a  Subcommittee  of  the 
House  of  Representatives  that  the  rate  of  sexual  assault  on  cruise 
ships was, at worst, half that found in the United States, generally. 
This  suggests  that  it  was  either  as  much  as  a  25-fold  increase  in 
sexual assaults between 1999 and 2003 or that the claims made in 
1999 were false and unfounded. 

The  industry’s  2006  testimony  was  questioned,  a  year  later, 
through analysis of data presented in a Los Angeles Times article, 
which showed the rate of sexual assaults was actually almost twice 
that found in the U.S. The industry responded; they said that what 
they meant in their Congressional testimony was forcible rape, not 
sexual assaults. 

One  independent  set  of  statistics  for  rate  of  sexual  assault  on 
cruise ships is raw data provided by Royal Caribbean International 
in discovery in a lawsuit in Florida. The data covers all sex-related 
incidents  in  a  3-year  period  from  2003  through  2005.  It  reveals 
that the rate of sexual assault on cruise ships compared to the rate 
of  forcible  rape  in  the  United  States  is  not  half,  but  almost  twice 
the  U.S.  rate.  This  rate  is  validated  by  data  presented  by  the  FBI 
in Congressional hearings in September 2007. It indicates a rate of 
sexual assault of 56.9 per 100,000 population. 

It  isn’t  only  sexual  assaults  that  are  a  problem.  The  first  hear-
ings in the House of Representatives, in December 2005, were con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

34 

cerned with a cluster of cases where a passenger disappeared from 
a  cruise  ship.  The  issue  was  raised  in  June  2005  in  a  Business 
Journal  of  Jacksonville  article  written  by  Mary  Moewe.  She  had 
found that, since 2000, at least 12 cruise ship passengers had gone 
overboard  or  disappeared  in  11  cases.  Two  passengers  were  res-
cued, two were confirmed dead, and eight passengers are still miss-
ing. These eight remain a mystery. 

Unbeknownst  to  Moewe,  the  numbers  were  actually  much  high-
er.  Because  no  cruise  line  kept  track  of  persons  going  overboard, 
and  no  Federal  agency  had  responsibility  for  monitoring  these 
events,  she  was  left  to  rely  on  information  that  was  readily  avail-
able. The most comprehensive list of persons going overboard from 
cruise  ships  at  the  time  was  online  at  CruiseJunkie.com.  The  site 
reports  47  incidents  during  the  same  time  period  covered  by 
Moewe’s article. 

Another issue raised in the March 2006 hearing was robbery and 
theft.  The  industry  claimed  that,  then,  there  was  only  four  known 
robberies industrywide in the 3-year period 2003–2005. That meant 
an  annual  rate  of  1.33.  However,  the  FBI  reported,  in  2007,  an 
annualized rate of 135. That yields a rate of 44.7 per 100,000. This 
is  90  times  greater  than  what  the  industry  admitted  to  in  its 
March 2006 testimony. 

With this said, and in this context, I suggest three things: 
There needs to be a clear definition of crimes reportable by cruise 
ships,  and  there  should  be  mandatory  reporting,  as  there  is  in 
every  jurisdiction  in  the  U.S.,  with  regard  to  child  sexual  abuse. 
This also means there should be clear and meaningful penalties for 
not reporting. 

A  second  set  of  recommendations  emerges  from  1999  reports  by 
consultants  hired  by  Royal  Caribbean  Cruises,  Limited.  Many  of 
the recommendations are spot on, but have not been implemented, 
or  have  been  implemented  in  a  haphazard  and  inconsistent  man-
ner.  Some  that  still  need  better  implementation  include  standard-
izing the response to incidents of crime across all ships and across 
all  brands;  advocates  and  counselors  onboard  who  are  available  to 
support  and  care  for  victims;  a  hotline  reporting  system  off-ship 
that may be used by those who, not surprisingly, feel unsafe about 
reporting  an  incident  onboard;  better  surveillance  and  greater  use 
of  CCTV  cameras,  in  key  areas  of  the  ship,  which  are  regularly 
monitored,  and  tapes  stored  for  a  reasonable  period,  at  least  as 
long  as  the  period  stipulated  in  the  passenger  contract  in  which  a 
passenger  may  launch  a  lawsuit;  there  should  also  be  better  edu-
cation of crew and passengers about safety, security, and about the 
limited  nature  of  permitted  interactions  between  passengers  and 
crew;  and,  of  key  importance,  effecting  a  meaningful  and  signifi-
cant  change  in  shipboard  culture  and  tolerance  of  misdeeds.  Many 
crimes  occur  because  perpetrators  know  they  will  not  be  caught; 
and, if caught, they will not be punished. 

The  third—my  third  point  is  that  many  recommendations  are 
contained in the ICV’s ten-point program. Given that their insights 
are  based  on  direct  experience,  and  their  recommendations  are  in-
formed by the pain and suffering they have endured, they can bet-
ter  express  than  I  many  of  the  things  the  industry  could  and 
should be doing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

35 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Klein follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROSS A. KLEIN, PH.D., PROFESSOR OF SOCIAL WORK, 

MEMORIAL UNIVERSITY OF NEWFOUNDLAND, ST. JOHN’S COLLEGE 

A  not  uncommon  problem  is  the  allegation  of  sexual  assault  on  passengers  by 
crewmembers,  particularly  cabin,  table  or  bar  stewards.  Members  must  have  rig-
orous  policies  prohibiting  socializing  between  crew  and  passengers.  Any  crew-
member,  found  in  a  passenger  area  where  he  should  not  be,  should  be  subject  to 
dismissal for the first offense. A cruise operator must take reasonable care to inves-
tigate  a  crewmember’s  background  before  hiring  him.  There  is  at  present  a  split  of 
authority  between  U.S.  courts  as  to  whether  cruise  operators  are  strictly  liable  for 
assaults by crew or whether operators are only liable if they are negligent in hiring 
or supervising crew members. The majority of the circuits have decided that opera-
tors are only liable for negligence. (A Guide to P&I Cover, The Standard, 2007) 

The  contrast  is  stark.  The  cruise  industry’s  insurance  carrier  states  that  sexual 
assault  is  a  not  uncommon  problem,  but  the  industry  itself  claims  a  cruise  to  be 
the  safest  form  of  commercial  transportation.  The  industry’s  claim  is  grand—one 
which most passengers take at face value. 

The  Morgans  (a  pseudonym)  took  a  cruise  in  2005,  never  thinking  twice  about  it 
being  unsafe  for  their  8  year  old  middle  daughter  to  go  back  to  the  family’s  cabin 
on her own. Along the way the youngster became confused and asked a crewmember 
in  uniform  for  assistance.  Instead  of  helping,  the  male  (wearing  a  cruise  line  name 
plate) allegedly took the girl to a dark end of a corridor where there were no surveil-
lance cameras and he masturbated in front of her. It was subsequently learned that 
the  crewmember  had  previously  worked  for  a  different  cruise  line  that  had  ‘‘do  not 
rehire’’  marked  on  his  personnel  file.  But  he  passed  background  checks  and  was 
hired  by  the  current  cruise  line.  It  seems  the  cruise  line  also  failed  to  notice  that 
the name under which the man had applied for employment was different than the 
name on his passport. 

Laurie  Dishman  also  believed  cruises  were  safe.  She  and  her  best  friend  in  Feb-
ruary 2006 chose a cruise to the Mexican Riviera to celebrate thirty years of friend-
ship and to celebrate Laurie’s birthday. But things quickly turned from good to bad 
when  a  security  guard  raped  Laurie  on  day  two  of  the  cruise.  The  security  guard, 
she  learned  later,  was  actually  a  janitor  ‘‘filling  in’’  for  security  in  lounges  to  check 
IDs because there were not enough security personnel on board. 

The  cruise  industry  would  prefer  these  experiences  not  be  broadcast:  when  they 
are  made  public  they  are  characterized  as  isolated  exceptions  or  as  statistically  in-
significant. But the fact is that sexual assaults have been recognized as an ongoing 
problem on cruise ships for decades. 
Scope of the Problem 

‘‘Cruise  ships  are  as  safe  an  environment  as  you  can  find,’’  was  what  a  Carnival 
Cruise  Lines  spokesperson  said  during  a  court  case  involving  a  fourteen  year  old 
child  who  was  raped  in  1989  on  Carnival’s  Carnivale.  Rape,  he  said,  ‘‘happens  in 
houses, offices, hotels, and parking lots’’ (Adams 1990:1). 

In  this  child’s  case,  the  rape  occurred  onboard  in  a  cleaning  closet.  As  the  ship 
was  returning  to  Miami  from  the  Bahamas  she  went  to  the  family’s  cabin  (while 
other family members remained on deck) at 5:30 A.M. to check on a suitcase. While 
in  the  elevator,  a  male  crewmember—a  cleaner  onboard  the  ship—kissed  and 
fondled  her.  He  then  dragged  her  from  the  elevator  to  a  cleaning  closet  and  raped 
her  on  the  floor.  The  girl  picked  the  thirty-two  year  old  crewman,  a  Colombian  na-
tional  and  father  of  two,  out  of  a  line  up.  In  February  1990,  he  was  found  guilty 
of  the  charges  and  sentenced  to  thirty  years  in  prison.  The  case  received  consider-
able  attention  because  it  was  the  first  time  a  crewmember  on  a  foreign-flagged 
cruise  ship  had  been  successfully  prosecuted.  The  assault  had  occurred  while  the 
ship was within U.S. territorial waters (Adams 1990: 1). 

Sexual assaults on cruise ships first gained the national media’s interest in 1999. 
One  peak  was  in  July  1999  when  Carnival  Cruise  Lines  disclosed  in  the  discovery 
phase  of  a  lawsuit  involving  an  alleged  rape  that  it  had  received  108  complaints  of 
sexual  assaults  involving  crewmembers  in  the  5-year  period  ending  August  1998. 
Royal  Caribbean  said  it  had  had  fifty-eight  reported  sexual  assaults  on  its  ships 
during the same 5-year period. 

Several  months  earlier  an  investigative  journalist  with  the  New  York  Times, 
Douglas  Frantz,  published  an  article  entitled  ‘‘On  Cruise  Ships,  Silence  Shrouds 
Crimes’’ where he describes an alarming range of passenger claims of sexual assault 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

36 

and  discusses  how  they  were  handled  by  the  cruise  lines.  Based  on  examination  of 
court  records  and  on  interviews  with  cruise  line  employees,  law  enforcement  offi-
cials, and passengers and their lawyers, Frantz describes 

. . . a pattern of cover-ups that often began as soon as the crime was reported 
at sea, in international waters where the only police are the ship’s security offi-
cers. Accused crewmembers are sometimes put ashore at the next port, with air-
fare  to  their  home  country.  Industry  lawyers  are  flown  to  the  ship  to  question 
the accusers; and aboard ships flowing with liquor, counterclaims of consensual 
sex are common. The cruise lines aggressively contest lawsuits and insist on se-
crecy as a condition of settling. (Frantz 1998) 

He cites a former chief of security for Carnival Cruise Lines as saying: 

You don’t notify the FBI. You don’t notify anybody. You start giving the victims 
bribes, upgrading their cabins, giving them champagne and trying to ease them 
off  the  ship  until  the  legal  department  can  take  over.  Even  when  I  knew  there 
was  a  crime,  I  was  supposed  to  go  in  there  and  do  everything  in  the  world  to 
get Carnival to look innocent. (Frantz 1998) 

Once a crime is reported, there are problems with preserving evidence. Passenger 
cabins are routinely cleaned twice a day, so much evidence is destroyed very quickly 
and  there  is  often  a  delay  between  an  attack  and  landing  at  a  U.S.  port.  Rape  ex-
perts suggest that cases reported within seventy-two hours provide the best forensic 
evidence  but  this  time-frame  is  difficult  for  attacks  on  a  cruise  ship.  In  addition, 
many victims are likely to delay making a report as long as they are aboard a ship 
because of fear of reprisal and because there is no independent investigator or rape- 
treatment  centre.  Sadly,  rapes  on  cruise  ships  may  often  not  be  reported  until  it  is 
too late for criminal investigation. 

In those cases where a sexual assault is reported in a timely manner, victims and 
prosecutors  were  traditionally  faced  with  a  common  practice  among  cruise  lines  to 
immediately  send  the  accused  back  home,  purportedly  because  they  have  violated 
company policies that prohibit fraternizing between passengers and crew. Reporters 
for  the  Miami  New  Times  found  that  in  each  of  five  lawsuits  against  Carnival 
Cruise Line they reviewed, the employee was swept out of the country immediately 
after  the  ship  arrived  in  port.  In  one  case  the  employee  was  later  rehired  by  the 
company  and  was  subsequently  served  with  a  summons  while  at  the  dock  in  Los 
Angeles.  Carnival’s  lawyers  successfully  argued  the  Indian  citizen  couldn’t  be  sued 
in  U.S.  courts  because  American  laws  did  not  apply  to  him:  not  only  is  he  a  for-
eigner, but the alleged crime took place in Barbados on a ship registered in Panama. 
The passenger’s suit against Carnival Cruise Lines was settled out of court (Korten 
2000). 
Early Attempts to Address the Problem 

Some  cruise  lines  (if  not  all)  undertook  initiatives  to  address  the  problem  of  sex-
ual assaults and other crimes, though this was mostly done out of the public’s sight. 
Royal  Caribbean,  for  one,  received  reports  in  May/June  1999  from  two  consultants 
charged  with  making  recommendations  for  preventing  sexual  harassment  and  as-
sault. The problem was obvious. As one report states, ‘‘. . . improper activity occurs 
frequently  aboard  cruise  ships,  but  goes  unreported  and/or  unpunished’’  (Krohne 
1999:  2).  The  other  report  acknowledged  that  ‘‘crew  members  generally  understand 
that  if  they  commit  an  offence  and  are  caught  they  are  most  likely  going  to  lose 
their  job  and  be  returned  home,  but  not  spend  time  in  jail’’  (Greenwood,  1999:  4). 
The reports make a range of recommendations, including: increased video surveil-
lance  of  high  risk  areas  (including  the  disco  bar  and  dance  area,  main  service  cor-
ridors  on  crew  decks  and  key  intersections  on  passenger  decks,  and  youth  activity 
areas);  cameras  already  in  place  be  monitored  periodically,  at  least  on  a  random 
basis,  and  be  recorded  at  all  times;  an  increase  in  the  number  of  security  staff  by 
two  per  ship;  and  increased  training  and  education  of  staff  and  crew  members.  In 
addition  they  recommended  that  responses  to  sexual  harassment  and  assault  be 
standardized  across  brands  and  ships,  that  training  for  medical  personnel  include 
an interview protocol for sexual assault incidents, that a staff member be identified 
and  assigned  responsibility  to  serve  as  an  advocate  for  the  target  of  sexual  harass-
ment or assault, that a shore side hotline be established to receive telephone reports 
of wrongdoing and that investigations be consistent and evenly handled. Given their 
assumption  that  cruise  passengers  were  unaware  of  the  prohibition  between  crew 
and guest social interactions (and that passengers often, unintentionally, put a crew 
member in an uncomfortable position by engaging him or her socially), they also rec-
ommended  better  educating  passengers  and  better  signage  onboard  demarcating 
areas  that  are  ‘‘off  limits’’  to  passengers.  The  recommendations  are  great,  but  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

37 

degree  to  which  they  were  embraced  and  implemented  is  questionable.  Many  are 
still being debated and discussed; they are not found in general practice. 

The consultants also identified cultural challenges to reducing sexual harassment 
and  assault.  For  example,  senior  officers  and  management  need  to  break  from  the 
traditionally hierarchical and militaristic structure of a ship and instead treat their 
crew and staff members fairly and respectfully. They need to reinforce the need for 
staff and crew members to treat each other and passengers respectfully. If they wish 
to  prevent  sexual  harassment  and  abuse  then  they  must  have  zero  tolerance  for 
both, no matter the rank or position of the offender. 

Diverse  cultural  perceptions  of  sexual  harassment  and  conduct  among  a  ship’s 
crew  present  another  challenge.  There  is  a  diverse  population  drawn  from  around 
the  world,  and  in  many  of  these  cultures  women,  women’s  rights  and  sexuality  are 
seen  quite  differently  than  they  are  by  most  North  Americans.  These  differences 
need  to  be  addressed  through  better  training  and  more  effective  oversight  and  su-
pervision. 
Managing Perceptions 

Rather  than  address  the  problem  head-on,  the  cruise  industry  appears  to  be  fo-
cused  on  managing  public  perceptions.  In  the  midst  of  the  heightened  media  cov-
erage and interest, four cruise corporations (Carnival Corporation, Royal Caribbean 
Cruises  Limited,  Crystal  Cruises,  and  Princess  Cruises)  representing  more  than  75 
percent  of  the  industry  signed  a  letter  of  commitment  in  July  1999.  Issued  under 
the auspices of the International Council of Cruise Lines, they pledged a ‘‘zero toler-
ance policy’’ for crimes committed onboard ships and established an industry stand-
ard  requiring  allegations  of  onboard  crime  be  reported  to  the  appropriate  law  en-
forcement authorities. For vessels calling on U.S. ports, or crime involving U.S. citi-
zens, this meant the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI). 

Interestingly, cruise lines were already expected to report to the U.S. Coast Guard 
all crimes involving U.S. citizens on cruise ships but it isn’t clear that the informa-
tion  was  being  reported  or  sought.  U.S.  authority  in  these  cases  extends  from  the 
special  maritime  and  territorial  jurisdiction  of  the  United  States  (U.S.C.  18  CFR). 
Under U.S. Code, the government can exert authority over U.S. territorial seas, any 
place  outside  the  jurisdiction  of  a  nation  with  respect  to  an  offence  against  a  U.S. 
national, and a foreign-flag vessel during a voyage to or from the U.S. where an of-
fence is committed against a U.S. national. 

The cruise industry announced its zero tolerance for crime policy with a press re-
lease.  It  reassured  passengers  of  background  checks  on  prospective  employees,  that 
crew members violating rules against fraternization with guests would be dismissed, 
that  there  were  highly  trained  security  personnel  on  every  vessel,  and  that  there 
were  established  procedures  to  investigate,  report  and  refer  incidents  of  onboard 
crime  to  appropriate  law  enforcement  authorities.  The  press  release  told  American 
passengers  that  they  were  protected  by  U.S.  laws,  that  cruise  lines  were  subject  to 
civil  liabilities  in  U.S.  courts,  and  that  they  were  safer  on  a  cruise  ship  than  in 
urban or rural America. But it didn’t appear to result in greater reporting of crimes. 
Minimizing the Problem 

The  cruise  industry  has  become  adept  at  minimizing  the  problem.  In  1999  it 
claimed  that  the  number  of  reported  shore  side  aggravated  sexual  assaults  was  at 
least  twenty  to  fifty  times  greater  than  the  total  number  of  all  reported  shipboard 
assaults  of  any  type.  Just  7  years  later,  based  on  statistics  for  2003  through  2005, 
they  testified  to  a  subcommittee  of  the  House  of  Representatives  that  the  rate  of 
sexual  assault  on  cruise  ships  was  at  worst  half  that  found  in  the  U.S.  generally 
(see  Fox,  2006).  This  suggests  that  there  was  either  as  much  as  a  twenty-five-fold 
increase in sexual assaults between 1999 and 2003 or that the claims made in 1999 
were false and unfounded. 

The  industry’s  2006  testimony  was  questioned  a  year  later  through  analysis  of 
data presented in a Los Angeles Times article (see Yoshino, 2007) which showed the 
rate  of  sexual  assault  was  actually  almost  twice  that  found  in  the  U.S.  (see  Klein, 
2007).  The  industry  responded  privately—they  clarified  that  what  they  meant  in 
their  Congressional  testimony  was  forcible  rape,  not  sexual  assaults.  They  had 
taken the U.S. rate for forcible rape and labeled them sexual assaults. The integrity 
of their own data is unclear (e.g., what definitions were used to include/exclude inci-
dents) given that it has not been available for independent analysis and verification. 
Most  recently,  the  cruise  industry  has  attempted  another  method  for  minimiza-
tion.  Rather  than  use  a  standardized  rate  to  reflect  incidence  of  sexual  assaults, 
they now claim ‘‘. . . there is less than a.01 percent chance that a cruise passenger 
will  become  the  victim  of  an  alleged  crime  on  a  cruise  vacation’’  (Dale,  2007)  They 
shifted  from  a  rate  based  on  the  daily  population  on  cruise  ships  (which  is  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

38 

sistent with the way rates for crime are computed by the FBI) to a probability based 
on  the  total  number  of  cruise  ship  passengers  in  a  year.  Their  new  representation 
translates to 10 incidents of crime per 100,000 population. If we use this exact same 
method to compute the incidence of forcible rape in the state of California (i.e., add 
together the number of state residents and the number of tourist visitors in a year) 
it yields a rate of 0.0025 percent, well below the industry’s rate of 0.01 percent. But 
the  comparison  needs  to  be  treated  with  caution  given  that  the  method  by  which 
it  is  computed  is  not  conventionally  accepted  as  a  means  for  reflecting  crime  rates. 
Shifting definitions is another method used for minimizing the incidence of sexual 
assaults.  As  already  mentioned,  the  cruise  industry  meant  ‘‘forcible  rapes’’  when 
they used the label ‘‘sexual assaults’’ in their 2006 testimony before a House of Rep-
resentatives Subcommittee. The difference between the two terms is not trivial. The 
rate  of  forcible  rape  excludes  many  crimes  that  fall  under  the  accepted  definition 
for sexual assault, including child sexual abuse and exploitation for sexual purposes, 
unwanted  sexual  contact,  and  unwanted  sexual  acts.  The  definition  of  sexual  as-
sault,  as  it  well  should  be,  is  broad  and  includes  acts  against  children,  men,  and 
women and which involve unwanted sexual touch, unwanted sexual activity (includ-
ing but not limited to forcible rape) and sexual exploitation. 
Getting a Grip on the Size of the Problem 

There  is  only  one  independent  set  of  statistics  for  the  rate  of  sexual  assault  on 
cruise  ships.  These  are  based  on  raw  data  provided  by  Royal  Caribbean  Inter-
national  in  discovery  in  a  lawsuit  in  Florida.  The  data  covers  all  sex  related  inci-
dents  in  a  3-year  period  from  2003  through  2005,  though  based  on  the  wording  of 
the  discovery  request  the  data  likely  under-represents  incidents  involving  two  crew 
members. Table 1 shows that data broken down by ship. 

As  may  be  seen  in  Table  1,  the  rate  of  sexual  assault  on  cruise  ships,  compared 
to  the  rate  of  forcible  rape  in  the  US,  is  not  half  but  almost  twice  the  U.S.  rate. 
This  rate  is  validated  by  data  presented  by  the  FBI  in  Congressional  hearings  in 
September 2007 and summarized in Table 2. The table shows an industry-wide (i.e., 
members of CLIA) rate of sexual assault of 56.9 per 100,000. 

Table 1.—RCI ‘‘Reported Sex Related Incidents’’ 2003–2005 

Number of Reported Incidents and Annualized Rate per 100,000 by Ship 

Ship 

Inappropriate 

Touch 

Adventure (Double occ: 3,114) 
Onboard pop=4,600 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Brilliance (Double occ: 2,110) 
Onboard pop=3,100 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Empress (Double occ: 1,600) 
Onboard pop=2,400 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Enchantment (Double occ: 

1,950) 

Onboard pop=2,900 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Explorer (Double occ: 3,114) 
Onboard pop=4,600 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Grandeur (Double occ: 1,950) 
Onboard pop=2,900 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Jewel (Double occ: 2,112) 
Onboard pop=3,100 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Legend (Double occ: 1,804) 
Onboard pop=2,700 | 
Incidence/100,000 

0 

2 

2 

1 

2 

1 

1 

2 

Sexual 

Harassment 

(SH) 

Sexual 
Assault 

(SA) 

SH+SA 
(annual 

per/100,000) 

Crew 

— 

Crew 

Guest 

— 

Guest 

Crew 

— 

Guest 

3 

5 

57.97 

21.74 

36.23 

6 

7 

139.79 

64.52 

75.27 

7 

8 

208.33 

97.22 

111.11 

4 

4 

91.94 

45.97 

13 

45.97 

11 

173.91 

94.20 

79.71 

2 

3 

57.47 

22.99 

34.48 

1 

10.75 

2 

0 

0.0 

4 

24.69 

49.38 

10.75 

74.07 

0 

2 

2 

1 

3 

0 

0 

3 

3 

2 

2 

2 

3 

2 

0 

2 

3 

10 

10 

5 

16 

3 

2 

3 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

39 

Table 1.—RCI ‘‘Reported Sex Related Incidents’’ 2003–2005—Continued 

Number of Reported Incidents and Annualized Rate per 100,000 by Ship 

Ship 

Inappropriate 

Touch 

Sexual 

Harassment 

(SH) 

Sexual 
Assault 

(SA) 

SH+SA 
(annual 

per/100,000) 

Crew 

— 

Crew 

Guest 

— 

Guest 

Crew 

— 

Guest 

Majesty (Double occ: 2,354) 
Onboard pop=3,500 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Mariner (Double occ: 3,114) 
Onboard pop=4,600 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Monarch (Double occ: 2,354) 
Onboard pop=3,500 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Navigator (Double occ: 3,114) 
Onboard pop=4,600 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Radiance (Double occ: 2,110) 
Onboard pop=3,100 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Rhapsody (Double occ: 2,000) 
Onboard pop=3,000 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Serenade (Double occ: 2,112) 
Onboard pop=3,100 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Sovereign (Double occ: 2,276) 
Onboard pop=3,400 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Splendour (Double occ: 1,804) 
Onboard pop=2,700 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Vision (Double occ: 2,000) 
Onboard pop=3,000 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Voyager (Double occ: 3,114) 
Onboard pop=4,600 | 
Incidence/100,000 

Totals 

Onboard pop=64,000 | 
Incidence/100,000 

U.S. Rate for sexual assaults 

1 

0 

6 

3 

4 

0 

0 

1 

1 

7 

2 

10 

7 

161.91 

95.24 

66.67 

6 

4 

72.47 

43.48 

5 

28.99 

15 

190.48 

47.62 

142.86 

6 

8 

101.45 

43.48 

57.97 

7 

3 

107.53 

75.27 

32.26 

3 

7 

111.10 

33.33 

77.77 

5 

2 

75.27 

53.76 

21.51 

5 

7 

114.65 

49.02 

65.63 

2 

24.69 

4 

44.44 

11 

0 

0.0 

4 

44.44 

14 

24.69 

88.88 

181.16 

79.71 

101.45 

0 

0 

2 

0 

1 

0 

1 

2 

0 

3 

3 

2 

2 

8 

1 

2 

2 

3 

1 

0 

2 

7 

13 

6 

13 

13 

10 

5 

3 

9 

3 

10 

17 

36 

102 

113 

24 

50 

151 

53.12 

58.85 

32.20 

111.97 

10.7%  22.2%  67.1% 

Place of Incident: Unknown (26.6%), Pax Cabin (20.1%), Bar/Disco (10.8%), Other (6.0%), Dining Area (5.4%), 
Spa/Salon (5.4%), Public area (4.8%), Cabin—Officer/Crew (3.6%), Corridor (3.0%), Deck area (2.7%), Ashore 
(2.7%),  Child/teen  area  (2.4%),  Elevator  (1.8%),  Swimming  Pool  (1.5%),  Crew  area  (1.5%),  Public  restroom 
(1.5%) 

Explanatory Notes for Table 1 

Data in this table was provided as part of discovery in a lawsuit involving the sexual assault 
of  a  passenger  by  a  crew  member.  As  such,  the  data  only  includes  incidents  reported  to  the 
cruise line and in turn reported in discovery. Given the limited purpose of the discovery request, 
it is suspected that incidents involving two crew members are under-reported. 

The  table  shows  reported  incidents  that  have  been  labeled  by  the  victim  and/or  cruise  line 
as  inappropriate  touch,  sexual  harassment,  sexual  assault,  or  sexual  battery.  Cases  of  sexual 
battery have been included under the label ‘‘sexual assault.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

40 

The  raw  data  included  41  incidents  labeled  inappropriate  touching,  92  incidents  labeled  sex-
ual  harassment,  114  incidents  labeled  sexual  assault,  and  12  incidents  labeled  sexual  battery. 
After cleaning for accurate labeling, eight incidents were dropped because they were wholly mis-
labeled; they are not included in the table. 

The table shows both the ship’s passenger numbers (assuming double occupancy) and an esti-
mate of total ship population that includes crew members and additional passengers given that 
many ships sail with more passengers than the double occupancy figure. 

The  comparison  of  reported  incidents  of  sexual  assault  with  the  U.S.  rate  of  sexual  assault 
(as defined by the cruise industry as only forcible rapes) must be interpreted with caution. Tech-
nically,  such  a  comparison  can  be  misleading,  however  the  cruise  industry  chose  to  make  this 
comparison  in  testimony  provided  to  Congress  by  James  Fox  in  March  2006  and  on  that  basis 
to claim that one is safer on a cruise ship than on land. Perhaps more informative is a compari-
son  of  Dr.  Fox’s  assertion  that  there  are  17.6  reported  incidents  of  sexual  assault  per  100,000 
with the data in this chart. This chart shows a rate of sexual assault that is 3.33 times greater 
than that presented by Dr. Fox to Congress; if we look at sexual assault plus sexual harassment 
the rate of incidence is 6.36 times greater than reported. 

Table 2.—Comparison of Crime Rate Aboard Cruise Ships: 2003–2005 vs 2007 

2003–2005 1 

Sexual 
Assault 

Robbery 

Offences reported 

149 

Annual average 
Passenger count, 2003–05 

49.67 
31,068,000 

4  Offences reported 

(146 days) 

1.33  Annualized rate 

31,068,000 

Pax count, April 1– 

Aug. 24, 2007 

Annual average 
Average pax cruise length 

10,365,000 
6.9 

10,356,000 

6.9  Average pax cruise 

length 5 

Daily pax exposure 
Passenger count x 

(7.0/146) 

2007 2 

Sexual 
Assault 3 

Robbery 4 

69 

54 

172 
4,379,808 

135 
4,379,808 

7.0 

7.0 

209,991 

209,991 

92,284 
302,275 

92,284 
302,275 

(days) 

Annualized pax exposure 

Annual average pax 

count x (6.9/365) 

Daily crew size 
Total annualized person 

exposure 

195,771 

195,771 

86,035 
281,806 

86,035  Daily crew size 6 
281,806 

Total daily (annualized) 

person exposure 

44.7 
Rate of crime per 100,000 
1 Source:  Statement  on  Crime  aboard  Cruise  Ships,  James  Allan  Fox,  March  7,  2006,  in  Congressional  hearings.  Data  was  for  a 

0.5  Rate of crime per 100,000 

17.6 

56.9 

period  of  three  full  years. 

2 Source:  Summary  of  Subject  Matter,  Subcommittee  on  Coast  Guard  and  Maritime  Transportation  Staff,  September  17,  2007, 
Hearing  on  Cruise  Ship  Security  Practices  and  Procedures.  Data  was  for  a  period  of  146  days  (April  1–August  24,  2007):  equivalent 
to  0.4  year. 

3 Sexual  Assault  includes  the  categories  of  ‘‘sexual  assault’’  (N=41)  and  ‘‘sexual  contact’’  (N=28).  This  is  consistent  with  what  is 
understood  to  have  been  done  for  the  2003–2005  data  where  it  is  understood  that  the  categories  of  ‘‘sexual  act’’  and  ‘‘sexual  contact’’ 
were  both  viewed  as  ‘‘sexual  assaults.’’ 

4 Robbery  includes  ‘‘theft  of  items  valued  over  $10,000’’  (N=13)  and  ‘‘theft  of  items  valued  at  less  than  $10,000  (N=41). 
5 Source:  CLIA  Cruise  Industry  Overview,  Marketing  Edition  2006  (latest  data  available). 
6 The  same  ratio  of  passenger-to-crew  used  in  2003–2005  (0.4349675411)  is  used  here. 
The analysis by ship (Table 1) gives some additional insight into the problem. As 
can  be  seen  there  is  a  wide  variation  between  ships.  Some,  such  as  Jewel  of  the 
Seas,  have  relatively  few  incidents.  Others,  such  as  Monarch  of  the  Seas,  Empress 
of  the  Seas  and  Voyager  of  the  Seas,  have  many.  The  obvious  question  is  what  can 
be  extrapolated  from  these  differences.  That  question  was  posed  to  several  Royal 
Caribbean staff members. Their responses touched on several issues. 

One  factor  is  that  incidents  vary  by  cruise  length  and  itinerary.  Shorter  cruises 
(three  or  4  days  in  length)  often  attract  a  different  type  of  passenger  than  cruises 
lasting  a  week  or  more.  Those  on  over-weekend  mini-cruise  may  drink  more  and 
take  greater  part  in  the  nightlife,  sometimes  to  excess.  They  risk  becoming  more 
vulnerable  to  crewmembers  or  other  passengers.  There  are  also  special  interest 
cruises  (including  partial  charters  or  large  affinity  groups)  that  attract  passengers 
who are different than the norm depicted in advertising (e.g., swingers, bikers, hard 
rockers, etc). While it is difficult to assign the degree of increased risk there is rea-
son  to  believe  that  passengers  are  at  greater  risk  on  some  cruises  than  on  others 
simply  because  of  the  itinerary,  the  nature  of  other  cruise  passengers  or  cruise 
length. 

A large factor in risk to passengers and to crew is the onboard culture set by man-
agement.  Some  ship  captains  maintain  higher  expectations  and  lower  tolerance  for 
misbehavior  by  crewmembers  than  others.  Others,  however,  may  be  less  respectful 
to  their  crew  (acting  authoritarian  and  being  unfair  in  decisionmaking,  such  as  an 
officer  denying  promotions  to  subordinates  involved  with  female  crew  members  he 
liked) and create an environment that is less healthy for staff and potentially higher 
risk for passengers. Some workers cited different management styles as a key factor 
in the rate of incidence of sexual assault and harassment. Some officers provide bet-
ter  role  models  than  others  through  their  own  behavior,  both  in  terms  of  alcohol 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

41 

consumption and treatment of women crew and passengers. A womanizing Captain, 
or  a  Captain  who  allows  senior  staff  to  sexually  exploit  staff/crew  and  passengers, 
sets a tone and gives permission to others to behave the same. 

Shipboard culture overlaps with the culture from which crewmembers come. Many 
locations  in  the  world  have  different  attitudes  than  those  commonly  held  in  North 
America  about  women’s  rights  and  about  the  nature  of  relationships  between  men 
and  women.  Specific  cultural  views  of  what  constitutes  sexual  harassment  and  un-
wanted  attention  are  a  possible  risk  factor.  As  Greenwood  states,  ‘‘. . .  it  was  the 
subjective opinion stated by many officers and crew members that the cultural incli-
nation  toward  aggressive  sexual  behavior,  general  low  regard  for  the  status  of 
women, and the attractiveness and charming personalities of these nationals [(refer-
ring to one cultural/ethnic group)] is a risk factor to be considered’’ (1999: 3–4). The 
problem  is  that  a  crewmember  may  behave  in  ways  that  are  acceptable  in  his  or 
her home culture, but that are inappropriate or abusive in North American culture. 
There  is  no  simple  solution  to  the  problem,  but  the  by-ship  comparison  suggests 
that  some  ships  and  ship  management  are  doing  things  right.  There  are  likely 
things  to  be  learned  by  focusing  on  those  ships  where  sex-related  incidents  are  rel-
atively few and comparing them to those where incidents are many. The differences 
may  provide  insight  and  direction  for  positive  change.  But  this  type  of  analysis  is 
not  being  done.  While  the  goal  of  each  cruise  line  should  be  consistency  across  the 
ships in its brand, it is something that is not being achieved (Krohne 1999). 

Michael Eriksen, a lawyer who represents victims of crime on cruise ships has an-
other  perspective.  He  says  some  forms  of  crew  misconduct  derive  from  the  cruise 
industry’s business models and hiring practices. 

‘‘Crew members live and work in confined quarters, are away from home for ex-
tended  periods,  and  work  long  hours  with  little  downtime,  even  during  port 
calls. The crew’s alienation from normal home and family activities leaves many 
vulnerable to social entanglements with passengers.’’ (Eriksen 2006: 48) 

Eriksen posits that many if not most crewmembers alleged to have committed sex-
ual  offences  against  passengers  aboard  cruise  ships  have  been  cabin  stewards,  bar-
tenders,  dinner  waiters,  or  others  whose  jobs  involve  daily  passenger  contact.  He 
suggests: 

‘‘To  deter  such  misbehavior,  a  cruise  line  must  do  more  than  write  up  a  ‘zero 
tolerance’  policy  and  pay  lip-service  to  it.  Criminals  aboard  cruise  ships,  like 
those  elsewhere,  commit  crimes  because  they  perceive  a  minimal  risk  of  detec-
tion  and  prosecution.  Some  cruise  lines  fail  to  install  sufficient  surveillance 
cameras in public areas to identify and deter potential perpetrators. Other car-
riers  fail  to  hire  enough  supervisors  and  security  guards  to  adequately  keep 
tabs on the rest of the crew. Some carriers fail to make it clear to crewmembers 
that  zero  tolerance  also  applies  to  crew-passenger  contact  ashore.  Carriers  also 
generally  do  not  warn  passengers  to  be  wary  of  crew  member  misconduct.’’ 
(Eriksen 2006: 49) 

It Isn’t Just Sexual Assaults 

The  first  hearings  in  the  House  of  Representatives  in  December  2005  were  not 
concerned  with  sexual  assaults.  Their  initial  focus  was  on  a  cluster  of  cases  where 
a  passenger  disappeared  from  a  cruise  ship.  The  issue  was  raised  in  June  2005  in 
a  Business  Journal  of  Jacksonville  article  written  by  Mary  Moewe.  She  had  found 
that  since  2000  at  least  twelve  cruise  ship  passengers  had  gone  overboard  or  dis-
appeared  in  eleven  incidents  involving  cruise  ships  that  frequent  U.S.  ports.  Two 
passengers  were  rescued,  two  were  confirmed  dead  and  eight  are  still  missing. 
These eight remain a mystery (Moewe 2005). 

Unbeknownst  to  Moewe,  the  numbers  were  actually  much  higher.  Because  no 
cruise  line  or  corporation  kept  track  of  persons  going  overboard  and  no  Federal 
agency had responsibility for monitoring these events, she was left to rely on infor-
mation  that  was  readily  available.  The  most  comprehensive  list  of  persons  going 
overboard  from  cruise  ships  at  the  time  was  online  at  Cruise  Junkie  dot  Com  (see 
<www.cruisejunkie.com/Overboard.html>).  The  site  reports  forty-seven  incidents 
during  the  same  time  period  covered  by  Moewe’s  article;  in  nine  cases  the  person 
was  rescued  alive.  Some  cases  were  clearly  suicide,  some  were  accidents  and  many 
remained  mysterious.  Alcohol  was  a  factor  in  a  fair  number  of  suicides  and  acci-
dents;  large  gambling  losses  were  a  factor  in  at  least  three  cases  and  an  argument 
with  a  spouse  or  traveling  companion  preceded  four  incidents  (three  men,  one 
woman—in two of these cases the passenger was rescued alive). There was a single 
case  where  one  passenger  was  observed  throwing  another  overboard.  In  September 
2001 Myrtha Vogt, a sixty-nine year old woman from New Mexico, was pushed over-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

42 

board, as her husband watched, by a fellow passenger who was a former mental pa-
tient. They were on the third day of an eleven-day cruise of Norway’s fjords. 

Some of the unexplained disappearances include: Cris Allen Swartzbaugh, a thir-
ty-nine-year-old man who disappeared between Tahiti and Raiatea in the South Pa-
cific  the  first  night  of  a  cruise  aboard  the  Paul  Gauguin  in  April  2000;  Manuelita 
Pierce,  a  thirty-nine-year-old  woman  who  disappeared  without  a  trace  at  the  end 
of  her  week-long  Caribbean  cruise  aboard  Royal  Caribbean’s  Enchantment  of  the 
Seas  in  October  2000;  Randall  Gary,  a  fifty-year-old  psychotherapist  who  in  May 
2003  disappeared  from  Holland  America  Line’s  Veendam  somewhere  between  Van-
couver  and  Alaska;  Merrian  Carver,  a  forty-year-old  woman  who  in  May  2004  dis-
appeared  from  an  Alaska  cruise  aboard  Celebrity  Cruises’  Mercury;  Annette 
Mizener, a thirty-seven-year-old woman who disappeared from a 9-day Mexican Riv-
iera  cruise  aboard  Carnival  Pride  in  December  2004—in  her  case  the  surveillance 
camera  viewing  the  deck  area  from  where  she  disappeared,  apparently  following  a 
struggle,  was  covered  by  a  map  of  the  ship;  and  in  May  2005  Hue  Pham  (age 
seventy-  one)  and  his  wife  of  forty-nine  years,  Hue  Tran  (age  sixty-seven),  dis-
appeared  in  the  Caribbean  between  the  islands  of  Barbados  and  Aruba  from  Car-
nival  Destiny.  What  started  out  as  a  Mother’s  Day  gift—a  seven  night  Caribbean 
cruise with their daughter and granddaughter—turned into a tragic and mysterious 
disappearance.  There  were  common  patterns  in  these  cases:  search  for  the  missing 
passenger  was  either  not  undertaken  or  was  inordinately  delayed,  there  appeared 
to  be  an  absence  of  investigation,  and  in  some  cases  law  enforcement  authorities 
were not initially notified. 

While these cases suggest a problem, the disappearance of George Allen Smith IV, 
a  twenty-six-  year-old  on  his  honeymoon  aboard  the  Brilliance  of  the  Seas  in  the 
Mediterranean  in  July  2005,  immediately  captured  the  world’s  attention  and  inter-
est  and  catapulted  passenger  disappearances  into  the  public  eye.  The  newlyweds 
had  been  drinking  heavily  and  gambling  at  the  ship’s  casino  before  his  disappear-
ance.  The  story  that  emerged  was  that  while  George’s  wife,  Jennifer  Hegel-Smith, 
lay  passed  out  on  a  floor  far  from  the  couple’s  cabin  (and  with  no  recollection  of 
events),  George  was  taken  back  to  his  cabin  by  some  drinking  buddies  who  claim 
they put him to bed. The next morning a youngster in a nearby cabin reported see-
ing blood on a canopy above a life boat under the Smith cabin and an investigation 
determined  that  at  least  one  of  the  Smiths  was  missing.  Jennifer  was  located  that 
morning in the gym, unaware that anything had happened. 

George’s  disappearance  was  reported  to  local  Turkish  authorities  that  came 
aboard  to  investigate.  To  this  day,  it  appears  the  investigation  remains  open  and 
conclusions  have  yet  to  be  drawn.  There  is  some  indication  that  foul  play  was  in-
volved, and some believe they know who was involved, but no one has been formally 
identified or charged. 

In  late-June  2006,  Jennifer  reached  a  settlement  with  the  cruise  line  over  her 
husband’s  disappearance.  George’s  parents  the  same  day  filed  suit  against  the 
cruise line claiming the cruise line deliberately and intentionally portrayed the inci-
dent  as  an  accident,  and  hampered  a  full-blown,  appropriate  investigation  into  the 
facts and circumstances of George’s death. Specifically, they claim the cruise line de-
layed reporting the incident to the FBI, deciding instead to report the case to Turk-
ish  authorities.  When  Royal  Caribbean  did  contact  the  FBI,  the  suit  claims  the 
cruise  line  failed  to  tell  authorities  about  loud  noises  and  arguing  in  Smith’s  cabin 
and the discovery of blood inside and outside the cabin. As well, the family accuses 
Royal Caribbean of contaminating a potential crime scene by sending crew members 
into  the  cabin  to  investigate  and  take  photographs  and  by  cleaning  blood  from  the 
canopy above a lifeboat. 

The  Smith  case  dominated  news  media  in  the  United  States  for  months  and  was 
the  focus  of  stories  in  both  print  and  television  magazines.  It  particularly  caught 
the  attention  of  Smith’s  Member  of  Congress,  Christopher  Shays,  who  was  aware 
of some of the other cases involving disappearances from cruise ships (including the 
case of Merrian Carver) and who pushed for and who chaired the first two Congres-
sional  hearings  (December  2005  and  March  2006).  The  latter  shifted  the  spotlight 
to sexual assaults. 

The other issue raised in the March 2006 hearing was robbery and theft. The in-
dustry claimed then that there was only four known robberies industry-wide in the 
3-year  period,  2003–2005.  That  meant  an  annual  rate  of  1.33.  As  seen  in  Table  2, 
the  FBI  reported  in  2007  an  annualized  rate  of  135.  That  yields  a  rate  of  44.7  per 
100,000. This is 100 times greater than what the industry admitted to in its March 
2006 testimony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

Getting a Handle on Crime 

43 

It  is  not  surprising  to  most  that  crimes  would  occur  on  cruise  ships,  much  the 
same as they do on land. However there are features of a cruise vacation—excessive 
drinking,  uninhibited  sociality,  shipboard  culture,  and  not  trivially  the  industry’s 
mantra  that  cruise  vacations  are  virtually  safe—that  raise  the  risk  higher  than 
what  would  be  expected  on  land  and  certainly  higher  than  most  passengers  expect. 
Like  dealing  with  an  alcoholic,  the  first  thing  the  cruise  industry  needs  to  do  is  to 
admit that there is a problem. Only then can they begin to address the problem and 
seek advice from critics and independent and external analysts. Their current meth-
od of obfuscation and excluding from discussion those who disagree with them may 
have  worked  in  past,  but  the  problem  has  reached  proportions  that  demand  mean-
ingful and significant measures. 

The  industry  will  argue  that  the  reporting  agreement  between  CLIA  and  the 
Coast Guard/FBI is enough for dealing with the problem. However it is not. The in-
dustry  has  been  required  to  report  all  crimes  against  Americans  for  more  than  a 
decade (first under U.S.C. 18 CFR and later by their zero tolerance pledge in 1999), 
but  they  obviously  weren’t  if  we  compare  the  incidence  before  and  after  April  2007 
when the industry’s voluntary agreement with the FBI and Coast Guard took effect. 
The  agreement  is  a  positive  step,  but  it  has  little  value  when  data  is  collected  and 
then  kept  secret.  There  is  no  regular  public  reporting  of  crime  on  cruise  ships.  An 
amendment to H.R. 2830 offered by Representative Doris Matsui of California (and 
co-sponsored  by  Representatives  Poe,  Maloney  and  Shays)  and  passed  earlier  this 
year as part of the Coast Guard Reauthorization Bill will change that. 

It requires that data collected by the FBI be made available via the Internet, bro-
ken  down  by  cruise  line,  and  that  the  link  to  the  data  be  clearly  displayed  on  each 
cruise line’s website. 

The only apparent weakness of this approach is that it does not define what con-
stitutes a crime. This is important given the industry’s propensity for manipulating 
definitions.  It  would  be  helpful  to  clearly  state  what  actions  or  behavior  is  report-
able  without  leaving  wiggle  room  for  misinterpretation  or  under-reporting.  Some 
might argue this approach is based in basic distrust of the cruise industry. The dis-
trust  is  based  in  experience.  The  industry  consistently  misrepresented  and  lied 
about its environmental practices during the 1990s and early 2000s. It has also, in-
tentionally  or  unintentionally,  under-represented  the  incidence  of  crimes  to  Con-
gress and to its customers. It is not necessarily the safest mode of commercial trans-
portation and should not purport to be. 
Recommendations 

In addition to the need for standardized definitions for reportable crimes, it would 
also  make  sense  to  extend  mandatory  reporting  laws  found  in  virtually  every  U.S. 
jurisdiction with regard to child sexual abuse so that they also apply to cruise ships. 
Why should cruise ships operating out of U.S. ports and carrying American citizens 
be treated differently than other jurisdictions, especially when it comes to victimiza-
tion  of  our  youngest  citizens?  It  may  also  be  prudent  to  have  mandatory  reporting 
for  all  sexual  assaults  (i.e.,  sexual  contact,  sexual  acts,  forcible  rape,  and  any  other 
incident involving unwanted sexual activity). However, as already stated, clear defi-
nitions need to provided so that all crimes be reportable and reported. As well, this 
data  should  be  public  and  available  to  persons  thinking  about  or  planning  to  take 
a  cruise.  They  need  to  have  information  that  counterbalances  the  cruise  industry’s 
grand claims about passenger safety. 

A  second  set  of  recommendations  emerges  from  the  1999  reports  by  consultants 
hired  by  Royal  Caribbean  Cruises  Limited.  Many  of  the  recommendations  are  spot 
on  but  have  not  been  implemented  or  have  been  implemented  in  a  haphazard  and 
inconsistent manner. Some that still need better implementation include: standard-
izing  the  response  to  incidents  of  crime  across  all  ships  and  across  brands;  inde-
pendent advocates/counselors onboard who are available to support and care for vic-
tims; a hotline reporting system off ship that may be used by those who not surpris-
ingly  will  feel  unsafe  about  reporting  an  incident  onboard;  better  surveillance  and 
greater  use  of  CCTV  cameras  in  key  areas  of  the  ship,  which  are  regularly  mon-
itored and tapes stored for a reasonable period of time (at least as long as the time 
allotted  by  the  cruise  passenger  contract  for  bringing  legal  action  against  a  car-
rier)—videos  that  are  not  regularly  screened  give  crew  members  confidence  that 
they  are  likely  to  get  away  with  illegal  activity;  better  education  of  crew  and  pas-
sengers  about  safety,  security,  and  about  the  limited  nature  of  permitted  inter-
actions between passengers and crew/service staff; and, of key importance, effecting 
a  meaningful  and  significant  change  in  shipboard  culture  and  tolerance  for  mis-
deeds.  Many  crimes  occur  because  perpetrators  know  they  will  not  be  caught,  and 
if caught they will not be punished. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

44 

There  is  also  great  room  for  improvement  on  a  very  concrete  level.  Many  rec-
ommendations are contained in the International Cruise Victims Association’s (ICV) 
10-point  program.  Given  that  ICV  is  a  grassroots  organization  comprised  largely  of 
people  who  have  experienced  crime  onboard  a  cruise  ship  (or  whose  family  mem-
ber(s) has/have), and that they speak loudly for themselves, I won’t attempt to sum-
marize  what  they  have  to  say.  Their  insights  are  based  on  direct  experience  and 
their  recommendations  are  informed  by  the  pain  and  suffering  they  have  endured. 
They  can  express  better  than  I  many  of  the  things  the  industry  could  and  should 
be doing that it isn’t. 
References 

Adams,  Margaret.  1990.  ‘‘Rape  Case  Threatens  Cruise  Industry  Image:  Girl,  14,  Says  Crew-

man Assaulted Her,’’ Miami Herald (Broward Edition), February 5. 

Dale, Terry. 2007. Letter from CLIA to the Chair of the House Subcommittee on Coast Guard 

and Marine Transportation, December 19, 2007. 

Eriksen, Michael. 2006. ‘‘Love Boats on Troubled Waters,’’ Trial 43, 3 (March). 
Fox,  James  Alan.  ‘‘Statement  on  Crime  Aboard  Cruise  Ships,’’  Testimony  Before  the  Com-
mittee on Government Reform, U.S. House of Representatives, Subcommittee on National Secu-
rity, Emerging Threats and International Relations, March 7, 2006. 

Frantz, Douglas. 1998. ‘‘On Cruise Ships, Silence Shrouds Crimes,’’ New York Times, Novem-
ber  16.  Available  at  <www.nytimes.com/library/national/111698cruise-ship-crime.html> 
(Accessed July 14, 1999) 

Greenwood,  Don.  ‘‘Reducing  Sexual  Assaults  on  Cruise  Ships:  Risk  Assessment  and  Rec-

ommendations,’’ Unpublished consultant’s report. June 7, 1999. 

Klein, Ross A. 2007. ‘‘Crime Against Americans on Cruise Ships,’’ Testimony Before the Com-
mittee  on  Transportation  and  Infrastructure,  U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  Subcommittee  on 
Coast  Guard  and  Maritime  Transportation,  March  27.  Available  at  <transportation.house.gov/ 
Media/File/Coast%20Guard/20070327/Klein.pdf> 

Korten,  Tristram.  2000.  ‘‘Carnival?  Try  Criminal:  What  happens  when  a  female  passenger  is 
assaulted  on  a  cruise  ship?  Not  much.’’  Miami  New  Times,  February  3–9.  Available  at 
<www.miaminewtimes.com/2000-02-03/news/carnival-try-criminal> 
(Accessed  February  5, 
2000) 

Krohne,  Kay.  Unpublished  consultant’s  report  examining  current  efforts  of  Royal  Caribbean 

Cruises Ltd. in the area of preventing sexual harassment and assault. May 26, 1999. 

Moewe,  M.C.  2005.  ‘‘Disappearances  Leave  Mystery,’’  Business  Journal  of  Jacksonville,  June 
3.  Available  at  <www.bizjournals.com/jacksonville/stories/2005/06/06/story1.html>  (Accessed 
July 4, 2005) 

Yoshino,  Kimi.  2007.  ‘‘Cruise  Industry’s  Dark  Waters:  What  Happens  at  Sea  Stays  There  as 
Crimes  on  Lineres  Go  Unresolved,’’  Los  Angeles  Times,  January  20.  Available  at 
<www.latimes.com/business/la-fi-cruise20jan20,1,6485727.story?track=crosspromo&coll=la-head 
lines-business&ctrack=1&cset=true> (Accessed January 20, 2007) 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Dr. Klein. I appreciate it. 
Just listening to those statistics, I mean, I’m trying to get a base-
line  to  the  Committee  here—Mr.  Dale,  obviously  there’s  a  sort  of 
disagreement  between  the  two  of  you  about  what’s  going  on,  and 
maybe more than the two of you. But, how do you respond to that, 
to  the  difference  in  these  baseline  understandings  of  what’s  going 
on? 

Mr.  DALE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  it’s  important,  first,  to  say, 
when talking about passenger safety, it’s not an issue about statis-
tics.  One  of  the  things  that  I’ve  learned  from  our  family  members, 
and including learning this from Ken personally, is that regardless 
of  how  small  a  percentage  may  be,  if  it  touches  your  family,  it’s 
devastating and it’s life-changing. 

Senator KERRY. Well, I appreciate your saying that. 
Mr. DALE. So—yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  But,  let’s  come  back,  for  a  moment,  because 
you’re  trying  to  make  a  claim  that  it  is  safer  than  in  other  parts 
of  our  society,  and  obviously  Mr.  Klein  is  saying,  ‘‘No,  it’s  not.’’ 
Which is true? 

Mr. DALE. Well, I would point to this. We have heard Mr. Klein’s 
testimony. I would refer back to previous FBI and Coast Guard tes-
timony.  And,  unfortunately,  his  statistics  aren’t  borne  out  by  what 
we’ve heard in previous hearings. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

45 

I  have  with  me  today  Dr.  Fox,  who’s  a  nationally  renowned 
criminologist from Northeastern University, who has done an anal-
ysis that comes with a different set of findings than what you have 
had presented to you today. 

Senator KERRY. Well, it shouldn’t—I mean, we get pretty experi-
enced  around  here  at  seeing  different  people  coming  in  with  dif-
ferent statistics to try to make their point. 

Mr. DALE. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  The  bottom  line  is  you  can  count  the  rate  at 
which sex crimes occur, particularly rape, et cetera, breaking them 
down, occur onshore, versus on ship—— 

Mr. DALE. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.—relative  to  population.  This  isn’t  that  com-

plicated. 

Dr. Klein, is that the way you did it? 
Dr. KLEIN. Well, I think—the way I did it initially is using what 
is  conventionally  done,  and  that  is  to  look  at  crime  statistics  with 
regard to rate per 100,000 population. That is also the method that 
James  Fox  used  in  his  testimony  before  Congress  in  March  2006. 
The  problem  with  his  testimony—and  I  wouldn’t  blame  him,  but 
the  problem  was  that  there  is  no  U.S.  rate  for  sexual  assault, 
there’s only a rate for forcible rape. So, they were comparing sexual 
assaults  with—on  cruise  ships—with  on  land,  but  they  were  using 
the word ‘‘sexual assaults’’ for ‘‘forcible rape.’’ 

More  recently,  the  cruise  industry  is  now  claiming  that  the  rate 
of sexual assault, or the probability of sexual assault, is .01 per the 
number  of  passengers.  This  is  not  a  conventional  way  in  which 
crime statistics are measured. If we were to use that method, what 
that  would  mean  is,  in  the  State  of  California—they  have  a  popu-
lation  of  36  million,  they  have  366  million  visitors  per  year,  which 
means  that  the  number  of  people  in  the  State  of  California  in  a 
year is almost 400 million people. If we take the rate of sexual as-
sault  in  California,  that  means  that  the  rate  of  sexual  assault  is 
.0025,  one-quarter  of  the  industry  statement  of  .01.  Now,  I’m  not 
going  to  stand  by  those  statistics,  because  it’s  not  a  conventional 
way  in  which  we  look  at  crime  statistics.  Crime  statistics  are  nor-
mally  and  conventionally  looked  at  as  population  per  100,000,  and 
when we do this on a cruise ship—— 

Senator  KERRY.  What  happens—let’s  get  away—I  don’t  want  to 

get lost here. 

Dr. KLEIN. Yes, OK. Sorry. 
Senator  KERRY.  What  happens  when  you  just  take  the  popu-
lation—the  numbers  of  people  who  get  on  a  ship,  and  you  have  X 
number of people on the ship, plus crew, measured against a State 
with  X  number  of  citizens  plus  law  enforcement?  What  happens 
then? 

Dr. KLEIN. Well, I think the issue is that we want to look at the 
daily  population  on  a  ship,  not  the  number  of  passengers.  Because 
the  rate  of  sexual  assault  in  the  U.S.  is  based  on  the  daily  popu-
lation—— 

Senator KERRY. That’s what I’m talking about. 
Dr. KLEIN.—in the—— 
Senator KERRY. Crew and passengers. 
Dr. KLEIN. Exactly. And so—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

46 

Senator KERRY. Total numbers of people on the ship. 
Dr.  KLEIN.  Right.  So,  the  rate  is—56.9  per  100,000  is  based  on 

the daily population on CLIA-member cruise ships. 

Senator KERRY. Yes, Mr. Dale? 
Mr.  DALE.  Mr.  Chairman,  may  I  ask  Dr.  Fox  to  help  clarify  this 

Senator KERRY. Sure. If he can, he would be a genius. 
Mr. DALE. Before he says his comments, I would like to state—— 
Senator  KERRY.  Just  pull  a  chair  up.  Why  don’t  we  get  him  a 

Mr.  DALE.—that  we  also  need  to  keep  into  perspective  here, 
which  is  very  important,  that  we  report  all  allegations  unvetted. 
So,  that,  in  and  of  itself,  is  a  very  important  point  of  clarification. 

situation? 

chair there. 

Dr. Fox? 

STATEMENT  OF  JAMES  ALAN  FOX,  PH.D.,  LIPMAN  FAMILY 
PROFESSOR  OF  CRIMINAL  JUSTICE  AT  NORTHEASTERN 
UNIVERSITY;  VISITING  FELLOW,  U.S.  DEPARTMENT  OF 
JUSTICE, BUREAU OF JUSTICE STATISTICS 
Dr. FOX. Yes, thank you. 
Dr. Klein and I attempt to use the rate per 100,000, and I think 
we agree on that method. The issue is the definition of ‘‘sexual as-
sault.’’  And  he  is  right  that  on  the  cruise  ships,  sexual  assault, 
which is the only definition—category we have—includes rape plus 
other offenses that are quite not—not quite as serious as rape. On 
land,  it’s  just  ‘‘forcible  rape.’’  The  rate  per  100,000  on  the  cruise 
lines right now is 10 percent lower than land, and that’s a broader 
definition—— 

Senator KERRY. For what? 
Dr. FOX.—on cruise lines. 
Senator KERRY. Ten percent lower for what? 
Dr. FOX. I’m sorry? 
Senator KERRY. Ten percent lower for which? 
Dr.  FOX.  Than  the  rape.  The  rate  per  100,000  of  rape  and  other 
offenses  on  cruise  ships  is  27.2  per  100,000;  on  land,  it’s  30.9  per 
100,000. And the on-ship—— 

Senator KERRY. So, it’s a very—— 
Dr. FOX.—number—— 
Senator KERRY. It’s not that—— 
Dr. FOX.—is that broader definition. If you were able to compare 

Senator  KERRY.  There’s  too  many  on  land.  There  are  too  many 

rape with—— 

at sea. 

Dr. FOX. Yes. They’re both high. 
Senator KERRY. Would you agree? 
Dr.  FOX.  It’s  10  percent  lower  on—at  sea,  but  the  rate  at  sea  is 

a broader category, it’s rape plus other crimes. If you—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  but—you  know,  let’s  say  it  is  10-percent 
lower,  and  we’re  getting  on  a  ship,  they’re  going  on  vacation, 
they’ve  invested  a  lot  of  money,  this  is  their  time  to  be  away  and 
be  safe.  They  are  going  someplace  to  get  away  from  what  happens 
on  land,  and  they  don’t  expect  to  find  the  same  thing  happening 
to them on their vacation. Is that a fair statement? 

Dr. KLEIN. Absolutely. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

47 

Senator KERRY. OK. Do you accept that? 
Mr.  DALE.  Yes,  I,  again,  would  just  go  back  to  the  point  I  made 
earlier,  that  we  are  reporting  all  allegations,  and,  as  you  know,  as 
a—— 

Senator KERRY. OK. 
Mr. DALE.—former—— 
Senator  KERRY.  Well,  let’s  get  to  the  heart  now.  You  say,  Mr. 
Dale, that you’re the only travel industry required by law to imme-
diately  report  a  serious  incident  or  activity  to  Federal  authorities, 
correct? 

Mr. DALE. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  Why  do  you  make  a  big  deal  out  of  that,  since 
everybody  else  is  required  under  the  law  to  report  to  local  and 
State authorities, and you clearly aren’t and can’t? 

Mr.  DALE.  Well,  I’m  not  trying  to  make  a  big  deal  of  it.  I’m  just 

stating that—— 

Senator  KERRY.  But,  I  mean,  and  the  only  reason  you  do  that  is 
because  of  this  voluntary  agreement  with  the  FBI  and  the  Coast 
Guard. 

Mr. DALE. No, it is mandatory for us to report these allegations, 

and this is according to Title 33, Part 120 of the Federal Code. 

Senator KERRY. OK. 
Mr.  DALE.  So,  it  is  mandatory  for  us  to  report  this.  The—what 
is  voluntary  is  the  form  and  the  standardization  of  how  we  report 
it  to  the  FBI.  That’s  just  a  protocol  that  has  become  standardized. 
But, the reporting itself is, in fact, mandatory. 

Senator  KERRY.  But,  the  reason  that  that  exists  is  because,  ab-
sent that, there would be no reporting—you wouldn’t report to any-
body, that there is no local jurisdiction. 

Mr.  DALE.  Well,  there’s  always  reporting,  Senator,  to  the  flag 
state  and  port  state  control,  as  well.  So,  you  know,  what  we 
would—— 

Senator KERRY. Well, what if you’re on the high seas? 
Mr. DALE. Well, you—— 
Senator  KERRY.  When  you’re  on  the  high  seas,  is  there  a  port 

state? 

they not? 

Mr.  DALE.  We  report  it,  as  well,  to  the  Federal  authorities,  the 

FBI, the Coast Guard, on the high seas. 

Senator KERRY. Right. But, those would be the only place, would 

Mr. CARVER. Mr. Chairman? 
Senator KERRY. Yes? 
Mr. CARVER. May I make a comment? 
Senator KERRY. Sure. 
Mr.  CARVER.  In  this  report,  which  CLIA  presented  to  the  House 
of  Representatives—three  times  in  this  report,  they  indicate—the 
FBI, right on the first page, says their analysis—the FBI’s analysis 
of  crimes  occurring  on  the  ship  says  they’re  .01  percent.  That’s 
what they say. They go on to say, in bold letters on page 3, ‘‘Based 
on  the  FBI’s  own  analysis,  there’s  less  than  a  .01-percent  chance 
of a cruise ship that’ll become a victim of a crime.’’ And they repeat 
that a third time. Well, that statement was not true. 

So, I went to the FBI, because when they went to California they 
said exactly the same thing and publicized that to all the Congres-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

48 

sional people. So, I have here a letter, which is in your documents, 
from  the  FBI,  which,  in  effect,  says,  ‘‘Please  be  advised  that  the 
FBI did not submit, nor testify before the Subcommittee, in regards 
to  the  statistical  data  reported  by  CLIA.  Thank  you  for  bringing 
this matter to our attention. And please be aware that the FBI will 
also  provide  a  clarification  of  this  data.’’  Plus,  the  FBI  says  that 
data  is  reported  on  a  voluntary  basis,  it’s  not  mandatory.  So,  the 
claim that they kept making in this report, saying, ‘‘We do not need 
legislation’’  keeps  referring  to  the  FBI,  and  the  FBI  made  no  such 
claim. They’re the only ones that could really come up with a crime 
rate,  so  I  found  it  rather—in  New  York  City  there’s  a  term  for  it, 
‘‘chutzpah,’’ that they would keep referring to FBI crime data that, 
in effect, the FBI said they did not submit. 

Senator KERRY. Now, I’m going to turn to Senator Lautenberg in 
a  moment  here—Mr.  Fox,  if  I  could  ask  you—if  you  could  return 
to  your  seat—what  we’re  going  to  do  is  follow  up  with  you.  We’ve 
got  a  lot  of  territory  to  cover  on  what  the  remedies  are  and  how 
we proceed. But, we are going to submit some questions in writing, 
and we’d like you to be able to answer those to establish a baseline. 

Dr. FOX. May I take 30 seconds to clarify something? 
Senator KERRY. Sure, 10 seconds. 
Dr. FOX. Thank you. 
Mr. Klein talked about the robbery and theft. The earlier number 
was  robbery,  the  later  number  was  the  theft  count,  not  the  same, 
and  the  100-fold  increase  was—he  switched  from  one  crime  to  the 
other. 

As  far  as  this  .01,  that  is  the  probability  of  a  rape  occurring  in 
a 1-week period of time on a cruise ship. It is not meant, never has 
meant—and  I’m  not  sure  who  decided  to  put  it  in  there—it’s  not 
meant to compare to an annual rate on a—on land. 

Senator KERRY. Fair enough. 
Dr. FOX. But whatever—— 
Senator  KERRY.  We’re  going  to  get  that  baseline  thoroughly  vet-
ted with respect to the record, and we’ll do it in writing so that we 
can  get  it  pinned  down.  And  I’ll  look  forward  to  getting  that  done 
here. So, Senator Lautenberg? 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much. 
The focus seems to narrow down to the process for reporting the 
type  of  incidents.  I  didn’t  hear  a  discussion,  let’s  say,  of  burglaries 
or theft. How is that, Mr. Klein? Do we know about that on cruise 
ships? 

Dr. KLEIN. OK. Well, according to the FBI report to the hearings 
in  September  2007,  they  reported  that  there  had  been  13  thefts  of 
items  valued  over  10,000,  and  thefts  of  items  valued  at  less  than 
10,000  were  41.  So,  when  I  give  my  rate  of  44.7  per  100,000,  I’m 
combining both the theft of items over 10,000 and the theft of items 
less than 10,000. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. But—how does that compare with the 

general statistics—on land? 

readily at hand, I’m sorry. 

Dr.  KLEIN.  That,  I  don’t  believe,  has  been—I  don’t  have  that 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  OK.  How  are  these  things  dealt  with?  Do 
we find that there’s the same lackadaisical—or attempt to hide the 
information that comes about, or is it reported in any central place? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

49 

Dr.  KLEIN.  Well,  I  think  the  key  difference  is,  when  it  happens 

on land, it would be reported to a local police authority. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Right. And then the—— 
Dr. KLEIN. When it’s reported at—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Senator Kerry said that. 
Dr.  KLEIN.—it  happens  on  a  ship  to  an  American  citizen—not  a 
foreign  national,  to  an  American  citizen—it’s  reported  to  the  FBI. 
The FBI has stated very clearly that it will not investigate or pros-
ecute any robbery valued at less than $10,000. 

Mr. DALE. And could I just add to that—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr.  DALE.—Senator?  I  do  have  here,  from  Dr.  Fox,  the  compari-
son  to  land,  and  it’s  2200  landside,  and  compared  to  41  on  the 
cruise ships. We do report thefts, as required by the FBI. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  The  thing  that  I’m  concerned—or  inter-
ested  in  is—you  talk  about  counseling  on  ships—are  people  led  to 
believe  that  they  have  to  exercise  any  care  with  valuables,  with 
family members? Is that included in any kind of a introductory pro-
gram to passengers that are boarding a ship for the first time? 

Mr. DALE. Senator, we always encourage our passengers to exer-

cise the same judgment on our ships that they would landside. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How do you encourage them? 
Mr.  DALE.  And  that’s  part  of  the  muster  drill  that  is  mandatory 
for all passengers who are taking a cruise. That is also printed—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. That is for safety—in the event of an acci-

dent that requires—— 

Mr. DALE. Evacuation. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—a lifeboat process. 
Mr. DALE. Yes. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.But, in those introductions, do they also in-
clude  comments  about  what  one  ought  to  do?  I  mean,  do  they  say, 
‘‘Look,  here  we  are,  we  want  you  to  have  a  good  time,  et  cetera, 
but  it  is  a  busy  place,  lots  of  people,  and  therefore  you  have  to 
watch  out  for  your  youngsters,  or  you  have  to  know  where  your 
mate  or  your  friends  are  when  they’re  not  with  you,  your  com-
panion’’? 

Mr. DALE. That type of information is included in the staterooms. 
And  it  also  will  run  on  the  TVs  in  the  staterooms,  as  well.  Again, 
you  know,  ‘‘Please  exercise  the  same  judgment  that  you  would 
landside as you enjoy your cruise vacation.’’ So, we try and provide 
that in multiple different ways to our customers. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, Mr. Klein? 
Dr.  KLEIN.  May  I  make  a  comment?  I  guess  we’re  talking  in  the 

abstract. Let me bring this down to the very concrete. 

I was involved in a—as an expert witness in a case, about a year 
ago,  of  a  8-year-old  girl  who  was  on  a  cruise  ship  who  was  led 
down—who—her  parents  believed  that  a  cruise  ship  was  a  safe 
choice of a vacation, and they allowed her to go back to the family 
cabin  on  her  own.  She  became  lost  and  went  up  to  a  janitor  and 
asked  for  directions.  He  led  her  down  a  hallway  to  a  dark  spot, 
where there were no surveillance cameras, masturbated in front of 
her, OK? The child was traumatized. She reported this to her par-
ents.  The  parents  reported  it  onboard.  The  people  onboard  didn’t 
believe  her.  They  revictimized  her  by  doubting  her  testimony  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

50 

calling  her  a  liar.  You  know,  the  worker  knew  where  the  cameras 
were,  he  knew  that  he  wouldn’t  be  seen,  and  he  also  likely  knew 
that he wouldn’t be caught. 

When  the  case  was  being  examined,  this  worker  was  onboard 
under  a  different  name  than  his  passport.  And  this  worker  had, 
with  the  previous  cruise  line  he  worked  with,  ‘‘Do  not  rehire’’  on 
his personnel file. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Do we know the percentage of attacks that 

are committed by fellow passengers or crew members? 

Dr.  KLEIN.  According  to  data  provided  by  Royal  Caribbean  and 
discovery  in  a  court  case,  67.1  percent  of  those  were  crew-on-pas-
senger,  roughly  22  percent  were  passenger-on-passenger,  and  just 
over 10 percent were crew-on-crew. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So, is the vetting process adequate to deal 

in advance with a pending problem like this? 

Mr. DALE. Yes, let me share with you, Senator, what the vetting 
process is when we hire our crew. Basically, there are three layers. 
When using licensed manning agencies in the crew member’s home 
country, they are required to get statements from local law enforce-
ment entities regarding any criminal background. Second, the U.S. 
State Department, in issuing a U.S. working visa, also does a back-
ground  check.  And  finally,  as  I  mentioned  in  my  oral  testimony,  a 
complete  crew  and  passenger  manifest  is  electronically  submitted 
96  hours  prior  to  that  ship  departing  to  the  Federal  authorities. 
And  so,  it  is  run  through  several  different  data  bases  and  checked 
and  rechecked.  So,  there  are  several  different  layers  in  which  we 
are constantly looking and monitoring who we employ on our ships. 
And I would go back to the fact that an independent survey con-
ducted by TNS found that our cruisers gave us 95-percent satisfac-
tion  ratings.  So,  we  have  good,  quality,  caring  individuals  who 
work on our ships today. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. The search for crew, do you find that, 

in different places, you get less reliable data? 

Mr. DALE. I’m not able to respond to that, Senator. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  Well,  I  just  wonder  whether,  if  the 
vetting  process  is  done  by  local  authorities,  is  it  as  efficient—is  it 
as  reliable  as  we’d  like  it  to  be?  And  to  not  be  certain  about  who 
is  in  that  crew,  of  course,  is  a  high  risk,  and  I  assume  that  the 
company,  the  cruise  company,  has  a  responsibility,  in  the  event  of 
an incident, to make sure that they’re responsible for anything that 
happens. 

Mr.  DALE.  Absolutely  we  have  a  responsibility,  and  we  take  it 
very seriously. And with this layered vetting process that I just de-
scribed,  we’ve  got  the  appropriate  checks  and  balances  to  make 
sure that we’re hiring the right people. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Klein? 
Dr.  KLEIN.  Yes,  in  the  case  I—I  can’t  speak  globally  for  the  in-
dustry. What I can say is, in the case I referred to with the young 
girl—in that case, what came out through depositions was that this 
worker—I believe he was from Honduras—was hired through a re-
cruiting  agent  who  had  a  quota  to  meet.  That  recruiting  agent  is 
the  one  who  certified  and  arranged  for  the  letters  saying  that  he 
was  a  safe  employee.  If  these—our  understanding  was  that  if  the 
recruiting  agent  didn’t  meet  their  quota,  they  would  lose  the  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

51 

tract.  So,  there  was  pressure  to  certify  people  to  fill  the  numbers. 
And again, the police report that was given was given under a dif-
ferent  name  than  the  name  on  the  passport  that  he  was  working 
under on the ship. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Senator KERRY. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator Carper? 
Senator CARPER. Thank you all. 
Sometimes  when  I  ponder  how  to  resolve  or  address  particular 
problems  or  issues  or  concerns,  I  try  to  think  of  how  we  can  har-
ness  market  forces  to  change  behavior  so  that,  in  this  case,  people 
would  be  safer  on  these  ships.  One  of  the  ways  to  make  sure  that 
people  are  safer  would  be  for  the  folks  who  provide  the  services— 
the  cruises,  if  you  will—know  that  there  is  a  financial  reward,  an 
economic  reward  for  them  for  providing  very  safe  vacations,  and 
that there’s a financial or an economic penalty if they do not. 

Let me just ask our witnesses to tell me how we are doing—how 
we  are  using—how  we  are  harnessing  market  forces  to  better  pro-
tect  the  safety  of  customers—consumers  on  these  cruises.  What  is 
being  done  that  actually  harnesses  those  market  forces?  And  what 
more could be done? 

Mr. CARVER. Well, let me respond to that. Clearly—— 
Senator  CARPER.  If  I’m  a  cruiseliner  and  I  know  I’m  going  to 
make  more  money  because  I  provide  excellent  safety  for  my  pas-
sengers,  that’s  a  great  incentive  for  you  to  make  sure  that  we  get 
it. 

Mr. CARVER. Well—— 
Senator  CARPER.  If  I  know  I’m  going  to  be  penalized,  that’s  a 

great incentive for me, as well. 

Mr. CARVER. I was with Terry, about 5 or 6 weeks ago in Miami, 
and  I  made  a  statement  at  that  meeting,  which  I  don’t  think  was 
accepted,  but  I  said,  ‘‘You  know,  you  would  be  smart,  from  a  busi-
ness  standpoint,  if  you  accepted  the  proposals  that  international 
cruise victims have made.’’ In other words, independent security on 
the  cruise  ships—there’s  a  whole  list  of  things  that  are  shown  on 
the  documents.  It  would  be  good  for  business.  Then  people  know 
that, you know, they’re going to be safer on a cruise ship. 

Now,  why  would  a  cruise  line  industry  propose  not  to  go  to  cer-
tain California ports, if their crime rates are so low, if one security 
person  is  put  on  that  ship?  Now,  I  just  find  that  a  little  hard  to 
understand  how  that  could  be  a  reaction.  To  me,  the  reaction  is, 
that  would  be  good  for  business.  People  in  California  would  say, 
‘‘Gee,  I  know  there’s  independent  security  on  that  ship.  I  feel 
safer.’’ And yet, they have threatened certain California ports—San 
Francisco,  San  Diego—with  going  on  a  ship,  that  they  won’t  stop 
at their ports if they do that. And I think that’s a—to me, accepting 
our  proposals  would  be  a  tremendous  plus  for  their  business.  I’ve 
said that from the beginning. 

In  2006,  when  we  introduced  our  ten-point  program,  I  went  up 
to  Michael  Crye,  who  then  ran  the  trade  association,  and  I  said, 
‘‘Michael,  if  you  were  smart,  you’d  work  with  us.’’  And  that’s—— 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. Thank you, sir. 
Ms. Fortier? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

52 

Ms. FORTIER. Well, I think the negative attention to the industry 
in  recent  articles  have  really  focused  the  spotlight  on  them  and 
what are they doing to ensure passenger safety. So, we approached 
Royal Caribbean, which is one of the largest cruise companies, and 
suggested  to  them  that  they  work  with  us  to  find  a  way  for  us  to 
link passengers who are onboard to our hotlines. And initially they 
were  very  receptive,  and  we’re  continuing  to  talk  to  them  about 
ways  to  do  that.  And  I  don’t  think  that  would  have  happened  un-
less  people  like  Ken  had  brought  attention  to  the  problem  of  sex-
ual-assault  and  missing-person  cases.  So,  that  is  an  example  of 
them responding in a way that’s in their self-interest, I think. And 
we’re  hopeful  that—we’ll  continue  to  work  with  them  on  that  pro-
posal, in which we would establish a dedicated hotline number, ac-
cessible  by  those  traveling  on  ships,  through  which  our  trained 
staff  would  be  available  24/7  to  aid  victims  of  sexual  violence  and 
so that people could also log on to our online hotline from the ship. 
We would need, in order to implement this, to train personnel to 
respond  to  the  unique  needs  of  cruise  victims,  because  the  typical 
victim  who  contacts  us  is—in,  you  know,  say,  Wilmington,  Dela-
ware, and we will find a way for a rape crisis center in Wilmington 
to  respond  to  that  person  and  help  them.  Someone  who’s  on  a 
cruise  ship  is  going  to  need  information  about  how  to  get  in  touch 
with  the  FBI,  the  State  Department,  and  so  forth.  So,  they’ll  have 
different needs. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you, Ms. Fortier. 
I’m going to jump to Dr. Klein and, if we have time, back to Mr. 

Dale, please. 

Dr.  KLEIN.  OK.  I  think  the  issue  of  market  forces  is  a  very  im-
portant issue, and I think that the amendment to the Coast Guard 
reauthorization bill introduced by Matsui, Shays, Poe, and Maloney 
really  gets  at  that  point,  in  terms  of  not  just  the  requirement  to 
report,  but  that  that  reporting  be  displayed  publicly,  quarterly,  by 
each cruise line. 

Now,  I  personally  would  take  that  a  step  further.  If  you  look  at 
pages  5  and  6  of  my  written  testimony,  what  you’ll  see  is  a  table 
that breaks down, for Royal Caribbean, the incidence of sex-related 
incidents by ship, and you’ll see on there that one ship, at the bot-
tom, has 10.75 incidents per 100,000, the worst ship in the fleet is 
208  per  100,000.  As  a  passenger,  I’d  want  to  know,  by  ship,  which 
ships were relatively safer and relatively less safe than others. And 
I believe that’s how we get market forces to work, that when a pas-
senger  knows  that,  ‘‘I  can  go  on  a  ship  that  has  a  20-fold  greater 
chance  of  being  sexually  assaulted,  I’m  not  going  to  choose  that 
ship, I’m going to choose another.’’ 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Mr. Dale, not long ago, my family—in fact, over spring break, my 
two sons, whom the Chairman has met—one was out of college for 
spring  break,  and  the  other  was  out  of  high  school—we  were  talk-
ing  about  where  we  were  going  to  go  for  that  week.  And  we’d 
talked  about  going  on  a  cruise,  but  it  didn’t  work  out,  and  we 
ended  up  looking  for  a  hotel.  And  our  boys  said,  ‘‘We’d  like  to  go 
to  a  beach  hotel  so  we  could  walk  right  out  the  front  door  of  the 
hotel and be right on the beach in someplace that was warm.’’ One 
of them goes to a school up in, as the Chairman knows, in Boston. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

53 

And my wife and I got on the Internet, and we looked at the mem-
ber services, where they provide information about hotels, and one 
of the interesting things we found was on the hotels, you could find 
out favorable comments about the hotel and unfavorable comments 
about  the  hotel.  As  it  turns  out,  that  was  one  of  the  most  helpful 
things for us to read about, like about their food and about the fit-
ness facilities and everything, the proximity to the beach. 

I would imagine, if I were looking for cruise ships, and I’m look-
ing  at  comments  by  folks,  and  they  say,  ‘‘Well,  you  know,  my 
daughter was raped on’’—that would be a pretty big signal to a lot 
of people that I don’t want to be on that ship, or I don’t want some-
one  in  my  family  to  be  on  that  ship.  Do  we  ever  have  that  kind 
of  disclosure  or  the  opportunity  for  customers  to  say  what  they 
liked about their cruise or what they found a shortcoming? 

Mr. Dale, I don’t know if you want to respond to that, or anybody 

Mr. DALE. Sure. Sure. I would like to clarify something that—— 
Senator  CARPER.  Just  do  so  quickly,  I’m  almost  out  of  time.  Do 

else. 

that quickly. 

Mr. CARVER. Yes. 
Senator CARPER.Very quickly. 
Mr. DALE. Ken indicated that the cruise industry had threatened 
ports  in  California  by  potentially  withdrawing  our  business.  In  no 
way, shape, or form have we made those types of statements. 

Senator CARPER. OK, thank you. 
Mr.  DALE.  Yes.  And  I  would  like  to  say  that  90  percent  of  all 
cruise vacations today are sold by travel agents, and consumers go 
to travel agents because this is not a commodity, it’s a very unique 
purchase—the  demographics  on  the  ships,  the  destinations  that 
they visit, the amenities on the ship. So, that travel agent, of which 
we’ve  got  over  16,000,  is  the  connection  between  the  industry  and 
the  consumer  in  providing  them  with  guidance  on  what  the  ships 
are like and the kind of vacation experience. So, we work with the 
travel agents and they are our connection with the customers. 

Senator CARPER. Anyone else on that one? 
Dr. KLEIN. Could I say something? 
Senator CARPER. Yes, Dr. Klein? 
Dr. KLEIN. Yes. I think the—I’m not sure it’s the board you were 
looking  at,  but  I  think  a  board  like  Trip  Advisor  gives  you  the  in-
formation  about  individual  properties.  While  there  are  discussion 
boards  about  the  cruise  industry  and  about  individual  ships,  none 
of them are as comprehensive and as insightful as the kind of data 
that  Trip  Advisor  makes  available  with  regard  to  hotels  and  re-
sorts. 

Senator  CARPER.  All  right.  All  right.  I  have  a  number  of  other 
questions, Mr. Chairman. You’ve been very generous with the time. 
And  my  other  questions,  I’ll  just  file  for  the  record,  if  I  could  but 
a  lot  of  them  relate  to  expectations,  the  expectations  that  people 
have  as  they  consider  a  cruise,  particularly  expectations  that  they 
should  have,  paying  that  kind  of  money,  for  their  personal  safety. 
And I would appreciate—most of the questions are directed to you, 
Mr.  Dale,  and  I  would  appreciate  your  responding  to  those,  as  ap-
propriate. And in one instance, they’re to the whole panel. 

Thank you, again, very much for being with us today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

54 

ciate it. 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Carper.  I  appre-

Mr.  Dale,  let  me  just  ask  you,  Why  not  just  implement  Mr. 
Carver’s  and  Ms.  Fortier’s  and  CLIA’s  and  other  people’s  sugges-
tions? What’s the resistance to it? 

Mr. DALE. Well, there’s no resistance. We’ve—— 
Senator KERRY. Why not just—— 
Mr. DALE. We’ve had an—— 
Senator KERRY. Why not just accept them? 
Mr. DALE.—opportunity—— 
Senator  KERRY.  But,  I  mean,  here  we  are,  several  years  later. 

There must be some resistance. 

Mr. DALE. Yes, the—— 
Senator  KERRY.  I  mean,  do  you  have  peepholes  in  the  doors?  Do 
you  have  a  trained  person  onboard  who  is  fully  forensically  quali-
fied? 

Mr. DALE. And the answer is yes. And—— 
Senator KERRY. Fully forensically qualified on every ship? 
Mr.  DALE.  We  have  complete  training  that  we  do  with  the  FBI 
and  the  Coast  Guard.  As  I  referenced,  the  training  DVD  that  has 
been put in place by the FBI, they actively participate in the train-
ing of our—— 

Senator KERRY. When was that—— 
Mr. DALE.—security officers—— 
Senator KERRY.—put into place? 
Mr.  DALE.  Well,  that  training  has  been  in  place  for  over  a  dec-

ade—— 

Senator KERRY. Well, then what happened to—— 
Mr. DALE.—and we continue enhance—— 
Senator KERRY.—what happened in the situation Ms. Fortier de-
scribed, when everybody comes in and sits down on the bed, barely 
knows  what  to  ask?  I  mean,  that  doesn’t  describe  to  me  anybody 
following any correct procedure. 

Was there a forensic officer, Ms. Fortier? 
Ms.  FORTIER.  I  believe  medical  personnel  were  used  to—were 
consulted. Ms. Dishman is here and could respond directly to that. 
But,  my  understanding  is  that  she  was  asked  to  pay  for  her  own 
rape  kit  on  the  ship,  which  wouldn’t  happen  at  any  U.S.  hospital 
if you were a rape victim and you had agreed to report and cooper-
ate with law enforcement. 

Senator  KERRY.  Do  you  know  what  the  sequence  was,  in  terms 

of timeliness and—— 

Ms.  FORTIER.  My  understanding  is  that  after  the  incident,  she 
contacted her friend, and then the two of them reached out to ship 
personnel,  and  she  was  interviewed  first,  before  she  received  med-
ical care. That’s my understanding. 

Senator  KERRY.  Did  she  identify  the  person  who  raped  her  to 

Ms. FORTIER. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. What happened to that person? 
Ms.  FORTIER.  She  indicated  that  time  passed  and  he—I  believe 

he continued to work on the ship. 

Senator KERRY. Was that person arrested? Was he put in solitary 

confinement? 

them? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

55 

Ms. FORTIER. No. He wasn’t. 
Senator KERRY. Did anything occur? 
Ms. FORTIER. Um—— 
Senator  KERRY.  I  mean,  normally,  in  a  local  jurisdiction,  if  a 
woman  was  raped,  and  she  said,  ‘‘This  is  the  guy  who  did  it,’’  the 
guy gets arrested. 

Ms. FORTIER. Correct. 
Senator  KERRY.  So,  what  are  we  talking  about  here,  Mr.  Dale? 
Mr.  DALE.  Yes,  let  me  just  share  with  you  what  I  can.  Ten  FBI 
agents  boarded  the  ship,  conducted  a  thorough  interview  process. 
They polygraphed the perpetrator. And, at the end of the day, they 
presented  the  information  from  those  ten  FBI  investigators.  Over 
20 interviews were conducted. And the United States Attorneys Of-
fice  determined  that  it  was  consensual  and  did  not  decide  to  pro-
ceed with the case. 

Ms. FORTIER. May I just respond? Often in these incidents, some 
time  elapses  between  when  the  victim  reports  and  the  FBI  boards 
the  ship,  because  the  FBI  can’t  immediately  come  on  the  ship  and 
act like an onboard police force. So, in that time, the industry may 
have  their  own  lawyer  come  onboard  and  talk  to  the  person  who’s 
accused who works for them, before any FBI personnel can conduct 
any sort of interview. So, this—the FBI isn’t immediately respond-
ing,  you  know,  within  an  hour  after  the  rape.  They’re—days  could 
pass before it actually—— 

Dr.  KLEIN.  Also,  I  don’t  think  that  the  FBI  said  ‘‘consensual.’’ 

What they said was that it was a ‘‘he-said/she-said’’ situation. 

Mr. CARVER. May I make a—— 
Senator KERRY. Yes, Mr. Carver—— 
Mr. CARVER.—comment? 
Senator KERRY.—I was about to ask you, How do you respond to 
what  Mr.  Dale  is  saying  with  respect  to  the  procedures  put  in 
place? 

Mr.  CARVER.  OK.  Let’s  look  at  current  procedures  if  a  woman  is 
raped  on  a  ship.  In  my  documents,  we  say—the  cruise  lines  say, 
‘‘We  do  not  investigate  crimes.  We’re  not  equipped  to  do  so.’’ 
They’ve put that in writing. ‘‘We call the FBI.’’ Well, there’s a tele-
vision  show  that  was  done,  broadcast  last  December—or  last  No-
vember, by Canadian network W5. It’s their equivalent of ‘‘60 Min-
utes.’’  It’s  on  our  website.  And  Mr.  Gary  Bald,  who  is  former  FBI, 
was interviewed in that particular show. 

So,  a  woman  comes  to  him—and  they  say,  ‘‘What  happens  if  a 
woman  comes  to  you  and  is—says  she’s  been  raped?’’  Well,  to  me, 
the proper answer would be, ‘‘We seal the room, we give the woman 
comfort,  and  we  call  the  FBI.’’  That’s  what  our  statement  is.  But, 
in fact, I’m going to read to you from the testimony, which you can 
see on live television. He says, ‘‘The first thing we do is determine, 
Was  it  a  valid  claim?  Some  women  claim  they  were  sexually  as-
saulted  and  they  were  not.  Others  claim  they  were  sexually  as-
saulted and there’s a confusion of whether or not it was consented 
or  a  different  consent.  And  then,  there’s  a  third  category,  poten-
tially, when someone was sexually assaulted, where there’s dispute 
as  to  whether  or  not  they  even  had  sexual  relations.’’  In  other 
words,  he  is  asking  these  questions  of  a  woman  that  came  in  that 
was raped. He shouldn’t be asking those questions. He should seal 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

56 

the  room,  give  comfort  to  the  individual,  call  the  FBI  in.  Because 
the most important interrogation is the first one. 

Senator KERRY. Who was asking those questions? 
Mr.  CARVER.  Gary  Bald,  chief  of  security  for  Royal  Caribbean. 
And  this  was—this  is  on  television.  It’s  on  our  website.  So,  in  ef-
fect, he’s working for risk management. He’s going in there, trying 
to  figure  out,  ‘‘Well,  is  this  really  a  claim?’’  instead  of  turning  it 
over  to  the  FBI;  so  that  by  the  time  the  FBI  gets  there,  several 
days later, this woman has been worked over by—— 

Senator  KERRY.  What  would  his  qualifications  be?  What 

would—— 

Mr.  DALE.  Actually,  that’s  a  very  good  question.  Mr.  Bald  is  the 
former  number-three-ranking  FBI  official,  and  is,  today,  head  of 
corporate security, global security for Royal Caribbean. 

Senator KERRY. As the head of corporate security with respect to 
ships,  what  sort  of  powers  does  he  have  at  sea  under—in  that  au-
thority, in that position? 

Mr.  DALE.  Under  his  staff,  he  has  the  corporate  security  officer 
on that ship, as well as the security staff supporting the chief secu-
rity officer on that ship. 

Senator KERRY. But, he’s—— 
Mr. DALE. And he’s—— 
Senator KERRY.—he’s a corporate security officer, correct? 
Mr. DALE. Mr. Bald, yes. 
Senator KERRY. Right. 
Mr. DALE. But, he’s—— 
Senator KERRY. I’m just trying to understand the legalities here, 
and  how  one  might  set  up  a  structure  where  the  law,  as  it  will  be 
applied in a court, is, sort of, fully sequential, appropriately. 

Mr. DALE. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.  I’m  not  doubting  his  experience  or  doubting  his 
qualifications,  but  if  you  don’t  have  a  codification,  if  you  will,  of  a 
process,  then  he  winds  up—inadvertently,  perhaps—but,  he  winds 
up  being,  really,  the  corporate  representative,  not  the  representa-
tive, neutrally, of the law as it would be applied, were that a police 
officer  appropriately  investigating  in  a  local  jurisdiction.  So,  I’m 
trying to understand exactly what his jurisdiction is. 

Mr. DALE. Right. The first responsibility—— 
Senator KERRY. Can he arrest? 
Mr. DALE.—is to make sure that we immediately—— 
Senator KERRY. Does he have—— 
Mr. DALE.—contact—— 
Senator KERRY.—the power of arrest? 
Mr.  DALE.  I  am  not  a  maritime  attorney  and  can’t  answer  that. 
We contact, immediately, the FBI and the appropriate law enforce-
ment  agencies,  and  take  their  direction.  And  if  they  direct  us  to 
take  an—a  perpetrator,  or  potential,  and  have  that  person,  you 
know—— 

Senator KERRY. But, you see the—— 
Mr. DALE.—quarantined—— 
Senator KERRY.—you see the confusion here, don’t you, Mr. Dale? 
I  mean,  it  seems  to  me  that  we’re  sort  of  in  a  limbo,  in  a  kind  of 
murky area here. And the question that I would ask, which I think 
a lot of people are asking—Mr. Carver and others—and I think it’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

57 

sort of leaping out at me—Why not work with us and try to codify 
something  that  works  for  you,  works  for  people,  so  there’s  a  real 
process  and  procedure  in  place?  Because  right  now  there  isn’t. 
There is really an absence of a clarity to the jurisdictional question. 
Mr. DALE. Well, we do have a process in place, and we’ve worked 
with  the  FBI  in  creating,  ‘‘What  do  initial  responders  do?’’  making 
sure that have a female assistant immediately brought to that indi-
vidual who is in need, so that her needs are emotionally and phys-
ically  being  taken  care  of.  So,  there  is  a  process  and  a  struc-
ture—— 

Senator KERRY. That person was—— 
Mr. DALE.—at the—— 
Senator KERRY.—trained where and how? 
Mr.  DALE.  Many  of  our  cruise-line  members  have  developed  a 
partnership  with  the  Family  Assistance  Foundation,  Dr.  Carolyn 
Coarsey—— 

Senator KERRY. Are they—— 
Mr. DALE.—is the head of that. 
Senator KERRY.—in the guest care services department? 
Mr. DALE. Yes, they are. And—— 
Senator  KERRY.  But,  guest-care  services  is  quite  different  from 
law  enforcement  process,  you  know,  a  victim  witness  assistance.  I 
started—— 

Mr. DALE. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.—one  of  the  first  victim  witness  programs  in  the 
country  when  I  was  managing  one  of  our  ten  largest  DA’s  offices, 
and  we—we  were  breaking  new  ground  on  how  you  do  this.  And 
it’s enormously complicated, and it’s not a guest-care service, it’s a 
law enforcement role. 
Mr. DALE. Well—— 
Senator KERRY. I mean, the question is whether or not we would 
be better off having a very specific set of requirements about juris-
diction  and  enforcement  which  would  act  as  a  deterrent.  It  seems 
to me it would only help the cruise industry for people to know that 
this is not an invitation place to come and commit a crime because 
there’s  an  absence  of  protocol  and  procedure,  this  is  a  place  where 
there’s a very clear and strict standard of expectations of what hap-
pens if a crime is committed. 

Mr.  DALE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’d  be  happy  to  have  our  maritime 
counsel  and  others  follow  up  on  this  dialogue  that  you’d  like  to 
have. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  think  it  would  be  worthwhile.  I  don’t 

think this should be adversarial. 

Mr. DALE. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.  I  think  this  ought  to  be  positive  and  helpful.  I 
mean,  I  think  the  cruise  industry  is  a  great  industry,  and  I  think 
that,  you  know,  lots  and  lots  of  people  go  out  and  have  an  abso-
lutely  wonderful  time.  And  it  would  be  odd  if  there  wasn’t  some 
crime  occasionally.  I  mean,  this  is  the  nature  of  the  world.  People 
go on vacations in plenty of places, and terrible things happen. 

I  think  that  the  key  here  is,  we’re  not  trying  to  single  you  out 
as somehow, an aberration, in terms of what happens, it’s just that 
there is an oddity with respect to the flagging and legal standards 
with  respect  to  the  high  seas.  There  always  has  been.  And  I  think 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

58 

we’re trying to bring it in to some kind of a place where people will 
not have the kinds of experiences that Mr. Carver had. 

I assume you’d have to admit that it’s a pretty jarring and tough 

kind of process to go through. 

Mr. DALE. Absolutely. And I’ve said to Ken, many times, and our 
family members who work with us on our working group, that, you 
know,  we  deeply  regret  when  an  incident  takes  place  on  our  ship. 
And  have  we  been  perfect  as  an  industry?  We  have  not.  But,  we 
are  taking  everything  we  can  to  make  sure  that  we  manage  this 
situation with compassionate care. And—— 

Senator  KERRY.  But,  wouldn’t  it  make  sense,  do  you  think,  Mr. 
Dale, I mean, what is the law enforcement structure that currently 
exists now on a cruise ship? 

Mr.  DALE.  Well,  again,  I’d  go  back  that  there  is  a  chief  security 
officer for each ship, and then, they have appropriate security staff 
that work with them, and at—and that varies, because—— 

Senator KERRY. Would it be helpful if you had a specific legal au-
thority,  and  you  had  people  who  met  a  specific  standard?  Since 
you’re  hiring  them  anyway,  and  you’re  paying  a  certain  amount  of 
money to have what you consider to be a law enforcement staff on-
board,  wouldn’t  it  be  better  off  if  there  was  a  specific  authority 
under  which  they  operate  and  a  specific  set  of  procedures  worked 
on,  let’s  say,  between  the  FBI  and  maritime  folks,  so  that  we  are 
in keeping with maritime law, we don’t—— 

Mr. DALE. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.—but,  on  the  other  hand,  there  are  absolute  ex-
pectations  of  how  the  protocol  is  going  to  be  carried  out  in  the 
event of some kind of crime? 

Mr. DALE. And we do have those guidelines in place. And, again, 

this relationship—— 

Senator KERRY. Right, but they’re—— 
Mr. DALE.—that we have—— 
Senator KERRY.—guidelines, they’re not—— 
Mr. DALE. Well—— 
Senator KERRY.—a sort of standardized guideline. 
Mr.  DALE.  If  I  might  point  out,  Mr.  Senator,  for  over  a  decade 
we have had a security committee, and that committee meets every 
60  days,  and,  as  part  of  that  meeting,  we  have  the  FBI,  the  Coast 
Guard,  Homeland  Security,  the  Navy,  CBP,  all  the  Federal  agen-
cies that we work closely with, because we all share the same goal. 

Senator KERRY. Absolutely. 
Mr. DALE. We want to provide the safest vacation—— 
Senator  KERRY.  I  don’t  question  that,  which  is  why  I  think  this 
shouldn’t be as complicated as it is appearing to be. It seems to me 
it  ought  to  be  pretty  easy  to  get  everybody  around  the  table  and 
say, ‘‘Look, we all serve the public.’’ 

Mr. DALE. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  ‘‘How  do  we  give  the  public  an  assurance,  here, 
that this is working for them?’’ That’s all it is. It seems to me, rath-
er than be hauled up here to sit in front of a Committee and asked 
why  this  has  happened  X  number  of  times,  we’d  all  be  better  off 
if we did that. 

Mr. DALE. We’re very willing to have that discussion. Absolutely. 
Senator KERRY. Yes, Mr. Carver? We’ve got to wrap this—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

59 

Mr. CARVER. Yes. 
Senator KERRY.—up in a moment, because—— 
Mr.  CARVER.  Well,  I  just  want  to  go  to  the  Mindy  Jordan  case, 
which happened a month ago. And Emily Ball is here, representing 
the  family.  Here,  a  woman  went  missing  off  a  cruise  ship  at  8 
o’clock  at  night  under  mysterious  circumstances.  She  was  in  an 
abusive  relationship  with  her  friend.  It  wasn’t  for  15  hours,  until 
11  o’clock  the  next  morning,  before  the  boyfriend  finally  called  the 
mother.  Now,  the  mother  was  listed  as  the  number-one  contact, 
and  the  cruise  line  chose  not  to  contact  the  mother  for  15  hours. 
Only  the  boyfriend.  And,  as  I  understand  it—I’ve  talked  to  the 
mother several times—she’s gotten three different stories. Then the 
FBI enters the scene—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Isn’t  there  photograph  evidence  with  respect  to 

what happened in that case? 

Mr. CARVER. Well, the answer is, there was videotape that came 

Senator  KERRY.  That  she  was  climbing  from  one  balcony  to  an-

out. 

other. 

making. 

Mr.  CARVER.  The  cruise  line’s—well,  we  don’t—know  what  hap-
pened.  And—but,  the  cruise  line  quickly  got  that  out.  There’s  a 
video  her  going  overboard.  But,  the  FBI  has  come  in  and  clearly 
said  the  case  is  not  closed,  that  that  is  an  open  case.  But,  what 
they’d  like  to  do  is  get  something  out  that  there  was  a  video.  But, 
the FBI is under—investigating the case very carefully. 

But,  the  issue  I’m  getting  at  was,  the  FBI  didn’t  show  up  until 
3  days  later.  Any  evidence  on  that  porch  where  she  was,  the  bal-
cony, would have been washed away. They were in a storm. There 
was  no  security  on  that  board  to  step  in  and  immediately  take  ac-
tion. And—— 

Senator KERRY. Well, I think that underscores the point that I’m 

Mr. CARVER. No, that’s exactly right. 
Senator KERRY. But, I also sense that Mr. Dale is prepared—and 
I  know  some  of  the  people  in  the  industry;  I  think  they’re  inter-
ested in making the industry successful and in—— 

Mr. CARVER. You know something? I agree with that 100 percent, 
except we have met with them time after time after time to discuss 
these proposals, and we’ve gotten zero response out of them. 

Senator KERRY. Let me see what we can do as we consider some 

kind of sensible legislation, and maybe there’s a—— 

Mr. CARVER. Yes. 
Senator KERRY.—you know, competently—— 
Mr. CARVER. I accept—I’ll meet forever. 
Senator KERRY. Yes. 
Mr.  CARVER.  But,  our  meetings,  so  far,  have  not  produced  re-

Senator KERRY. Well, Mr. Dale, what do you think? Do you think 

we can get some results? 

Mr. DALE. Well, absolutely. And we have made results. 
And,  of  course,  I’m  disappointed  when  I  hear  Ken  characterize 
the  work  that  we’ve  done—I  take  it  very  personally.  I  chair  those 
meetings. Every one of our family members who serve has my per-
sonal  cell  phone  number.  I  received  a  call  on  Thanksgiving  night 

sults. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

60 

from  one  of  our  family  members  who  needed  assistance,  and  I  got 
it for them immediately. 

I  am  committed  to  this.  Our  industry  is  committed  to  this.  And 
I  would  just  like  to  go  on  record  as  saying  I  thank  you  for  holding 
this hearing today and working with us. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  think  there’s  a  much  better  way  to  actu-
ally  serve  everybody  here,  frankly.  I  don’t  think  this  is  as  com-
plicated as somehow it’s being made out to be. 

I’m not sure what your security budget is right now, but I imag-
ine  it’s  pretty  hefty.  And  I  can’t  imagine  that  you  don’t  have  a  lot 
of pretty-trained personnel. But, I think they’re operating within a 
framework that has a lack of clarity, to be honest with you, I think 
if we were to all agree on how you establish that, I think you guys 
would  come  out  of  this  much  better.  I  am  absolutely  certain  that 
citizens would be the—you know, public interest would be far more 
effectively served. 

So, why don’t we agree to try to work on that and I think every-
body would be better served. And I’ll try to make sure we convene 
something and try to move down that road so we don’t let a lot of— 
I was going to say moss grow under our feet, but I probably ought 
to say seaweed. 

Mr. DALE. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  But,  we’ll  get  at  this  and  see  what  we  can  do. 
I’m going to leave the record open in case colleagues on the Com-
mittee have some additional questions they want to submit in writ-
ing, and we will submit a few on the statistical piece. 

But,  I  don’t  think  this  is,  frankly,  an  issue  of  the  statistics,  to 
be honest with you. I think the statistics are whatever the variance 
is in them, I think everybody accepts we want to try to minimize— 
the  incidents  and  maximize  the  response  capacity.  So,  if  we  all 
meet  in  good  faith  in  an  effort  to  do  that,  I  would  hope  we  ought 
to be able to come up with something sensible. 

Mr. DALE. Thank you. 
Senator KERRY. So, let’s try to do that. 
And  we’ll  stand  adjourned.  I  thank  you  all  for  coming  today. 

Thank you. 

[Whereupon, at 11:40 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIEL D. ROBERTS, DEPUTY ASSISTANT DIRECTOR, 

FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION 

Good  morning  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith  and  Members  of 
the  Subcommittee.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  an  update  on  the  FBI’s 
work  with  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  the  cruise  line  industry  and  the  victims  of  cruise 
line crime regarding crime aboard cruise ships. 
Reporting Agreement 

In March 2007, the FBI, the U.S. Coast Guard and the Cruise Lines International 
Association  (CLIA)  reached  an  agreement  on  voluntary,  standardized  protocols  for 
CLIA member lines to report allegations of serious violations of U.S. law committed 
aboard  cruise  ships.  These  reporting  procedures  are  in  addition  to,  but  not  in  lieu 
of, mandatory, codified reporting requirements (e.g., the requirements of 46 Code of 
Federal Regulations (CFR) Part 4, and the requirements of 33 CFR Part 120). Fur-
ther,  this  reporting  does  not  replace  or  override  any  agency  responsibilities  and  co-
ordination mandated by the Maritime Operational Threat Response Plan. 
Incident Statistics 

Pursuant to the agreement, on April 1, 2007, the FBI began collecting and track-
ing  the  incident  reports  submitted  by  CLIA  member  lines.  I  would  like  to  take  a 
few  minutes  to  report  on  the  results  of  this  effort.  Through  May  31,  2008,  the  FBI 
received  522  reports  from  CLIA  members.  Many  of  these  matters  did  not  require 
criminal  investigation  and  as  such,  should  be  viewed  as  ‘‘incident  reports’’  not 
‘‘crime  reports.’’  For  example,  there  were  reports  received  of  civil  matters  and  inci-
dents in which individuals did not re-board the ship for various reasons, which were 
not criminal in nature. 

Incidents  on  board  ships  when  investigated  by  the  FBI  are  documented  through 
investigative  files  under  the  ‘‘Crimes  on  the  High  Seas’’  classification.  Of  the  522 
incident  reports,  the  FBI  opened  53  investigative  files.  This  number  is  consistent 
with  the  number  of  ‘‘Crimes  on  the  High  Seas’’  cases  opened  annually  for  the  past 
5 years. 

The agreement with CLIA and the U.S. Coast Guard lists eight categories of inci-
dents which are to be telephonically reported by CLIA members to the nearest FBI 
field office or Legal Attache´ office. These matters—homicide, suspicious death, miss-
ing U.S. national, kidnapping, assault with serious bodily injury, sexual assault, fir-
ing  or  tampering  with  vessels,  and  theft  greater  than  $10,000—involve  potentially 
serious violations of U.S. law and are to be called in to the FBI as soon as possible 
following the incident. After telephonic contact, CLIA members are instructed to fol-
low-up  with  a  standardized  written  report.  All  other,  less  serious  matters  are  re-
ported  under  a  general  ‘‘other’’  category  and  are  brought  to  the  FBI’s  attention  by 
submission of a written report. 

From April 1, 2007, through May 31, 2008, there have been no reports of homicide 
aboard  CLIA  member  ships.  There  was  one  report  of  suspicious  death  and  nine  re-
ports of missing U.S. nationals. Four of the missing U.S. nationals reports concerned 
individuals  who  voluntarily  disembarked  without  notifying  the  ship  and  were  lo-
cated at a later date. Five missing U.S. nationals reports involved passengers whose 
histories  of  depression  and  behavior  while  on  board  the  ship  strongly  indicate  the 
passenger may have committed suicide. 

There  have  been  27  reports  of  assaults  with  serious  bodily  injury.  The  FBI 
619opened 16 investigative cases on physical assault with serious bodily injury mat-
ters, 11 of which are currently ongoing. 

The  FBI  investigates  sexual  assaults  as  defined  in  Title  18  of  the  United  States 
Code (U.S.C.), Sections 2241 through 2243 and 2244(a) and (c). Since April 1, 2007, 
CLIA  has  reported  90  instances  of  sexual  assault.  Of  these  90  incidents,  49  rep-
resented  allegations  of  sexual  activity  generally  categorized  as  rape,  one  of  which 
occurred  on  shore  and,  thus,  outside  the  jurisdiction  of  the  FBI.  Based  on  the  90 

(61) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

62 

reports,  the  FBI  opened  34  investigative  cases.  Fourteen  of  these  cases  were  closed 
due  to  either  the  victim  not  wanting  to  pursue  charges,  lack  of  evidence  to  support 
the allegations or declinations from the United States Attorney’s Office. Twenty in-
vestigations are currently ongoing. 

During this period, there were 25 reported incidents of theft of more than $10,000. 
Of these 25 incidents, 15 involved jewelry, five involved cash, two involved miscella-
neous equipment, two involved theft from onboard shops and one involved food prod-
ucts. 

There was one report of firing or tampering with vessels. 
369  incident  reports  involved  less  serious  matters  which  are  reported  under  the 
category  entitled  ‘‘Other.’’  This  category  includes  simple  assault,  low-dollar  loss 
theft,  fraud,  suspicious  activity,  bomb  threats,  sexual  contact,  or  activity  that  was 
not  criminal  in  nature.  There  were  99  reports  of  sexual  contact,  as  defined  in  Title 
18 U.S.C., Section 2244(b), essentially uninvited touching of a sexual nature. There 
were  93  reports  of  simple  assault  to  include  punching,  slapping  or  pushing  actions. 
There were 111 reports involving theft of less than $10,000. 

FBI analysis of cruise ship crime reporting over the past year reflects the fact that 
many reports we have received during the first year of reporting fall outside of FBI 
jurisdiction,  do  not  constitute  crimes  under  U.S.  law,  or  are  less  serious  than  char-
acterized  by  the  cruise  lines.  Therefore,  it  is  my  belief  that  CLIA  member  cruise 
lines  are  generally  making  a  good  faith  effort  to  report  all  crimes,  or  allegations  of 
crime, set out under the agreement. 
Coordination  with  CLL4  and  the  International  Cruise  Victims’  Association 
I  would  like  to  briefly  update  the  Subcommittee  on  other  efforts  which  the  FBI 
has  undertaken  in  support  of  its  role  in  investigating  crimes  aboard  cruise  ships. 
Kendall  Carver,  President  of  the  International  Cruise  Victims  Association,  came  to 
FBI  Headquarters  in  July  2007,  accompanied  by  two  members  of  his  group.  My 
predecessor, former Deputy Assistant Director Salvatore Hernandez, met personally 
with  Mr.  Carver  and  his  associates  to  hear  their  concerns  and  to  explain  the  work 
being  done  by  the  Coast  Guard,  CLIA,  and  the  FBI  regarding  cruise  ship  crime  re-
porting. Over the past year, my associates at the FBI have met or spoken with CLIA 
and  the  Coast  Guard  regularly  to  check  progress  on  our  reporting  protocols  and  to 
refine  those  protocols  where  necessary.  FBI  representatives  regularly  attend  the 
Joint  Agency/Industry  Working  Group  on  Cruise  Ship  Security  and,  in  April  2008, 
the FBI provided a briefing on investigative protocol to the CLIA Survivor Working 
Group  Meeting  in  Miami,  Florida,  which  includes  representatives  of  the  Inter-
national Cruise Victims Association. 
Training 

Finally, I would like to address proactive steps being taken by the FBI and CLIA. 
When former Deputy Assistant Director Hernandez last testified on this issue before 
a  House  Subcommittee,  he  described  the  training  provided  by  the  FBI’s  Regional 
Evidence Response Teams (ERT) to cruise line staff captains and security managers 
over the last 3 years. The FBI’s Violent Crime Section, in conjunction with the ERT 
Unit  in  Quantico,  Virginia,  completed  a  universal  PowerPoint  presentation  entitled 
‘‘Cruise  Line  Crime  Scene  Preservation,’’  which  was  disseminated  to  the  cruise  line 
industry in January 2008. 

In closing, the FBI is committed to continuing its work with the cruise line indus-
try,  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  and  victims’  groups  to  ensure  full  reporting  of  crimes 
aboard cruise ships and to facilitate more effective first response to such crimes. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CAROLYN V. COARSEY, PH.D., CO-FOUNDER, 

FAMILY ASSISTANCE FOUNDATION, ATLANTA, GEORGIA 

Senator Kerry and Distinguished Members of the Committee, my name is Carolyn 
Coarsey  and  I  am  co-founder  of  the  Family  Assistance  Foundation.  My  doctoral  de-
gree  is  interdisciplinary,  combining  psychology  and  education,  with  a  specialty  in 
training employees on how to manage trauma in the workplace. 

I have come before you today to tell you about my work with the cruise industry. 
In  1985,  my  fiance´,  a  former  airline  executive  died  on  board  Delta  Air  Lines 
Flight  191,  a  crash  in  which  137  people  perished.  As  an  employee  working  in  the 
aviation industry at the time, I knew that there were people inside of the company 
who wanted to help, but they simply did not know how. 

At  that  time,  I  decided  to  enter  graduate  school  in  order  to  study  the  problem  of 
how  a  company  could  prepare  employees  to  respond  to  the  public  at  the  time  of  a 
disaster.  I  now  understood  the  problem  not  only  from  the  employee’s  perspective, 
but  from  the  family’s  perspective  as  well.  The  Civil  Aeromedical  Research  Division 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

63 

of the FAA (CAMI) sponsored my studies at the University of New Mexico. My doc-
toral  dissertation,  published  in  1992,  showed  a  clear  difference  in  passengers  re-
sponses  to  trauma  when  they  were  met  by  employees  who  handled  them  with  con-
cern,  empathy,  and  the  offer  of  support.  Survivors  who  felt  that  the  company  had 
done everything possible to help them following a traumatic event had significantly 
fewer  symptoms  of  five  psychological  disorders  that  are  most  often  associated  with 
trauma. That information formed the basis of the work that I do today. 

In 2000, a former airline executive and I co-founded the Family Assistance Foun-
dation  for  the  purpose  of  helping  organizations  provide  a  higher  level  of  response 
to  survivors  during  tragedies.  Our  mission  is  to  support  and  improve  business  and 
industry  responses  to  emergencies  and  disasters.  The  Foundation  takes  a  unique, 
research-based  approach  to  helping  organizations  successfully  meet  survivor’s  (cus-
tomers,  affected  families,  employees,  any  member  of  the  public  impacted)  needs  by 
coordinating and mobilizing resources during the acute phase of a crisis and beyond. 
The Foundation’s annual symposium provides member organizations, as well as sur-
vivors,  the  opportunity  to  share  lessons  learned  and  information  about  how  to  con-
tinually  improve  response  efforts  and  business  practices.  Foundation  education  and 
training programs support members by monitoring the long-term outcomes of those 
impacted  by  tragedy.  Promoting  awareness  and  building  skills  and  knowledge  for 
those  who  are  charged  with  responding  are  crucial  elements  of  the  Foundation’s 
fully integrated training and support programs for business and industry. 

The  Foundation  provides  education,  training,  and  organized  mutual  aid  at  the 
time  of  a  tragedy.  The  cornerstone  of  the  Foundation  is  to  promote  open  dialogue 
between  survivors  and  employee  helpers.  We  encourage  family  and  passenger  sur-
vivors to tell their stories in an educational format so that they can train employees 
on  what  is  needed  by  survivors  during  these  vulnerable  times.  Since  its  inception 
the  FAF  has  trained  thousands  of  employees  from  various  industries  including  air-
lines,  business  aviation,  rail,  industrial  and  the  cruise  lines.  We  now  employ  seven 
full time folks at our headquarters in Atlanta and have other facilitators in the UK 
and hundreds of other care volunteers around the world. 

In 2005, I began interviewing survivors of cruise line tragedies. Shortly thereafter, 
I  became  involved  in  developing  training  materials  for  the  cruise  industry.  I  also 
began  hosting  training  programs  based  on  interviews  that  I  was  conducting  with 
survivors. 

These interviews included family members of persons who had gone missing over-
board, family members of deceased passengers, and guests who had become involved 
in a tragedy while on a cruise ship. 

I have seen a very aggressive response by the cruise line industry to the problem 
of  empowering  employees  to  assist  survivors  in  a  time  of  crisis.  The  cruise  lines 
have  offered  many  different  training  programs  including  the  use  of  videotapes  and 
written  testimony.  I  have  personally  provided  awareness  education  to  more  than 
5,000  employees  in  the  cruise  line  industry.  I  have  trained  cruise  line  executives, 
Care  Teams,  telephone  responders,  employees  who  will  notify  the  next-of-kin  for 
guests  who  experience  tragedy  while  on  a  ship,  security  personnel,  safety  officers, 
deck  officers  and  other  on-board  staff.  The  goal  is  to  provide  a  substantial  level  of 
awareness  to  every  employee  who  might  interface  with  a  survivor  during  a  crisis. 
In  addition  to  the  cruise  industry’s  commitment  to  crew  training,  which  includes 
on-board  and  shore  side  guest  support,  they  have  also  entered  into  an  agreement 
with the Federal Bureau of Investigation and United States Coast Guard that clari-
fies  reporting  procedures  for  all  serious  violations  of  U.S.  law  that  occur  aboard 
cruise  ships.  Heightened  security  measures  are  standard  for  the  maritime  industry 
today,  and  cruise  line  passengers  go  through  screening  procedures  similar  to  those 
found  at  U.S.  airports,  which  include  the  use  of  metal  detectors,  baggage  scanning 
devices, and biometric verification machines. 

Currently,  I  am  developing  a  training  program  for  all  shipboard  employees  to  be 
presented  on  ships  that  includes  a  twenty-minute  video  of  survivors  speaking  di-
rectly  to  every  employee  who  may  encounter  them  during,  and  following,  a  crisis. 
The  program  also  features  a  90-minute  discussion  guide  that  can  be  presented  by 
shipboard  trainers  and  supervisors.  In  addition,  I  have  already  developed  a  4-hour 
module for leaders on ships (captains, physicians, nurses, hotel directors, and others 
who  are  in  charge  of  crew  and  passengers),  designed  to  help  them  understand  mis-
takes that have been made in the past and how to prevent similar problems in the 
future.  The  video-based  program  features  survivors  whose  loved  ones  have  gone 
missing  as  well  as  many  other  types  of  traumatic  situations,  where  the  trainees 
hear  directly  from  those  involved.  I  personally  presented  the  pilot  of  this  program 
on  14  ships  in  summer  of  2007  and  can  speak  to  the  effectiveness  of  this  training. 
In  addition  to  the  training,  in  May  2007  at  the  Foundation’s  annual  Symposium, 
we featured two panels on the subject of handling victims of trauma on cruise ships. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

64 

The  first  panel  involved  family  members  and  guests  who  had  survived  cruise  line 
tragedies  prior  to  this  robust  training  being  offered  by  the  industry.  The  second 
panel involved survivors of tragedies following the new programs. We saw a signifi-
cant  difference.  Survivors  from  the  second  panel  who  were  empowered  by  trained 
employees  and  offered  every  form  of  assistance  possible  were  still  healing  from  the 
loss of loved-ones, but they did not have to cope with anger and hostility. The second 
group  expressed  gratitude,  as  they  felt  validated  and  supported  by  the  representa-
tives of the cruise line. They knew that the people who had the most power to help 
them while they were most dependent and vulnerable had done everything possible 
to assist them during the tragedy. 

At  this  year’s  Foundation  Symposium,  we  hosted  five  more  cruise  line  survivors 
and families. The survivors praised the cruise lines for their heroic efforts and glad-
ly  participated  in  the  panel,  educating  others  on  the  importance  of  this  work.  We 
had two women whose loved ones had died while on a ship, a mother whose daugh-
ter  would  have  died  had  not  the  ship’s  crew  responded  as  they  did,  and  the  family 
of  a  baby  that  was  born  on  a  ship  weighing  less  than  two  pounds.  We  also  had  a 
presentation  by  a  man  who,  along  with  a  party  of  12,  was  accosted  at  gunpoint 
while on an excursion. He praised the responders and, as an example of how strong-
ly he felt about the way him and his friends were treated following the trauma, has 
already traveled on another cruise vacation. 

I know that the industry is listening and learning from survivors. I personally fa-
cilitated a meeting in August 2007, where industry officials met and listened to sur-
vivors.  Most  of  what  was  heard  was  from  survivors  who  were  very  upset  as  their 
experiences  occurred  before  the  industry  began  its  educational  efforts.  Despite  the 
unpleasantness  of  this  experience,  the  cruise  line  representatives  listened  and  did 
not  attempt  to  defend  their  actions.  They  have  learned  that  these  expressions  are 
part  of  the  healing  process,  and  that  providing  survivors  with  the  opportunity  to 
speak their mind will play a major role in their healing. 

True  change  begins  when  companies  empower  their  employees  to  empower  sur-
vivors  during  the  tragedy,  when  they  are  most  helpless.  This  can  only  be  done 
through  the  education  and  training  of  employees.  In  this  evolution  of  compassion 
consciousness, which we are experiencing today, I have never seen an industry take 
a more proactive approach to changing how its workforce responds to trauma in the 
workplace. 

I  regret  that  I  could  not  be  with  you  today,  but  I  appreciate  your  allowing  me 

to provide you with this information. 

At the Foundation, our interviews continue to show that when employees are em-
powered  to  help  survivors,  they  have  a  tremendous  opportunity  to  influence  how 
survivors  heal.  These  interviews  form  the  basis  of  all  training  programs  offered  by 
the  Foundation,  as  we  believe  the  true  experts  on  the  subject  of  how  best  to  assist 
survivors are the survivors themselves. 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE, FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION 

Washington, DC, June 19, 2008 

Hon. FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Chairman 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security, 

Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Mr. Chairman: 

I  am  writing  in  response  to  your  letter  dated  June  16,  2008,  seeking  information 
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) in support of the Subcommittee’s up-
coming hearing on cruise ship safety. 

I have attached a compilation of the most recent statistics on cruise ship criminal 
security  incidents  reported  to  the  FBI  since  April  1,  2007.  In  accordance  with  Fed-
eral  regulations  contained  in  Part  120  of  Title  33  of  the  Code  of  Federal  Regula-
tions,  passenger  vessels  covered  by  regulation  must  report  certain  incidents  to  the 
FBI.  These  include  each  breach  of  security,  unlawful  act,  or  threats  of  an  unlawful 
act against passenger vessels, or any person aboard, when such acts or threats occur 
in a place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. I hope you find the infor-
mation useful. 

Consistent  with  conversations  with  Subcommittee  staff,  I  regret  that  we  are  un-
able to provide a witness for the hearing and have offered a briefing at a later time 
should  the  Subcommittee  need  more  information.  Thank  you  for  your  interest  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

65 

FBI  operations  and  procedures.  Please  feel  free  to  contact  me  if  I  can  provide  fur-
ther assistance. 

Assistant Director, Office of Congressional Affairs 

RICHARD C. POWERS 

Enclosure 

The  following  statistics  are  based  on  incidents  reported  to  the  FBI.  These  num-

bers represent incidents that occurred between April 1, 2007 and April 30, 2008. 

Incident Type 

Number 
of Reports 

Percent 

Death—homicide 
Death—suspicious 
Missing U.S. National 
Kidnapping 
Assault with Serious Bodily Injury 
Sexual Assault 
Firing or Tampering with Vessels 
Theft >$10,000 
Other 

Total 

0 
1 
8 
0 
26 
83 
1 
24 
346 

489 

0% 
0% 
2% 
0% 
5% 
17% 
0% 
5% 
71% 

100% 

The following table provides an additional breakdown of the ‘‘Other’’ category: 

Incident Type 

Number 
of Reports 

Percent 

Other—Theft < $10,000 
Other—Simple Contact 
Other—Sexual Assault 
Other—Death* 
Other—No Re-board** 
Other—Miscellaneous 

104 
91 
86 
14 
7 
44 

30% 
26% 
25% 
4% 
2% 
13% 

Total 

100% 
* Of  the  fourteen  ‘‘Other—Death’’  incidents,  eight  are  natural  causes,  four  are  suicides,  and  two  are  acci-

346 

** Of  the  five  ‘‘Other—No  Re-board’’  incidents,  four  involve  crew  member  subjects  and  three  involve  pas-

dental. 

senger subjects. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

DANIEL D. ROBERTS 

Question  1.  In  your  testimony  you  state  that  of  the  522  incident  reports  between 
April 1, 2007 and May 31, 2008, the FBI opened 53 investigative files and that this 
number  is  consistent  with  the  number  of  ‘‘Crimes  on  the  High  Seas’’  cases  opened 
annually  for  the  past  5  years.  Please  provide  the  Committee  with  specific  statistics 
of  the  number  of  cases  reported  to  the  FBI  over  the  past  5  years  by  calendar  year, 
by  type,  and  the  number  of  criminal  violations  that  resulted  in  investigative  files. 
Please also provide, by calendar year, the result of the investigative files that were 
opened  and  their  current  status  such  as:  closed  due  to  insufficient  evidence,  closed 
due to unwillingness of the victim to pursue charges, pending litigation, closed with 
result in criminal prosecution etc. 

Answer.  The  FBI  cannot  provide  statistics  concerning  all  alleged  incidents  of 
‘‘crimes  on  the  high  seas’’  reported  over  the  past  5  years,  as  these  statistics  have 
not  been  tracked  over  this  period  of  time.  The  FBI  has  tracked  the  submissions  by 
the  cruise  lines  using  the  form  reporting  ‘‘Cruise  Line  Report  of  Serious  Violations 
of U.S. Law’’ since April 2007, and those figures were provided to the Subcommittee 
in June 2008 as noted in the question. 

The FBI’s records management system is generally able to produce statistics con-
cerning the number of cases opened in a given Fiscal Year (FY), as well as the cur-
rent  status  of  these  investigation  as  ‘‘pending’’  or  ‘‘closed.’’  With  respect  to  closed 
cases,  the  FBI  tracks  whether  the  case  was  closed  for  administrative  reasons,  due 
to a prosecutorial declination by the United States Attorney’s Office (USAO), or due 
to final adjudication of all legal proceedings in the matter. In both the ‘‘administra-
tive’’ and ‘‘declination’’ categories, a case may be closed for a number of reasons, in-
cluding  insufficient  evidence  or  the  unwillingness  of  the  victim  to  pursue  charges. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

66 

The specific circumstances of ‘‘administrative’’ or ‘‘declination’’ case closures are not 
tracked. 

Following are the available statistics by FY. 
• In  FY  2004,  the  FBI  opened  50  investigations  of  crimes  on  the  high  seas.  Of 
these cases, 1 is still pending, 34 were closed administratively, 12 were declined 
by the USAO, and 3 were closed following final adjudication. 
• In  FY  2005,  the  FBI  opened  41  investigations  of  crimes  on  the  high  seas.  Of 
these  cases,  3  are  still  pending,  22  were  closed  administratively,  12  were  de-
clined by the USAO, and 4 were closed following final adjudication. 
• In  FY  2006,  the  FBI  opened  53  investigations  of  crimes  on  the  high  seas.  Of 
these  cases,  10  are  still  pending,  23  were  closed  administratively,  11  were  de-
clined by the USAO, and 9 were closed following final adjudication. 
• In  FY  2007,  the  FBI  opened  55  investigations  of  crimes  on  the  high  seas.  Of 
these  cases,  14  are  still  pending,  20  were  closed  administratively,  18  were  de-
clined by the USAO, and 3 were closed following final adjudication. 
• In  FY  2008,  the  FBI  opened  49  investigations  of  crimes  on  the  high  seas.  Of 
these cases, 30 are still pending, 8 were closed administratively, 6 were declined 
by the USAO, and 5 were closed following final adjudication. 
• Through the end of October 2008, the FBI had opened 1 investigation of a crime 

on the high seas in FY 2009. 

Question  2.  In  your  statement  you  indicate:  ‘‘Since  April  1,  2007,  CLIA  has  re-
ported  90  instances  of  sexual  assault.  Of  these  90  incidents,  49  represented  allega-
tions of sexual activity generally categorized as rape, one of which occurred on shore 
and,  thus,  outside  the  jurisdiction  of  the  FBI.  Based  on  the  90  reports,  the  FBI 
opened 34 investigative cases. Fourteen of these cases were closed due to either the 
victim  not  wanting  to  pursue  charges,  lack  of  evidence  to  support  the  allegations 
or  declinations  from  the  United  States  Attorney’s  Office.  Twenty  investigations  are 
currently  ongoing.’’  Of  the  14  cases  closed,  how  many  of  those  were  due  to  lack  of 
evidence to support the allegations? 

Answer.  Since  April  1,  2007,  the  FBI  has  opened  34  investigations  based  on  sex-
ual assault reports by the Cruise Lines International Association. Although the FBI 
initially  reported  that  14  of  those  cases  had  been  closed,  in  fact  only  12  of  the  34 
cases  have  been  closed.  Of  these  12  closed  cases,  9  were  closed  upon  declination  by 
the  USAO  because  the  evidence  was  insufficient.  Three  of  the  12  cases  were  closed 
before submission to the USAO. Two of these cases were closed because the evidence 
was  insufficient  and  one  was  closed  administratively  and  referred  to  authorities  in 
the  Bahamas  after  investigation  determined  the  alleged  offense  had  occurred  in 
Freeport, Bahamas. 

Question 3. According to Terry Dale, the DVD you produced with the Cruise Lines 
International  Association  provides  instruction  on  initial  crime  scene  response,  in-
cluding securing the scene, taking crime scene photography, and collecting evidence. 
Do  you  believe  that  security  personnel  on  board  cruise  ships  should  be  involved  in 
crime  scene  evidence  collection  to  support  the  FBI?  Do  you  see  this  as  an  appro-
priate  and  helpful  role  for  the  security  personnel  on  board  cruise  ships  to  provide 
to the FBI? If evidence collection is conducted by the cruise ship security personnel 
according  to  the  FBI’s  instructional  video,  do  you  see  any  potential  issue  with  the 
admissibility of evidence for legal proceedings? 

Answer.  In  January  2008,  the  FBI  supplemented  existing  protocols  between  the 
FBI  and  the  cruise  line  industry  by  providing  to  that  industry  a  DVD  presentation 
entitled,  ‘‘Guide  to  Cruise  Line  Crime  Scene  Preservation.’’  The  presentation  pr 
vided basic instruction on the investigative jurisdiction of the United States, report-
ing  requirements  for  crimes  on  the  high  seas,  and  basic  crime  scene  management. 
The  presentation  emphasized  that  the  first  priority  of  the  cruise  line  is  to’  secure 
the  crime  scene  and  await  the  arrival  of  law  enforcement  officials.  The  location  of 
a  crime  scene  on  a  cruise  ship  (for  example,  on  an  outside  deck  or  in  a  common 
area)  may  make  it  difficult  or  impossible  for  cruise  line  personnel  to  isolate  and 
maintain the security of the crime scene. In these circumstances, and when law en-
forcement  officials  cannot  respond  immediately,  we  must  rely  on  cruise  line  per-
sonnel to conduct the initial processing of the crime scene. While the FBI would pre-
fer to process the crime scene, we believe the DVD presentation provides the cruise 
lines  with  the  basic  tools  they  will  need  when  immediate  response  by  law  enforce-
ment officials is not possible. 

Question 4. What methodology has the FBI developed to verify to a victim(s) that 
their  case  has  been  reported  by  the  cruise  lines  to  the  FBI  and  or  the  U.S.  Coast 
Guard? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

67 

Answer.  If  an  incident  or  crime  reported  to  the  FBI  by  a  cruise  line  meets  min-
imum  Federal  investigative  and  prosecutorial  guidelines,  the  FBI  opens  an  inves-
tigation  and  contacts  any  victims  for  interview  purposes  and  to  offer  victim  assist-
ance. The FBI uses Victim Specialists, who are assigned to the Office for Victim As-
sistance (OVA), as a resource when investigations involve victims of Federal crimes 
investigated  by  the  FBI.  The  FBI’s  responsibility  for  assisting  victims  continues 
through adjudication and may involve Victim Specialists from both the FBI and the 
USAO. 

The  mission  of  the  OVA  is  to  ensure  that  victims  of  crimes  investigated  by  the 
FBI receive the services and notifications required by Federal law and the Attorney 
General’s  Guidelines  on  Victim  and  Witness  Assistance  (2000).  The  FBI  recognizes 
not  only  the  necessity  of  providing  for  the  legal  rights  of  victims  but  the  benefits 
that effective and timely victim assistance bring to investigations. The OVA applies 
three  major  principles  in  performing  its  mission:  (1)  doing  what  the  law  requires; 
(2)  doing  what  will  help  victims  and  will  enhance  their  ability  to  participate  in  the 
investigative process; and (3) using innovative, flexible, and practical methods to ac-
complish its goals. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK. R. LAUTENBERG TO 

TERRY DALE 

Question  1.  The  cruise  ship  industry  is  required  to  provide  Customs  and  Border 
Protection (CBP) with crew and passenger manifests prior to departure. When is the 
manifest  required  to  be  submitted  to  CBP  prior  to  departure  and  for  what  are  pas-
sengers  and  crew  being  screened?  For  example,  are  passengers  being  screened 
against  only  a  terrorist  watch  list  or  are  they  also  being  screened  against  the  FBI 
database of sexual predators? 

Answer. Cruise ships departing American ports are required to submit their com-
pleted  manifest,  passengers  and  crew,  to  CBP  (shared  with  the  USCG)  60  minutes 
prior  to  the  ship’s  departure.  This  information  is  submitted  electronically  in  a  for-
mat  that  allows  CBP  to  quickly  process  the  names  through  the  government  data 
bases. We defer to CBP and other Federal agencies to describe their screening proc-
ess of crew and passenger manifests. 

Question 2. What type of background checks do CLIA member companies conduct 
on  their  potential  hires?  The  crew  member  who  masturbated  in  front  of  an  8  year 
old girl had a different name on his passport than on his employment application— 
how do you explain that? What steps are CLIA member companies taking to ensure 
this does not happen again? 

Answer.  All  CLIA  member  companies  use  vetted,  reputable  manning  agencies  in 
the countries where they hire their employees. Many source countries for cruise ship 
employees—such  as  the  Philippines,  a  principle  source  country—have  comprehen-
sive and institutionalized systems to validate the character of their seafarers. 

The  cruise  lines  operating  to  and  from  the  United  States  also  require  all  of  their 
employees  to  obtain  a  work  visa  from  the  U.S.  Government.  Applications  are  ob-
tained  and  presented  at  a  U.S.  Embassy/Consulate  in  person,  where  an  interview 
and background check is completed. 

Additionally,  when  applying  for  a  cruise  line  job,  the  crew  member  is  required  to 
submit  to  the  U.S.  Embassy/Consulate  his/her  passport,  employment  application 
and  letter-of-intent-to-hire  by  the  cruise  line.  This  same  information  is  required  to 
be submitted by the crew member when entering the U.S. by airline to join the ship 
in a U.S. port. If the crew member joins the ship at a foreign port, his/her passport 
and manifest would have to match when submitted by the cruise line prior to enter-
ing the first U.S. Port. 

CLIA  is  aware  that  one  of  the  hearing’s  witnesses  provided  the  account  of  an  al-
leged  sexual  incident  as  set  forth  in  this  question.  Lacking  additional  information, 
we  have  been  unable  to  confirm  the  details  of  the  alleged  incident  and  are,  there-
fore, unable to provide additional comment. 

Question  3.  What  are  the  minimum  standards  in  the  industry  to  be  hired  as 
cruise  ship  security  personnel?  What  type  of  training  and  experience  is  required? 
Answer.  Each  cruise  line  has  its  own  pre-requisites  for  hiring  security  personnel. 
Most of the security personnel have either military or law enforcement backgrounds. 
They receive training and refresher training in topics such as: 

International Ship Security Regulations 
Alcohol awareness and breathalyzer training 
Explosive detection 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

68 

Screening equipment and search techniques 
Accident investigation 
Crime scene preservation 
Reporting, securing, entry, photography, logs, evidence protection, chain of cus-
tody, guest care issues 
Interview techniques 
Smuggling techniques 
Case studies 

This  is  a  sampling  of  the  training  provided  and  depending  on  the  individual’s 
background,  the  duties  assigned  to  the  security  officer,  and  the  number  of  years 
having  worked  in  that  capacity,  the  training  topics  may  increase  or  decrease.  It 
should  also  be  noted  that  several  aspects  of  the  training  are  provided  by  members 
of Federal law enforcement agencies such as FBI, USCG, ATF and CBP. 

Question  4.  Could  you  please  explain  table  1  of  Mr.  Klein’s  testimony  as  to  how 
Royal  Caribbean  Cruise  Lines  defined  inappropriate  touch,  sexual  harassment  and 
sexual assault metrics? Of the 2.4 percent of incidents that occurred in a child/teen 
area could you please specify what type of incidents occurred, such as inappropriate 
touch, sexual harassment or sexual assault? How is the location of 26 percent of the 
incidents  unknown?  Were  all  of  the  151  total  cases  reported  to  the  FBI?  Of  those 
cases,  do  you  know  how  many  were  prosecuted  or  did  not  have  sufficient  evidence 
to  pursue  prosecution?  How  do  you  explain  an  on  board  population  sexual  assault 
incident  rate  of  58.85  per  100,000,  compared  to  an  overall  U.S.  rate  of  32.20  per 
100,000,  and  still  maintain  that  cruise  ship  safety  is  better  than  land  based  resort 
vacation destinations? 

Answer. CLIA submitted this question to RCL officials for response given that the 

question is based upon RCL data. RCL’s response is set forth below: 

RCL  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  clarify  the  statistical  misunderstanding  that 
occurred at the hearing. For ease of reference, we have divided the multi-part ques-
tion into separate sections for response. 

Question  5.  Could  you  please  explain  table  1  of  Mr.  Klein’s  testimony  as  to  how 
Royal  Caribbean  Cruise  Lines  defined  inappropriate  touch,  sexual  harassment  and 
sexual assault metrics? 

Answer.  The  Royal  Caribbean  Cruises  Ltd.  (RCL)  statistics  cited  in  Mr.  Klein’s 
testimony  were  derived  from  litigation  discovery  provided  to  a  plaintiff’s  attorney 
and  apply  to  the  period  from  2003  through  2005.  The  data  in  the  charts  used  by 
Mr. Klein depict information gathered by RCL in support of tracking shipboard inci-
dent allegations by its former Risk Management Department for the purpose of aid-
ing  claims  adjusters  in  locating  a  record  if  a  claim  is  filed.  The  definitions  used  by 
Risk  Management  were  not  consistently  applied  and  due  to  their  purpose,  received 
no  rigor  or  oversight  to  link  them  to  definitions  used  outside  of  the  company.  The 
definitions of the terms, as used by RCL were: Inappropriate touching (kissing, hold-
ing  hands,  rubbing  back);  Sexual  Harassment  (verbal  only);  Sexual  Assault  (touch-
ing  of  intimate  body  parts  above  or  under  clothing);  Sexual  Battery  (penetration  of 
any  type).  Mr.  Klein’s  conclusions  are  based  on  limited  information  available  on 
these charts and therefore did not lend themselves to reliable analysis. Simply stat-
ed, the validity of Mr. Klein’s representations is dependent upon the accuracy of the 
labels  RCL  assigned  to  each  allegation.  Although  perhaps  sufficient  to  permit  a 
claims  adjuster  to  locate  a  record,  detailed  analysis  of  this  labeling  reveals  it  to  be 
lacking  in  both  uniformity  and  accuracy.  In  short,  the  data  Mr.  Klein  used  in  his 
analysis was flawed when used for his purposes. 

Question 6. Of the 2.4 percent of incidents that occurred in child/teen areas, could 
you  please  specify  what  type  of  incidents  occurred,  such  as  inappropriate  touching, 
sexual harassment or sexual assault? 

Answer. It is unclear how Mr. Klein arrived at his ‘‘2.4 percent’’ figure. We identi-
fied  the  following  eight  incidents  in  the  referenced  data  involving  child/teen  areas 
(see definitions above in response to question #1): 

• 9/13/2003—A guest alleged sexual harassment by crew member; 
• 10/10/2003—A  guest  alleged  sexual  harassment  by  two  underage  male  guests; 
• 4/4/2004—A guest alleged a crew member made inappropriate comments; 
• 5/18/2004—A 6 year old guest exposed his penis while watching a movie; 
• 6/11/2004—A guest alleged sexual assault by another guest (this was labeled as 
a ‘‘sexual assault’’ but, upon review, should have been ‘‘inappropriate touching’’); 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

69 

guest; 

• 6/25/2004—A  guest  alleged  being  stalked  and  sexually  harassed  by  a  male 

• 6/28/2005—Allegation that a 14 year old girl was grabbed and kissed by another 

guest (age not listed)—(upon, review, actually an inappropriate touching); 

• 7/22/2005—A  guest  alleged  physical  assault  by  a  crew  member  (no  sexual  as-
pect)  (upon  review  determined  to  be  an  assault,  not  an  inappropriate  touching 
as indicated) 

Question 7. How is the location of 26 percent of the incidents unknown? 
Answer.  The  data  that  Mr.  Klein  relied  upon  did  not  contain  entries  in  these 
fields  because  the  purpose  of  the  data  was  to  allow  claims  adjusters  to  locate  the 
files. RCL personnel creating the data set did not focus on completing this field uni-
formly but that does not mean that the location of the incidents is unknown. 

Question 8. Were all of the 151 cases reported to the FBI? Of those cases, do you 
know how many were prosecuted or did not have sufficient evidence to pursue pros-
ecution? 

Answer.  It  is  and  has  been  RCL  policy  to  report  all  crimes  to  law  enforcement. 
Since it is not clear which cases the number 151 captures, we are unable to provide 
a  reliable  response.  If  the  151  cases  are  identified,  RCL  can  pull  the  corresponding 
files and determine which agency we contacted to report the incident. However, RCL 
does  not  track  whether  law  enforcement  pursues  prosecution  on  the  allegations  we 
report. 

Question  9.  How  do  you  explain  an  on  board  population  sexual  assault  incident 
rate  of  58.85  per  100,000,  compared  to  an  overall  U.S.  rate  of  32.20  per  100,000, 
and  still  maintain  that  cruise  ship  safety  is  better  than  land  based  resort  vacation 
destinations? 

Answer.  See  attached  letter  that  was  sent  by  RCL  to  Mr.  Klein  in  response  to 

this erroneous representation in his testimony. 

ATTACHMENT 

ROYAL CARIBBEAN CRUISES LTD. 

Miami, FL, July 8, 2008 

ROSS A. KLEIN, 
Professor, School of Social Work, 
St. John’s College, J–2000, 
Memorial University of Newfoundland, 
St. John’s, NL, A1C 5S7 Canada. 
Dear Professor Klein: 

I noted with interest your June 19, 2008, testimony on Cruise Ship Safety, before 
the  U.S.  Senate  Commerce  Subcommittee,  in  which  you  cited  a  news  report  and 
prior  testimony  and  charts,  which  I  believe  you  know  to  be  erroneous.  In  addition, 
by  testifying  that  ‘‘the  rate  of  sexual  assault  on  cruise  ships,  compared  to  the  rate 
of  forcible  rape  in  the  U.S.,  is  not  half  but  almost  twice  the  U.S.  rate’’  you  improp-
erly  led  Congress  to  believe  this  was  a  valid  comparison.  You  appear  to  have  done 
so  in  a  deliberate  attempt  to  mislead  Congress  into  believing  that  the  rate  of  ship-
board rape allegations is twice the rate of those occurring on shore. 

As  you  know,  the  Uniform  Crime  Reporting  (UCR)  Program  does  not  track  or 
compute a rate of U.S. land-based sexual assaults. In fact, the term ‘‘sexual assault’’ 
does not even appear to be defined in either the UCR or in any U.S. Federal statute. 
Its cruise industry use was first defined by the FBI in March, 2007, to include each 
of  the  crimes  codified  in  Title  18,  United  States  Code  (USC),  Sections  2241,  2242, 
2243, 2244(a) and 2244(c). 

The ‘‘rate of sexual assault’’ you calculated and cited in your testimony before the 
Committee  included:  (1)  Crime  allegations  of  rape;  (2)  Crime  allegations  of  cruise 
ship  sexual  assaults  that  fall  within  the  above  FBI  definition;  and  even  (3)  Crime 
allegations  that  are  outside  the  FBI’s  prescribed  cruise  industry  use  of  the  term 
‘‘sexual assault.’’ There is simply no justifiable basis to equate such a broad, group-
ing  of  crimes  to  the  UCR’s  narrowly  defined  rate  for  land-based  forcible  rapes,  as 
you knowingly did in your testimony. 

In  addition,  your  June  19  testimony,  as  well  as  prior  testimony  before  Congress, 
incorporated  a  chart  you  prepared  which  purports  to  depict  a  comparison  of  ship-
board sexual assaults and a (non-existent) U.S. shore-side sexual assault rate (actu-
ally  the  UCR’s  forcible  rape  rate,  which  you  mis-titled).  You  and  I  have  discussed 
this  chart  you  prepared  and  you  agreed  its  comparison  is  invalid.  In  fact,  you  ac-
knowledged such errors in an e-mail you sent to me on April 21, 2008, wherein you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

70 

stated:  ‘‘I  have  stopped  using  the  numbers  given  in  discovery  as  comparison  to  the 
U.S.  rate  for  forcible  rape  because  it  is  essentially  a  comparison  of  apples  and  or-
anges. 
. . .  I  assure  you  that  I  try  to  avoid  a  comparison  of  sexual  assault  rates 
on cruise ships with the rate of forcible rate [sic] on land.’’ 

You have told me that you believe this faulty comparison has its roots in statistics 
prepared  by  the  cruise  industry  and  I  have  passed  your  thoughts  on  to  CLIA  for 
their  consideration.  However,  their  response  not  withstanding,  you  were  certainly 
aware at the time of your June 19 testimony that, whatever its origin, the compari-
son  of  shipboard  ‘‘sexual  assaults’’  to  land-based  ‘‘forcible  rape’’  was,  to  use  your 
words,  an  ‘‘apples-to-oranges’’  comparison  to  be  avoided.  Therefore,  your  testimony 
on June 19 that ‘‘the rate of sexual assault on cruise ships, compared to the rate forc-
ible rape in the U.S., is not half but almost twice the U.S. rate’’ appears to be inten-
tionally disingenuous. 

When you chose to use a self-defined rate of sexual assault on cruise ships instead 
of  the  available  rate  of  rape  on  cruise  ships  (and  thereafter  to  compare  this  figure 
to the shore-side rate for forcible rape) you again misled Congress. What’s more, the 
implication of your testimony is directly contradicted by statistics the FBI presented 
to the Committee, which, using your method of calculation, reflect a cruise industry 
rape rate of 15.7 per 100,000 guests; versus the UCR’s 2006 land-based forcible rape 
rate of 30.77 per 100,000 residents. 

In  conclusion,  your  testimony  presented  an  invalid  comparison  between  a  gratu-
itously defined category of shipboard sexual assaults and the narrowly defined U.S. 
rate  for  land-based  forcible  rapes.  It  also  failed  to  correct  prior  Congressional  testi-
mony  based  on  a  chart  of  your  analysis  which  mischaracterized  the  U.S.  rate  of 
‘‘forcible rape’’ as being a non-existent U.S. rate of ‘‘sexual assault.’’ 

I  ask  that  you  take  steps  to  correct  and  clarify  the  record  of  your  June  19  testi-
mony  before  Congress.  I  also  ask  that  you  acknowledge  the  2007  rate  of  shipboard 
rape,  based  on  statistics  presented  by  the  FBI  to  the  Committee,  is  approximately 
half the rate of land-side forcible rape in the U.S. (2006 UCR). This is too important 
a subject to countenance providing Congress with inaccurate or misleading compari-
sons. 

Sincerely, 

GARY M. BALD, 

Senior Vice President, 

Safety, Security, Environment, and Health, 
Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd. 

Hon. JOHN F. KERRY 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Transportation 

Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 

and Merchant Marine Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security 

U.S. Senate 
Washington, D.C. 

TERRY DALE 
President and CEO 
Cruise Lines International Association 
910 SE 17th Street 
Ft. Lauderdale, FL 

CC: HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG 
Chairman 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Transportation 

Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 

and Merchant Marine Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security 

U.S. Senate 
Washington, D.C. 
Hon. GORDON H. SMITH 
Ranking Member 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Transportation 

Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 

and Merchant Marine Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security 

U.S. Senate 
Washington, D.C. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

TERRY DALE 

Question  1.  Mr.  Dale,  recognizing  the  wide  variety  of  cruise  types  and  itineraries 
offered  by  your  members,  are  certain  types  of  crimes  or  the  frequency  of  certain 
crimes  more  prevalent  on  certain  itineraries  than  others?  For  example,  do  short 
weekend  cruises  catering  to  young  adults  have  higher  overall  rates  of  reported 
crimes  and  more  sexual  assaults  than  longer  cruises  catering  to  an  older  crowd?  If 
a higher degree of correlation does exist between certain crimes and itineraries, are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

71 

your  members  changing  security  procedures  accordingly?  If  a  higher  degree  of  cor-
relation  does  exist,  are  your  member  cruise  lines  allocating  additional  security  re-
sources to these higher risk itineraries? 

Answer.  CLIA  does  not  maintain  a  database  of  crimes  that  occur  on  our  member 
lines.  The  cruise  lines  report  allegations  directly  to  law  enforcement  agencies.  That 
said, there is a correlation of a higher rate of crimes on short cruises, with a young-
er  demographic,  than  on  the  longer  itineraries  where  there  are  more  families  and 
older guests. This fact is only one of a number of considerations our cruise lines use 
for  setting  the  security  protocols  on  board  the  ship.  Our  member  lines  continually 
evaluate  a  multitude  of  factors  to  determine  the  manning  needed  for  security  per-
sonnel on each cruise. These factors include, but are not limited to: 

• length of cruise 
• passenger demographics 
• season 
• itinerary 
• special charters 
In  addition  security  protocols  are  dictated  by  the  perceived  security  risks  associ-

ated with a number of factors such as the ports of call, and itineraries. 

Question 2. Mr. Dale, when passengers board international cruises, are they typi-
cally  aware  of  the  various  laws  governing  the  reporting  of  crimes  on  cruise  ships 
and  who  has  jurisdiction  for  the  different  segments  of  the  itinerary?  Is  there  any 
sort  of  pre-boarding  orientation  or  any  material  distributed  before  the  ship  leaves 
U.S.  territorial  waters?  You  mentioned  that  a  significant  percentage  of  cruises  are 
purchased through travel agents. Should travel agents have an obligation to provide 
information  to  passengers  regarding  the  various  laws  impacting  their  cruise  and 
what to do if they believe they are a victim of crime? 

Answer. Information on safety and security is provided to passengers at the begin-
ning of a cruise through several formats. The ship’s TV is preset to the safety chan-
nel  that  provides  the  number  to  call  if  there  is  any  incident,  safety  or  security  re-
lated. General warnings of a safety/security nature are also mentioned in each day’s 
plan of activities and general safety announcements are made during the safety drill 
at  the  beginning  of  the  cruise.  In  general,  passengers  are  advised  to  report  any 
crimes  to  Ship  Security  or  other  Officers.  He  and  the  Master  are  the  individuals 
who  can  best  work  with  and  explain  to  the  passenger  what  the  reporting  require-
ments are for the location at that time. Although reporting laws vary depending on 
ship location and victim/suspect nationality, all crime allegations are required to be 
reported  to  law  enforcement.  They  are  always  reported  to  the  Flag  State.  In  addi-
tion,  alleged  crimes  are  generally  always  reported  to  either  the  nation  where  they 
occur or the nation of the next port of call. Some nations, such as the U. S., require 
reporting  of  crime  allegations  that  occur  outside  their  territorial  waters.  For  exam-
ple,  crime  allegations  under  the  jurisdiction  of  the  FBI  and  in  which  cruise  lines 
report to the FBI include those that occur when: 

1. The ship, regardless of flag, is a U.S.-owned vessel, either in whole or in part, 
regardless  of  the  nationality  of  the  victim  or  the  perpetrator,  when  such  vessel 
is  within  the  admiralty  and  maritime  jurisdiction  of  the  United  States  and  out 
of the jurisdiction of any particular state; 
2. The offense by or against a U.S. National was committed outside the jurisdic-
tion of any nation; 
3. The crime occurs in the U.S. territorial sea (within twelve miles of the coast), 
regardless of the nationality of the vessel, the victim or the perpetrator; or 
4.  The  victim  or  perpetrator  is  a  U.S.  National  on  any  vessel  during  a  voyage 
that departed from or will arrive into a U.S. port. 

While travel agents do not provide specific information, passengers receive a con-
tract of carriage that lays out the terms and conditions associated with that cruise. 
This contract is available for the guest on our member’s website. Additionally, prior 
to  the  beginning  of  the  voyage  each  passenger  is  provided  with  the  contract  of  car-
riage. The legal rights and remedies within the contract are dependent upon a num-
ber  of  factors;  including  where  the  cruise  begins  and  ends,  as  well  as  the  flag  of 
the vessel, and the nationality of the cruise passenger. 

Question 3. Mr. Dale, among recommendations from the International Cruise Vic-
tims  Association  is  a  proposal  to  place  some  type  of  law  enforcement  authority  on 
all cruises analogous to a U.S. Air Marshall on a commercial flight. What is CLIA’s 
position  on  having  one  such  law  enforcement  personnel  on  each  and  every  cruise? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

72 

What  is  CLIA’s  position  on  having  one  such  law  enforcement  personnel  on  cruises 
with higher risk itineraries? 

CLIA  believes  that  the  function  served  by  Air  Marshals  is  well  within  the  capa-
bilities  of  cruise  ship  security  personnel.  CLIA  cruise  line  security  personnel  are 
fully trained and qualified as first responders to any security incident on board our 
ships.  Most  have  prior  law  enforcement  experience  and  receives  extensive  training 
from  U.S.  law  enforcement  maritime  experts.  Together,  the  shipboard  teams,  their 
U.S.  based  security  departments  and  Law  Enforcement  Agency  personnel  work 
quite  well  in  partnership.  It  is  unlikely  the  addition  of  a  law  enforcement  person 
would  add  material  value  in  this  important  area.  Cruise  ships  sail  in  an  inter-
national  environment,  and  as  they  testified  at  previous  congressional  hearings,  the 
U.S. Coast Guard and FBI do not believe it is neither necessary nor legally feasible 
to  require  a  U.S.  Federal  Law  Enforcement  Official  on  cruise  ships.  Many,  if  not 
most  of  the  countries  cruise  lines  visit  have  strict  policies  about  weapons  and  the 
presence of a foreign law enforcement officer conducting activities while within their 
territory. 

CLIA  would  welcome  an  opportunity  to  further  discuss  the  capabilities  and  re-

quirements of its security personnel with members and staffers. 

Question  4.  Mr.  Dale,  in  your  testimony  you  highlighted  the  use  of  an  FBI-pro-
vided DVD for security training by major cruise lines. Is this DVD required viewing 
for all employees or individuals designated as ‘‘security personnel?’’ For example, do 
medical  personnel,  whom  some  cruise  lines  consider  as  independent  contractors, 
view  the  DVD?  Does  the  video  cover  the  procedures  medical  personnel  must  follow 
when there are allegations of a sexual assault or rape? Do your member cruise lines 
consider viewing this DVD to be sufficient training for employees to respond appro-
priately  when  an  allegation  of  an  onboard  crime  occurs?  Is  that  CLIA’s  position? 
Should  those  individuals  designated  as  ‘‘security  personnel’’  be  certified  by  a  third 
party  to  give  the  public  (and  law  enforcement)  confidence  that  they  have  received 
adequate  training  and  achieved  as  a  minimum  a  basic  level  of  competence  in  key 
areas such as securing a crime scene, evidence collection, etc.? 

Answer. The FBI-provided DVD is specifically aimed at crime scene management 
and  evidence  preservation  for  security  trained  personnel.  The  DVD  is  used  in  com-
bination  with  the  training  provided  by  the  cruise  line  for  its  security  personnel. 
Most of the security personnel have either military or law enforcement backgrounds. 
They receive training and refresher training in topics such as: 

International Ship Security Regulations 
Alcohol awareness and breathalyzer training 
Explosive detection 
Screening equipment and search techniques 
Accident investigation 
Crime scene preservation 
Reporting, securing, entry, photography, logs, evidence protection, chain of cus-
tody, guest care issues 
Interview techniques 
Smuggling techniques 
Case studies 

This is a sampling of the training provided and depending on the background, du-
ties  assigned  to  the  security  officer,  the  number  of  years  having  worked  in  that  ca-
pacity,  the  training  topics  may  increase  or  decrease.  It  should  also  be  noted  that 
several  portions  of  the  training  are  provided  by  members  of  Federal  law  enforce-
ment agencies such as FBI, USCG, ATF and CBP. 

In addition, the cruise lines are pursuing, and several already have, their compa-
nies’  security  programs/training  certified  by  a  third  party.  Several  lines  have  pro-
grams for licensing and certification as security professionals for their on board per-
sonnel.  All  the  CLIA  lines  training  stresses  incident  response,  evidence  and  crime 
scene preservation. Both the U.S. Coast Guard and the FBI have testified that they 
receive excellent cooperation and assistance from cruise line security personnel. 

All ships that operate on international itineraries have trained medical personnel 
onboard.  Part  of  the  equipment  in  the  medical  clinics  are  pelvic  examination  kits 
and  there  is  training  provided  to  the  medical  personnel  on  the  proper  administra-
tion  of  these  kits.  The  DVD  does  not  specifically  address  medical  procedures  in  the 
event  of  a  rape/sexual  assault,  however,  other  training  provided  by  cruise  lines  ad-
dresses this important area. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

73 

Question 5. Mr. Dale, how do cruise lines hire their crews? Are the crews consid-
ered  staff  or  are  they  considered  independent  contractors?  If  the  hiring  is  done  by 
a third party, is the crew member considered an employee of the cruise line, an em-
ployee  of  the  hiring  firm,  or  an  independent  contractor?  What  obligations  does  a 
third party staffing firm have to ensure that the individual they are hiring on behalf 
of  the  cruise  line  does  not  have  a  long  history  of  committing  crimes  or  alleged  to 
have committed crimes while working on cruise ships? Is there an industry ‘‘do not 
hire’’ list? 

Answer.  All  CLIA  member  companies  use  vetted,  reputable  manning  agencies  in 
the countries where they hire their employees. Most of these countries have institu-
tionalized programs for the recruitment and placement of properly screened employ-
ees.  Additionally,  several  of  the  manning  agencies  in  different  countries  have  been 
vetted by the FBI in their ongoing efforts to stop counterfeit Letters of Employment 
and false documentation submissions for entry to the U.S. The cruise lines operating 
from the United States also require all of their employees to obtain a work visa from 
the  U.S.  Government.  This  visa  is  a  C1D  category.  Applications  are  obtained  and 
presented  at  a  U.S.  Embassy/Consulate  in  person,  where  an  interview  and  back-
ground  check  is  completed.  Additionally,  when  applying  for  a  cruise  line  job,  the 
crew member is required to submit to the U.S. Embassy/Consulate his/her passport, 
employment application and letter-of-intent-to-hire by the cruise line. This same in-
formation would have to be submitted by the crew member when entering the U.S. 
by  airline  to  join  the  ship  in  a  U.S.  port.  If  the  crew  member  joins  the  ship  at  a 
foreign port, his/her passport and visa would have to match when submitted by the 
cruise line prior to entering the first U.S. port. If a crew member commits a crime, 
his employment is terminated and his visa is revoked (in coordination with law en-
forcement  authorities).  To  comply  with  U.S.  and  international  privacy  laws  the 
cruise industry does not maintain a ‘‘do not hire’’ list. 

Question  6.  Mr.  Dale,  what  type  of  visa  does  a  foreign  cruise  line  crewmember 
require  for  itineraries  that  originate  or  terminate  in  the  United  States?  Is  a  back-
ground check required for the visa? If so, who performs the background check? What 
does the background check include? Who is responsible on the cruise line for ensur-
ing  that  the  name  employee  or  contractor  has  on  his  or  her  passport  matched  that 
with the name on his or her visa? What actions are taken if the names on the pass-
port and the visa do not match? 

Answer. In addition to the information provided for the question above, all cruise 
ship  crew  members  are  screened  through  CBP,  USCG  and  other  law  enforcement 
data  bases  on  a  regular  basis.  The  crew  manifest  is  submitted  upon  departure  and 
arrival to every U.S. port. The crew must also submit to a 90-day crew check where 
they  are  subject  to  close  CBP  scrutiny  for  any  inconsistencies  in  their  documenta-
tion.  This  is  all  in  addition  to  the  obtaining  of  a  visa  to  work  in  the  United  States 
that  will  validate  credentials  for  consistency  as  well  the  first  look  CBP  has  as  the 
crew travel through the port of entry at the international airport. 

Question  7.  Mr.  Dale,  a  significant  percentage  of  reported  crimes  involve  cruise 
line employees. Of the 184 cases reported to the FBI from Fiscal Year 2002 through 
February  2007,  84  involved  crew  members.  In  cases  where  a  crew  member  is  the 
alleged perpetrator of a crime which meet the FBI reporting requirements, can you 
walk us through the typical steps taken by a cruise line in dealing with the accused 
crew  member,  both  in  cases  when  the  incident  occurred  in  international  or  foreign 
waters  and  when  the  alleged  crime  occurs  in  U.S.  territorial  waters.  In  any  cir-
cumstance, is the accused crew member allowed to disembark the ship before some-
one with legal authority can ascertain whether that individual may have committed 
a crime? 

Answer.  All  allegations  are  reported  to  the  proper  authorities  including  the  FBI. 
The  process  followed  whether  in  international  or  foreign  waters  is  as  follows:  The 
crime  allegation  is  reported  to  ship’s  security.  A  security  team  (accompanied  by  a 
medical  team  if  warranted)  immediately  responds  to  the  incident  scene  and  deter-
mines what is alleged. The incident scene is sealed and the victim is provided med-
ical care and guest care if needed. The suspect is located and any other places where 
evidence may be found are secured. Written statements are taken from the suspect, 
victim  and  witnesses.  Photographs  may  be  taken,  provided  doing  so  will  not  risk 
preserved evidence. The incident is reported to the law enforcement agency with ju-
risdiction  and  the  statements  are  provided  once  obtained.  If  the  suspect  presents  a 
continuing risk to others on board, the crew member will be confined either to their 
cabin  or  the  brig,  pending  arrival  of  law  enforcement  (typically  at  a  minimum,  the 
suspect’s contact with guests would be curtailed). Ships’ records relevant to the inci-
dent  are  gathered,  including  CCTV  images,  A-Pass  (door  access)  records,  shipboard 
purchase  records  if  relevant,  etc.  When  law  enforcement  arrives  on  the  ship,  secu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

74 

rity  meets  with  them  and  provides  its  relevant  records  and  written  statements. 
Space is made available for law enforcement use. Their investigative efforts are fully 
supported.  Relevant  witnesses  are  presented  for  interview  and  evidence  sites  are 
opened  as  requested  for  forensic  examination.  The  crew  member  is  made  available 
to  law  enforcement.  A  Master’s  hearing  will  be  held  where  the  allegation  will  be 
evaluated  and  a  decision  made  concerning  the  crew  members  continued  employ-
ment.  In  all  likelihood,  the  crew  member  will  be  terminated  and  removed  from  the 
ship,  in  coordination  with  law  enforcement.  If  the  crew  member  is  not  arrested,  he 
will  be  handled  according  to  local  immigration  laws.  If  charges  are  brought,  the 
cruise line will provide continuing support to law enforcement and will make avail-
able  any  witnesses  needed  at  trial.  Generally,  a  crew  member  is  not  permitted  to 
leave  the  ship  until  law  enforcement  responds.  This  process  is  generally  the  same 
when the accused is a passenger. 

The FBI may choose to exercise its investigative authority or it may choose to co-
operate with the authorities of another nation in that country exercising its jurisdic-
tion. The crewmember has probably violated the terms of his employment if he has 
even  fraternized  with  a  passenger,  therefore  he  is  subject  to  dismissal.  Dismissal 
would  invalidate  the  terms  of  his  visa.  Therefore,  if  the  U.S.  or  foreign  authorities 
do  not  choose  to  investigate  or  take  the  crewmember  into  custody,  the  cruise  line 
must  ensure,  under  relevant  immigration  laws  that  the  crewmember  is  deported  to 
his home of record. It is incumbent to have timely action by the authorities in exer-
cising their jurisdiction otherwise the cruise line has little choice but to remove that 
crewmember  from  the  United  States  or  other  country  where  the  vessel  is  located. 
While  CLIA  has  outlined  our  process  above,  we  are  concerned  about  what  the 
source document for the statistics used (184 cases, FY 2002–2/07, and 84 cases with 
the crew is the accused) comes from, as we would appreciate the opportunity to en-
sure the correct numbers are used. 

TRAVEL INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION 

June 18, 2008 

Hon. FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Chairman, 
Hon. Gordon Smith, 
Ranking Member, 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security, 

Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Lautenberg and Senator Smith: 

I write on behalf of the Travel Industry Association (TIA), the national non-profit 
organization  representing  1,700  travel  and  tourism  public  and  private  entities 
across the country. TIA members encompass every sector of the diverse, $740 billion 
travel  community  and  our  mission  is  to  promote  and  facilitate  increased  travel  to 
and within the United States. 

We  are  aware  that  this  is  the  fifth  Congressional  hearing  over  the  last  3  years 
that has examined the subject of personal safety on cruise ships. While we feel com-
passion  for  those  who  have  experienced  a  serious  incident,  the  TIA  believes  that 
cruising is a very safe vacation option. 

The industry enjoys a customer satisfaction rating of’ more then 95 percent, a re-
markably strong level of satisfaction. This information, combined with the fact that 
nearly  55  percent  of  cruisers  are  repeat  customers,  surely  indicates  that  customers 
of cruising believe their environment is safe. 

The  cruise  line  industry  is  an  important  economic  engine  for  the  United  States. 
In 2006, according to analysis conducted by Business Research and Economic Advi-
sors  (BREA)  the  total  economic  benefit  of  the  cruise  industry  in  this  country  was 
535.7  billion  and  direct  spending  of  the  cruise  lines  and  passengers  on  U.S.  goods 
and services was $17.6 billion. 

In short, the cruise industry cares about its customers and it is an important. part 
of  America’s  economy.  We  ask  that  this  statement  be  included  in  the  record  of  the 
hearing  that  will  be  held  June  19,  2008  by  the  Surface  Transportation  and  Mer-
chant Marine Infrastructure, Safety, and Security Subcommittee. 

Sincerely, 

ROGER DOW, 

President and CEO, 

Travel Industry Association. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

75 

AMERICAN SOCIETY OF TRAVEL AGENTS 

Alexandria, VA, June 18, 2008 

HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 
Chair, 
Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 

and Merchant Marine Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security, 

Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Hon. GORDON H. SMITH, 
Ranking Minority Member, 
Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 

and Merchant Marine Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security, 

Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Transportation, 

Transportation, 

U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Lautenberg and Ranking Member Smith: 

U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 

On behalf of the American Society of Travel Agents, Inc., (ASTA),1 I request that 
this  statement  be  included  in  the  record  of  the  Subcommittee’s  hearings,  June  19, 
2008 with respect to cruise safety issues. 

Travel  agents  today  account  for  over  90  percent  of  the  sales  of  cruises  to  United 
States  citizens.  Based  on  cruise  industry  estimates  of  North  American  cruise  pas-
sengers in 2007, travel agents will sell more than 11.35 million cruise vacations this 
year. 

The  cruise  industry  offers  itineraries  originating  at  numerous  U.S.  ports  as  well 
as  many  overseas  points  of  departure.  It  is  usually  necessary  for  the  cruise  con-
sumer to travel a considerable distance to take a cruise, most often by air, and trav-
el agents typically make arrangements for all aspects of the trip. Today’s cruise pas-
sengers  include  individuals  of  all  ages,  many  families,  and  many  people  of  diverse 
ethnic background. 

Taking  a  cruise  is  similar  in  some  respects  to  visiting  a  new  city.  The  largest 
cruise ships carry more than 3,000 passengers on a single sailing. Most of them will 
be strangers to each other. 

More  than  31  million  people  sailed  on  cruise  ships  during  the  years  2002–2005 
with a little more than 200 complaints of criminal activity associated with the ship 
experience.2 This  data  indicates  in  objective  terms  that  the  risks  of  traveling  on  a 
cruise  ship  are  minuscule.  Travel  agents  continue  to  sell  cruises  with  the  highest 
confidence that the cruise environment is a welcoming and safe one compared to any 
form  of  travel.  It  is,  of  course,  always  possible  to  have  a  problem  when  away  from 
home. The cruise passenger must exercise the same diligence and personal responsi-
bility  that  would  be  expected  when  traveling  by  any  method  or  when  in  any  place 
where  there  is  close  contact  with  unknown  persons.  Cruise  ships  provide  extensive 
facilities  to  facilitate  protection  of  passenger  property  and  to  encourage  responsible 
behavior  by  cruise  passengers  both  on  and  off  the  ship.  ASTA’s  members  have  no 
hesitancy in encouraging their best customers to take a cruise. Cruises typically pro-
vide  one  of  the  highest  customer  satisfaction  experiences  in  the  entire  travel  spec-
trum. 

At ASTA we are aware that the cruise industry works very closely with a number 
of  government  agencies  to  facilitate  safety,  and  to  be  as  responsive  to  consumer 
needs  as  possible.  Because  cruise  itineraries  frequently  involve  visiting  a  number 
of countries on a single voyage, there are a myriad of laws that apply. It is our expe-
rience  that  the  industry  works  very  hard  at  ensuring  personal  safety  and  security. 
If  ASTA  can  answer  any  questions  the  Subcommittee  may  have  on  this  subject, 

we would be happy to do so. 

Sincerely yours, 

CHERYL COREY HUDAK, CTC, 

President. 

cc: Sen. John Kerry 

1 Founded  in  1931,  ASTA  is  the  largest  association  of  travel  professionals.  Our  20,000-plus 
members  include  travel  agents  and  the  companies  whose  products  they  sell  such  as  tours, 
cruises, hotels, car rentals, etc. We are the leading advocate for travel agents, the travel indus-
try and the traveling public. 

2 The complaints included 24 missing person situations which may not have involved criminal 

conduct. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

76 

NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF CRUISE ORIENTED AGENCIES 

Margate, FL, June 16, 2008 

Hon. FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Chairman, 
Hon. GORDON SMITH, 
Ranking Member, 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security, 

Washington, DC. 

Thank  you  for  permitting  this  testimony  regarding  cruise  ship  safety  on  behalf 

of the members of the National Association of Cruise-Oriented Agencies. 

In our professional assessment, cruise lines offer the safest vacations available to 
the  public.  A  typical  cruise  ship  is  a  tightly  gated  facility  with  security  personnel, 
100  percent  positive  identification  for  those  aboard,  screened  and  trained  staff  and 
a  hierarchy  of  responsible  officers  who  answer  onboard  to  a  single  authority,  the 
captain. By its nature, no other type of vacation is safer than this! 

Perfect safety is impossible to achieve in any human endeavor. Aware of this, we 
travel agent members of NACOA research vacations for clients, seeking safety excel-
lence,  quality  product  delivery  and  tailored  affordability.  Cruise  lines  consistently 
offer  the  best  balance  for  our  clients  as  can  be  attested  by  the  decades  of  steady 
growth in cruise passenger numbers and the highest client repeat factor of any seg-
ment in the travel industry. 

One  of  our  members  cruised  more  than  100  times  over  the  past  twenty  years  on 
multiple  cruise  lines  and  dozens  of  ships.  In  addition,  her  agency  placed  thousands 
of  clients  on  cruise  ships  annually.  She  had  never  witnessed  or  been  informed  by 
her  agents,  clients  or  acquaintances  of  crimes  on  ships  committed  by  cruise  staff. 
In  all  those  tens  of  thousands  of  opportunities  for  her  to  learn  of  shipboard  crime, 
only  one  incident  happened;  the  theft  of  a  camera  by  a  cruise  passenger.  This  inci-
dent was promptly investigated by ship’s officers. 

In  this  day  of  cruise  passengers  sailing  with  their  cell  phones  and  laptops,  the 
absence  of  bad  news  cannot  be  due  to  some  collusion  to  hide.  Clients  have  satellite 
communication access to friends and family throughout their cruises. 

In  closing,  the  members  of  NACOA  have  substantial,  broad  personal  knowledge 
of cruise ship safety issues regarding passengers. Because of this firsthand and an-
ecdotal knowledge, we have the great comfort in placing our clients on cruise ships. 

Thank you. 

Sincerely, 

DONNA K. ESPOSITO, MCC, 

President. 

VACATION.COM ® 

Alexandria, VA, June 18, 2008 

Hon. FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Chairman, 
Hon. GORDON SMITH, 
Ranking Member, 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security, 

U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Lautenberg, 

On behalf of Vacation.com, I request that this statement be included in the record 

of the Subcommittee’s hearing on cruise safety. 

Vacation.com  serves  a  network  of  approximately  5,100  travel  agencies  focused  on 
leisure  travel  distribution,  accounting  for  approximately  30  percent  of  all  travel 
agencies  in  North  America.  With  more  than  $18  billion  in  annual  sales,  Vaca-
tion.com is North America’s largest vacation selling network. 

Cruise vacations are a major part of our business and we fully expect the business 
to  continue  its  impressive  growth  rate.  According  to  Cruise  Lines  International  As-
sociation  (CLIA):  nearly  51  million  Americans  express  an  interest  to  cruise  within 
the  next  3  years;  to  date,  approximately  19.9  percent  of  the  U.S.  population  has 
cruised;  and  the  median  age  of  those  passengers  is  46  years  old  with  an  average 
annual income of $93,000. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

77 

In  2007,  Vacation.com  predicted  some  travel  trends  that  certainly  play  into  this 
baby  boomer  age  group  and  cruise  vacations.  With  baby  boomers  becoming  more 
anxious  to  be  pampered  and  entertained  in  a  controlled  environment,  and  cruise 
lines  portraying  cruises  as  destinations  not  just  ships,  we  noticed  an  increase  in 
cruise vacations. 

Also,  family  vacations  will  continue  to  grow  at  a  faster  rate  than  all  other  forms 
of leisure travel as parents and grandparents look at travel as a way to reunite fam-
ilies in a high-stress world dominated by demanding work responsibilities. 

Based  on  these  predictions,  Vacation.com  expects  cruising  to  increase  in  popu-
larity. Approximately half of first-time cruisers become repeat cruisers and cruising 
is  consistently  rated  among  the  highest  satisfaction  levels  of  any  vacation  option. 
A  ship  is  similar  to  a  24-hour  secured  building  and  provides  a  safe  environment 
for  millions  of  people  every  year.  Our  network  of  travel  agencies  believes  in  the 
cruise industry and all that it is doing to provide a safe and enjoyable vacation. 

Sincerely, 

STEVE TRACAS, 
President and CEO. 

Copy: Hon. JOHN KERRY, U.S. Senate 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security 

Washington, D.C. 

NATIONAL BUSINESS TRAVEL ASSOCIATION 

Alexandria, VA, June 18, 2008 

HON. FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Chairman, 
U.S. Senate, 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Hon. GORDON SMITH, 
Ranking Member, 
U.S. Senate, 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Transportation, 

Transportation, 

Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 

and Merchant Marine Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security, 

Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 

and Merchant Marine Infrastructure, 
Safety, and Security, 

Washington, DC. 
Dear Subcommittee Chairman Lautenberg and Ranking Member Smith: 

Washington, DC. 

The National Business Travel Association (NBTA) represents over 4,000 corporate 
and  government  travel  managers,  meeting  professionals,  and  travel  service  pro-
viders,  who  collectively  manage  and  direct  more  than  $170  billion  of  expenditures 
within  the  business  travel  industry.  NBTA  members  frequently  organize  and  con-
duct  corporate  events  and  conferences  onboard  cruise  ships  operating  from  the 
United  States  and  throughout  the  world.  Events  conducted  on  cruise  ships  are  a 
growing  portion  of  our  member’s  business  and  represent  excellent  venues  for  net-
working  and  educational  opportunities  in  a  pleasant  and  accommodating  atmos-
phere. 

We are aware that this is the fifth Congressional hearing in the past 2 years deal-
ing  with  the  subject  of  personal  security  on  cruise  ships.  While  instances  of  crime 
can occur in virtually any aspect of daily life as well as vacation settings, I can tell 
you  that  our  membership  has  no  concerns  with  booking  cruise  ships  for  corporate 
events. 

The  best  bellwether  is  the  public  and  travel  community’s  confidence  in  cruising. 
Passengers  for  North  American  cruises  are  increasing  annually  at  about  9  percent 
over  the  prior  year’s  number.  This  significant  rate  of  growth  is  testament  to  pas-
sengers’ satisfaction with the cruise experience. 

We ask that this statement be included in the record of the Subcommittee’s hear-

ings, June 18, 2009 regarding cruise safety issues. 

I am at your disposal for further information on this subject. 

Sincerely yours, 

Executive Director and Chief Operating Officer. 

WILLIAM CONNORS, 

cc: Hon. JOHN KERRY 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

78 

CRUISE PLANNERS 

June 19, 2008 

Hon. FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Chairman, 
Hon. GORDON SMITH, 
Ranking Member, 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security, 

U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Lautenberg, 

I  request  that  this  statement,  on  behalf  of  Cruise  Planners,  be  included  in  the 
record  of  the  Subcommittee’s  hearing  for  June  19,  2008  on  keeping  Americans  safe 
at sea. 

Cruise Planners is a consortium of approximately 700 agencies located throughout 
the  United  States.  These  agencies  are  leisure  and  cruise-oriented,  meaning  that 
they specialize in providing quality holidays for Americans on vacation. While their 
main focus is on cruising, they do sell a good amount of land-based vacations includ-
ing  packaged  tours  and  resort  stays  internationally.  We  negotiate  on  their  behalf 
with  major  travel  suppliers  for  more  advantageous  business  terms  including  mar-
keting, technology, training, communication, promotions and commissions. 

I believe I have a unique perspective in order to comment on the safety and secu-
rity  of  Americans  on  cruise  ships,  and  I  absolutely  believe  that  Americas  are  safe 
at sea. Cruising enjoys a 95 percent customer satisfaction rating and more than 50 
percent of cruisers are repeat customers. 

Yes,  there  have  been  isolated  incidents  with  crimes  against  Americans  onboard 
cruise ships, more often caused by other Americans, and the cruise industry has not 
been  perfect  in  the  past  as  there  have  been  instances  between  crew  members  and 
passengers, but in reality, statistics absolutely reinforce the fact that over 99.9 per-
cent of American cruise travelers return safely. 

I think it is a worthy cause for the Senate to make sure that the cruise industry 
is  doing  all  they  can  to  ensure  cruise  passenger  safety,  but  I  can  also  say  that  in 
all my years, I have only seen an industry that has strived to keep their passengers 
safe  and  sound  and  have  reacted  quickly  to  correct  any  problems  with  their  crew, 
vessels or policies. Their life blood is the traveling American public, and they’re not 
about to jeopardize it. 

Today,  I  speak  on  behalf  of  my  700  independent  travel  agencies  when  I  ask  you 
to consider that for many years, our member agencies have been enjoying the busi-
ness they continually receive from satisfied, repeat cruisers. Our future is based on 
this success, and we have never hesitated to promote cruising as anything but a safe 
vacation option. 
Regards, 

MICHELLE FEE, CTC, 

CEO. 

CC: Hon. JOHN KERRY 
Washington, D.C. 

AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF PORT AUTHORITIES 

Alexandria, VA, June 19, 2008 

Chairman FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security, 

Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Lautenberg: 

On behalf of the American Association of Port Authorities (AAPA), I request that 
this  statement  be  included  in  the  record  of  the  Subcommittee’s  hearing  of  June  19, 
2008,  on  cruise  ship  safety.  AAPA  represents  the  leading  port  authorities  in  the 
Western Hemisphere and our comments today reflect the views of our U.S. members 
who manage or lease cruise facilities in the U.S. 

Cruising is a very dynamic and growing sector of the travel and tourism industry. 
It has become a major contributor to economic growth in the United States contrib-
uting $ 35.7 billion and creating over 354,000 American jobs in 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

79 

The  cruise  industry  offers  itineraries  originating  at  numerous  U.S.  ports  as  well 
as  many  overseas  points  of  departure.  It  is  usually  necessary  for  the  cruise  con-
sumer to travel a considerable distance to take a cruise, most often by air, and they 
frequently stay at local hotels and frequent local tourist attractions prior to or after 
their  cruises.  Most  consumables  are  sourced  in  the  U.S.  market  and  U.S.  travel 
agents  typically  make  arrangements  for  all  aspects  of  the  trip.  Today’s  cruise  pas-
sengers  include  individuals  of  all  ages,  many  families,  and  many  people  of  diverse 
ethnic backgrounds. 

Taking  a  cruise  is  similar  in  some  respects  to  visiting  a  new  city.  The  largest 
cruise ships carry more than 3,000 passengers on a single sailing. Most of them will 
be strangers to each other. 

The data reported at previous Congressional hearings indicates in objective terms 
that  the  risks  of  traveling  on  a  cruise  ship  are  minuscule.  Travel  agents  continue 
to  sell  cruises  with  the  highest  confidence  that  the  cruise  environment  is  a  wel-
coming and safe one. It is, of course, always possible to have a problem when away 
from home. The cruise passenger must exercise the same diligence and personal re-
sponsibility  that  would  be  expected  when  traveling  by  any  method  or  when  in  any 
place  where  there  is  close  contact  with  unknown  persons.  Cruise  ships  provide  ex-
tensive  facilities  to  facilitate  protection  of  passenger  property  and  to  encourage  re-
sponsible behavior by cruise passengers both on and off the ship. 

At AAPA, we are aware that the cruise industry works very closely with a number 
of government agencies to facilitate safety, and be as responsive to consumer needs 
as possible. Because cruise itineraries frequently involve visiting a number of coun-
tries on a single voyage, there are a myriad of laws that apply. It is our experience 
that the industry works very hard at ensuring personal safety and security. We are 
also  aware  of  a  number  of  recent  efforts  to  enhance  the  response  to  cruise  pas-
sengers if an unfortunate incident were to happen. 

We  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  express  the  views  of  the  public  port  industry 
related  to  cruise  safety.  We  are  committed  to  work  with  industry  to  ensure  a  safe 
and fun vacation experience. 

Sincerely yours, 

KURT A. NAGLE, 

President. 

BAHAMAS MARITIME AUTHORITY 

London EC2N 7AR, 19 June 2008 

Hon. FRANK LAUTENBERG, 
Chairman, 
Hon. GORDON SMITH, 
Ranking Member, 
Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure, 

Safety, and Security, 

U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Lautenberg: 

In  March  of  this  year  as  Director  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  the  Bahamas 
Maritime Authority, I had the privilege and pleasure of attending a breakfast meet-
ing  with  the  Congressman  Cummings  which  was  arranged  by  Dick  Fredricks  and 
Jim Lawrence during the Connecticut Maritime Association Conference. 

The  breakfast  with  the  Congressman  was  most  interesting  with  robust  and  open 
dialogue  amongst  all  participating.  I  particularly  agreed  with  his  messages  about 
measuring and improving ones own performance rather than competing with others 
and also how we should recognize and learn everyone else’s role in the performance 
or  as  in  our  industry  the  ‘‘chain  of  responsibility’’  as  on  our  own  we  arc  of  little 
value but being part of a strong chain have great strengths. 

I recall also listening to Admiral Allen and the Congressman as they informed us 
about the growth of the Coast guard and the investment being allocated. This is all 
good news. 

I was also delighted to participate in a panel discussion with Admiral Watson and 
a  ‘‘Galaxy  of  Captains’’  from  the  USCG  when  they  represented  the  U.S.  as  a  ‘‘port 
State’’  and  I  represented  the  position  of  the  Bahamas  as  a  ‘‘Flag  State.’’  This  con-
ference  session  was  well  attended  and  the  audience  were  able  to  get  a  greater  un-
derstanding  of  where  the  responsibility  lie  (our  respective  roles)  in  the  ‘chain  of  re-
sponsibility’ for safety and security in shipping. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

80 

The  Bahamas  Maritime  Authority  is  a  ‘‘quasi’’  government  body  which  has  the 
‘‘Flag  State’’  and  ship  registration  responsibilities  on  behalf  of  the  Government  of 
the Commonwealth of the Bahamas. 

Our  register  is  the  World’s  third  largest  with  some  1700  ships  and  we  currently 
have  some  80  large  international  passenger  ships.  As  an  ‘‘open’’  registry  we  are  an 
active  delegation  at  IMO,  are  elected  members  of  the  IMO  Council  a  signatory  to 
UNCLOS and many IMO conventions which have the force of law in the Bahamas. 
We  are  a  large  international  registry,  but  instead  of  focusing  on  number  of  ships 
registered  with  the  Bahamas,  we  focus  on  quality  operators.  We  frequently  turn 
down  applicants  to  the  Bahamian  registry,  because  they  do  not  meet  our  quality 
standards.  I  believe  you  will  find  that  Bahamian  registered  vessels  have  an  excel-
lent safety record and our flag is on every port state control MOU white list in the 
world today. 

We  are  a  Nation  with  a  well  established  legal  system  that  protects  the  rights  of 
people  as  well  as  their  safety.  It  is  recognized  that  the  Bahamian  penal  code  in 
many  ways  to  be  equal  to  that  of  the  United  States  albeit  based  upon  the  British 
system.  The  Bahamian  law  does  extend  to  vessels  flying  the  Bahamian  flag.  We 
have this year appointed High Commissioner Farquharson the former Commandant, 
of the Royal Bahamas Police Force to be our permanent representative at IMO and 
a  Superintendent  of  Police  in  Nassau  to  be  our  point  of  contact  for  Maritime  En-
forcement.  This  demonstrates  and  underscores  our  commitment  to  security  in  the 
maritime field. 

We  all  know  that  vessels  of  various  flags  ply  the  four  corners  of  this  planet,  and 
frequently it would be very difficult for Bahamian law enforcement officials to inves-
tigate  and  apply  Bahamian  law  aboard  a  vessel  sailing  thousands  of  miles  away. 
The Bahamas also has extradition treaties with a limited number of countries which 
means  even  though  suspected  perpetrators  can  be  identified,  bringing  them  to  jus-
tice  may  prove  impossible.  It  is  equally  difficult  for  U.S.  law  enforcement  officials 
to  do  so  on  U.S.  flag  vessels  operating  in  remote  locations.  In  such  cases,  we  have 
situations where the law of local countries can be applied or even agreements where 
by  agreement  U.S.  officials  may  assist  Bahamian  officials  in  investigating  and  ap-
plying  Bahamian  law.  Even  in  the  territorial  waters  of  the  Bahamas,  U.S.  law  en-
forcement assets and officials assist Bahamian law enforcement officials in enforcing 
Bahamian  or  U.S.  law  pursuant  to  mutual  cooperation  agreements,  particularly  in 
the  areas  of  drug  and  immigration  enforcement.  I  know  of  no  policy  restrictions  in 
the  Bahamas  on  extending  such  mutual  cooperating  to  those  instances  where  U.S. 
citizens  are  involved  in  other  alleged  criminal  acts.  I  would  be  pleased  to  work  on 
such agreements with the relevant agencies of both governments. 

As  a  practical  matter,  today  passenger  ships  that  have  incidents  involving  U.S. 
citizens  routinely  notify  both  the  Bahamian  and  U.S.  governments.  I  know  of  no 
case where the Bahamian government has stood in the way of U.S. law enforcement 
officials  investigating  or  prosecution  of  crimes  occurring  onboard  passenger  ships. 
The safety and security record of passenger ships flying the Bahamian flag is excel-
lent.  I  believe  this  is  in  no  small  part  due  to  the  cooperative  relationship  of  the 
major  trade  association  the  Cruise  Lines  International  Association  (CLIA)  with 
agencies  of  the  U.S.  Government  and  with  my  agency  the  Bahamas  Maritime  Au-
thority. I deeply respect the proactive approach of the passenger vessels on the mat-
ters of vessel and personal safety and security. 

I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  include  these  comments  in  the  record  of  your 
hearing  and  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions  you  may  have  relating  to 
this information. 

Respectfully, 

KENNETH MCLEAN, 

Director and CEO, 

Bahamas Maritime Authority. 

CC: Hon. JOHN KERRY 
Washington, D.C. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:32 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80392.TXT JACKIE

